29 


Qe 
” ~N 3 
i bd SS, ў 
S В Sens Met OS 2 
т 2 3 : 5 хан 
a. ce ; зе 
бео 5% Қ аз. „4 


PLATO 
REPUBLIC 


5 --- 4? os т ре 
on а. BOE ті б 
х 3 2° 2 as 


% ам Pe, 
~ 200% SO д, ee % Шы 
` H ae 5: ENE Ж 9 ` 
ғ Ф 


TRANSLATED BY 


G.M.A. GRUBE 


REVISED BY C.D.C. REEVE 


PLATO 


REPUBLIC 


CATO ṣ 
REPUBLIC 


TRANSLATED BY 
G.M.A. GRUBE 


REVISED BY C.D.C. REEVE 


HACKETT PUBLISHING COMPANY, INC. 
INDIANAPOLIS/CAMBRIDGE 


Plato: 428/7-347 в.с. 


It is thought that the Republic was written с. 380 B.C. 


Copyright © 1992 by Hackett Publishing Company, Inc. 
All rights reserved 

Printed in the United States of America 

25 78 


Design by Dan Kirklin 


For further information, please address 


Hackett Publishing Company, Inc. 
P.O. Box 44937 
Indianapolis, Indiana 46244-0937 


Library of Congress Cataloging-in-Publication Data 


Plato. 
[Republic. English] 
The Republic/Plato: translated by G.M.A. Grube—2nd ed./ 
revised by C.D.C. Reeve. 
р. cm. 
Includes bibliographical references and index. 
ISBN 0-87220-137-6 (alk. paper). 
ISBN 0-87220-136-8 (pbk.: alk. paper) 
1. Political science—Early works to 1800. 2. Utopias. 
I. Grube, G.M.A. (George Maximilian Anthony) II. Reeve, C.D.C., 
1948- > I. Title. 
JC71.P35 1992b 
321'.07—dc20 92-21578 


CIP 


PREFACE 
INTRODUCTION 
BIBLIOGRAPHY 


Book I 
Book II 
Book III 
Book IV 
Book V 
Book VI 
Book VII 
Book VIII 
Book IX 
Book X 


INDEX 


CONTENTS 


PREFACE 


G.M.A. Grube’s translation of the Republic aimed to combine fidelity to 
Plato’s text with natural readability. It was remarkably successful in achiev- 
ing these aims, far more successful, in my view, than any other translation. 
It is a measure of his achievement, indeed, and of its immense popularity 
that only after twenty years did any revision seem called for. ‘The revision 
I have produced is nonetheless a thorough one, and a reader familiar with 
the original will find that quite a lot has been changed. But, though much 
is new, the foundations remain squarely Grube’s, and, without them to 
build on, I would not have been able to serve Plato nearly so well. 

The Republic is largely in reported speech. Socrates is relating a conver- 
sation he had in the past. Following Grube’s lead, but going a little further 
than he did, I have often omitted the “I said” and “he replied” that signal 
such indirection. This minimal loss in literalness results in a much more 
readable and less rebarbative English text. 

Every translation, even the most self-consciously and flat-footedly “lit- 
eral,” is an interpretation. The goal is to get the interpretation right. This 
is hard enough to do with a treatise. It is much more difficult, it has 
become trite to say, with a great work of art. Nonetheless, it is the task 
that a translator faces and must not shirk. One cannot avoid it by trying, 
for example, to translate word for word, always using the same English 
word for any given word of Greek, for one and the same Greek word 
may have many different meanings, and different Greek words may have 
the same meaning. I have not tried vainly to avoid interpretation, therefore, 
but I have tried—no doubt with mixed success—to get the interpretation 
right. 

The Introduction, Prefaces to the individual Books, and Index are new, 
as are many of the notes. The Index, as well as enabling the reader to 
discover where central topics are discussed or key concepts employed, 
shows in what ways many important Greek terms have been differently 
handled in different contexts. In most instances the translation follows 
John Burnet’s Oxford edition of the Greek text, but in a few cases I have 
preferred the text indicated in the notes. 

In his original Preface, Grube thanked his wife for her constant assis- 


vi 


PREFACE vii 


tance and Professors George Edison and Malcolm Brown for their helpful 
suggestions. It seems fitting to repeat these acknowledgments here and to 
add some of my own. I am grateful to the Grube family for encouraging 
this revision, to Hackett Publishing Company for suggesting the project 
to me and helping in so many different ways to carry it out, and to Walter 
Englert for his always cheerfully given assistance. I am also immensely 
grateful to the publisher’s readers, John Cooper and Paul Woodruff. I 
have benefited immeasurably from their wisdom and from the diligence, 
care, and good humor with which they have suggested revisions, pointed 
out errors, and urged me to reconsider decisions. 


INTRODUCTION 


Plato 


Plato is traditionally thought to have been born in 428 B.c. and to have 
died in 348. His father, Ariston, was descended—or so legend has it— 
from Codrus, the last king of Athens; his mother, Perictione, was related 
to Solon, the first architect of the Athenian constitution. His family was 
aristocratic and well off. He had two brothers, Glaucon and Adeimantus, 
both of whom appear in the Republic, and a sister, Potone, whose son, 
Speusippus, took over as head of the Academy’ on Plato’s death. While 
Plato was still a boy, his father died and his mother married Pyrilampes, 
a friend of the great Athenian statesman Pericles. Thus Plato was no 
stranger to Athenian political life even from childhood. Because he was 
eighteen in 409, when the Peloponnesian war with Sparta was still in 
progress, he almost certainly served in the military in that period. He may 
have served again around 395, when Athens was involved in the so-called 
Corinthian war. 

Given his social class and family connections, it would have been natural 
for Plato to take a prominent role in Athenian political life. But he did not 
do this, and, in his Seventh Letter, written when he was himself over 
seventy, he explains why:” 


As a young man I went through the same experiences as many others. 
I thought that as soon as I became my own master, Га devote myself 
to public affairs. Now, it happened that the course of political events 
gave me the chance to do just that. The existing constitution came 
to be reviled by many people, so that a revolution occurred ... 
and thirty rulers were set up with supreme powers. Some of these 
happened to be relatives and friends of mine,’ and they immediately 


1. See p. xii below. 


2. Таѕѕште that the Seventh Letter is genuine. But it may have been written by a disciple 
soon after Plato’s death. 


3. Plato’s uncle Charmides and his cousin Critias were among these rulers, called “the 
Thirty” or “the Thirty Tyrants.” Their reign lasted only about ninety days. 


Vill 


INTRODUCTION ix 


called on me to join them, on the assumption that theirs was the sort 
of work appropriate for someone like me. It’s no wonder, since I was 
a young man, that my feeling was that they would govern the city by 
leading it from an unjust way of life to a just one, and I was intensely 
interested to see what would happen. But after a short time, I saw 
that these men made the former constitution seem like a golden 
age by comparison. Among other things, they sent my aged friend, 
Socrates, whom I wouldn’t hesitate to call the most just man of his 
time, along with some others to fetch one of their fellow citizens by 
force, so that he could be executed.* Their purpose was to involve 
Socrates in their activities, whether he wished it or not. He refused, 
however, and risked the most extreme penalties rather than take 
part in their unholy deeds. When I saw all this, and other similarly 
significant things, I withdrew in disgust from the evils then being 
practiced. Not long after that the Thirty and their entire constitution 
were overthrown. Then, once more, but this time more hesitantly, I 
was moved by the desire to take part in public affairs and politics. To 
be sure, many offenses continued to take place in those troublesome 
times as well, and it is hardly surprising that during these revolutions 
some people took excessive revenge on their enemies. But in general 
the restored democratic exiles exhibited considerable decency. As it 
chanced, however, some of those in control summoned our compan- 
ion Socrates before the law courts and brought a most unholy charge 
against him, one that he least of all deserved, for they charged him 
with impiety and the people condemned and put to death the very 
man who, on the earlier occasion, when they themselves had the 
misfortune to be exiles, had refused to take part in the arrest of one 
of their friends. . . . The result was that I, who had at first been full 
of eagerness for public affairs, when I considered all this and saw 
how things were shifting about every which way, at last became dizzy. 
I didn’t cease to consider ways of improving this particular situation, 
however, and, indeed, of reforming the whole constitution. But as far 
as action was concerned, І kept waiting for favorable moments апа 
finally saw clearly that the constitutions of all actual cities are bad and 
that their laws are almost beyond redemption without extraordinary 
resources and luck as well. Hence I was compelled to say in praise 
of the true philosophy that it enables us to discern what is just for a 
city or an individual in every case and that the human race will have 
no respite from evils until those who are really and truly philosophers 
acquire political power or until, through some divine dispensation, 


4. The citizen in question was Leon of Salamis. See Plato, Apology 32с-е. 


x REPUBLIC 


those who rule and have political authority in cities become real 


philosophers (3246-3260). 


Thus at the heart of Plato’s refusal to participate actively in politics, at the 
heart of his turn from practical politics to political philosophy and educa- 
tion, we find the enigmatic figure of Socrates. 

Philosophy for Socrates seems to have consisted almost entirely in 
examining people about justice, piety, courage, moderation, wisdom, 
friendship, and the other conventionally recognized virtues. He is always 
asking Ti esti? or What is it? about each of them. And he seems to 
presuppose that there are definite, unique answers to these questions, that 
justice, piety, courage, and the rest are each some definite property or 
universal—some definite form—whose nature can be captured in a unique 
definition or account (see Plato, Euthyphro 6d-e). 

Socrates’ method of examining is the so-called elenchus—we see some 
examples of it in operation іп Republic 1. Polemarchus defines justice as 
giving to each the things he is owed (331е). Socrates shows him that this 
is inconsistent with other things he firmly believes. The result is that 
Polemarchus modifies his original definition, and again Socrates shows 
him that the new position is inconsistent with other beliefs he has. In 
the ideal situation, this process continues until a satisfactory definition 
emerges, one that is not inconsistent with other firmly held beliefs. 

Most of the definitions Socrates encounters in the course of his elenctic 
examinations of others prove unsatisfactory, but a few doctrines do emerge 
unscathed. Among them is the quintessentially Socratic doctrine that no 
one ever does what he knows or believes to be other than the best, so that 
weakness of will, or acting against what one knows or believes to be best, 
is impossible (Protagoras 352b ff.). 

The goal of an elenchus is not simply to reach adequate definitions of 
the virtues or strange doctrines about weakness of will, however; it also 
has a moral reformatory purpose, for Socrates believes that regular elenctic 
philosophizing makes people happier and more virtuous than anything 
else (see Plato, Apology 30a, 36с-е, 38a, 41b—-c). Indeed, philosophizing 
is so important for human welfare, on his view, that he is willing to accept 
execution rather than give it up (29b-d). 

It is obvious from the Republic that Plato shares Socrates’ preoccupation 
with ethics and with definitions, but it also seems obvious that he soon 
abandons or significantly modifies Socrates’ method of inquiry, as well as 
some of his specific doctrines. After Book I, for example, the elenchus is 
conspicuous by its absence. And in Book VII, Plato suggests that its use 
on or by young people may result in their becoming immoral sensualists 


INTRODUCTION xi 


(538c ҒҒ). That seems to be one reason why dialectic—which is a descen- 
dant of the Socratic elenchus—must be practiced only by mature people 
who have mastered the mathematical sciences (531d ff.). In Book IV, a 
subtle argument for the tripartition of the psyche or soul seems in part 
designed to allow for the possibility of some kinds of weakness of will 
(especially 439e ҒҒ). But despite these differences, Plato, like Socrates, is 
absolutely convinced that philosophy holds the key to human happiness 
and welfare (see 473с-е, 499а-с). 

Socrates was one major influence on Plato, then, perhaps the most 
important influence of all. But there were others as well. Aristotle tells us, 
for example, that Plato was acquainted with the Heraclitean philosopher 
Cratylus “from his youth” (Metaphysics 987432). Now, Cratylus, like his 
master Heraclitus, believed that “everything flows,” that everything is 
always changing, always in a state of flux. And a similar doctrine is found 
in Republic V, where sensible things and properties—things and properties 
perceived by the senses—are described as “rolling around as intermediates 
between what is not and what purely is” (Republic 478a—479d). But whether 
or not this doctrine is a legacy of Cratylus’ tutelage, it left Plato with a 
difficult problem, for if sensible things and properties are always in flux, 
how can justice and the other virtues be stable forms? How can there be 
fixed answers to Socrates’ questions? And if there are no fixed answers to 
them, how can there be such a thing as stable ethical knowledge? It was 
reflection on these questions, Aristotle tells us, that led Plato to “separate” 
the forms from sensible things and properties (Metaphysics 1078512-32, 
1086b7—11). The allegories of the Sun, Line, and Cave, which divide 
reality into the intelligible and the visible (sensible), seem to embody this 
separation. But just what it amounts to is a matter of dispute. 

After the death of Socrates, Plato and some other Socratics. seem to 
have taken refuge in Megara with the philosopher Eucleides, who was a 
follower of Parmenides of Elea. Parmenides’ doctrines are notoriously 
difficult to understand, but he seems to have held that it is impossible to 
say that something és not, for if it really / not, how can it Ре there to think 
or talk about? If we cannot talk or think about what is not, however, then 
we cannot think or talk about a multiplicity of things, A, B, and C, for if 
А,В, and С are many, then they are not one and the same as each other, 
and we cannot say or think that. It follows that whatever is must be one. 
By the same token, what is cannot move or change, for something moves 
if it is not now at a place at which it was earlier (yesterday it was in Athens; 
today it is not in Athens), and something changes if it does not now have 
a property that it had earlier (yesterday it was white; today it is not white), 
and we cannot say or think either of these things. Eucleides seems to have 


xii REPUBLIC 


tried to combine these puzzling doctrines with Socrates’ ethical teaching, 
arguing that the good, god, reason, justice, and the other virtues are all 
identical to the one unchanging being defended by Parmenides. The 
resulting metaphysical views find many echoes in Plato’s writings, not the 
least of which is that Platonic forms seem at times to have some of the 
traits of Parmenidean being (see Plato, Symposium 211а-а). 

When Plato was around forty, he may have made another journey away 
from Athens, this time to Italy and Sicily. It seems likely that he did so in 
order to visit the Pythagorean philosophers living there, especially the 
philosopher-statesman Archytas of Tarentum, who is mentioned in 
friendly terms in the Seventh Letter. In any case, the dialogues clearly show 
the influence of Pythagorean doctrine, with its near-obsessive focus on 
number and ratio as the key to reality. Archytas himself, for example, 
among many other significant achievements in mathematics and mechan- 
ics, discovered the ratios that underlie the relations between the successive 
notes in the enharmonic, harmonic, and chromatic scales. One can easily 
imagine Plato seeing in such achievements the possibility of giving precise 
definitions in wholly mathematical terms of such apparently vague and 
evaluative notions as harmony and disharmony, beauty and ugliness, maybe 
even justice and injustice, good and evil, and the other things of which 
Socrates sought definitions. In any case, the Republic itself provides strong 
evidence that Plato thought that forms could be satisfactorily defined, not 
in terms of sensible properties, but only in terms of numbers, ratios, and 
other precise matheinatical notions (see 530d—533e). 

Plato may have left Italy somewhat intoxicated with the possibilities of 
using mathematics to help solve philosophical and political problems, but 
in another way he was sobered by his Italian journey, for he recoiled in 
horror at the luxury and sensuality of the life ете (Seventh Letter 326b- 
d), and, again, the effects of this recoil are palpable in the Republic and in 
many other of Plato’s writings. 

From Italy Plato travelled to Sicily, where he made ardent friends with 
Dion, brother-in-law of the ruling tyrant Dionysius I. Dion became, in 
effect, Plato’s pupil and under his influence came to prefer goodness to 
the pleasure and luxury with which he was surrounded. Exactly what 
subsequently transpired in Sicily is unclear, as is the precise length of 
Plato’s stay. There is some reason to believe, however, that Plato was 
expelled by Dionysius and perhaps even sold into slavery by him, only to 
be rescued from the slave market by a benevolent stranger. 

But whatever exactly happened, Plato returned to Athens, bought some 
land in the precinct of the hero Academus, and there around 385 founded 
his famous school, the Academy, which lasted until А.р. 529. With some 
significant interruptions, to which we shall return, Plato spent the remain- 


INTRODUCTION xiii 


der of his life as director of studies in the Academy (see 528b-—c). He is 
thought to have written the Republic there in around 380 в.с. 

It is not clear that Plato’s school was the first European university—a 
distinction that some would award to schools supposed to predate it on 
the Ionian coast of Asia Minor (the birthplace of Heraclitus and Herodo- 
tus, among others)—but it is the first of which we have any real knowledge, 
although that knowledge is far from extensive or detailed. Nonetheless, 
what evidence we do have makes it clear that the Academy was a center 
of research both in theoretical subjects and also in more practical ones. 
Metaphysics, epistemology, psychology, ethics, politics, and aesthetics all 
grew and developed there, as did mathematical science. Eudoxus, who 
gave a geometrical explanation of the revolutions of the sun, moon, and 
planets, and developed a general theory of proportion applicable to 
commensurable and incommensurable magnitudes, studied and taught 
in the Academy, as did Theaetetus, who developed solid geometry, and 
Heraclides Ponticus, who discovered the revolution of Venus and 
Mercury around the sun. But members of the Academy were also 
invited by a variety of cities—Arcadia, Pyrrha, Cidus, and Stagira are 
all mentioned—to help them develop new political constitutions. Thus 
it would be quite wrong to think that Plato and the other academicians 
perpetually had their heads in the clouds. If this were so, they 
would hardly have been much use to politicians confronting practical 
constitutional problems. 

One further series of events from Plato’s life bears relating. In 368, 
Dionysius I died, and Dion persuaded his son, Dionysius II, to send for 
Plato to get his advice on how to run the state. What followed was by all 
accounts a shambles, for Dionysius П did not want to study mathematics 
and philosophy in order to become a better ruler. Plato remained in Sicily 
until 366, when he was allowed to return home. But in 362, to fulfill a 
promise, he returned to Sicily, where he was kept until 360, at which 
time he was rescued by ambassadors from Tarentum sent by his friend 
Archytas. 7 

Plato did not go to Sicily to found а heaven on earth; he was much too 
hardheaded for that. But he surely thought that he had something to teach 
Dionysius that would prove of real political significance. Throughout the 
Republic, indeed, he insists that the ideal city he describes is a real possibil- 
ity that would most easily be realized if a king became a philosopher or a 
philosopher became a king.” 


5. For further details about Plato’s life and writings see W.K.C. Guthrie, A History of 
Greek Philosophy, Vol. 4 (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1986): 8-66, and 
G. C. Field, Plato and His Contemporaries (New York: Dutton, 1930): 1-48. 


хіу REPUBLIC 


The Main Argument of the Republic’ 


Thrasymachus is the most interesting of Socrates’ interlocutors in Book 
I of the Republic. He defines justice as the advantage of the stronger, it 
seems, because he thinks something like this: The stronger rule in any 
city or society and so control the education and socialization of their 
subjects. But, like everyone else, the rulers are self-interested. Hence they 
educate and socialize their subjects with their own advantage, not that of 
their subjects, in view. Consequently, the values—including the ethical 
values—that subjects acquire are not ones that it is in their own best 
interests to have, but rather values that serve the interests of their rulers. 
The actions that subjects value as just, for example, are actions that benefit 
the rulers, not the subjects who do them. 

But these alleged facts about cities or societies and their rulers are not, 
of course, available to the subjects themselves. They see their ethical values 
as serving their own best interests at least as much as anyone else’s. But 
this, in Thrasymachus’ view, is simply because they are unaware of the 
influence their rulers have had in shaping their whole outlook on the 
world. 

This compelling story about the role of power in shaping our ethical 
beliefs obviously poses a challenge to any defender of justice, since it 
entails that it 15 not in everyone’s best interests to be just. But the challenge it 
poses to a theorist like Socrates is particularly sharp, for in searching for 
definitions of justice and the other virtues by means of the elenchus, 
Socrates draws on the beliefs of his interlocutors.’ But the truth or reliabil- 
ity of these beliefs is put in question by Thrasymachus’ account of the 
role the rulers play in how subjects acquire them. Hence Socrates’ method 
of ethical investigation is flawed because it rests on data whose reliability 
has been seriously challenged. 

It is clear, I think, that this challenge cuts right to the heart of Socratic 
ethics, as we described it in the previous section. It suggests that the 
elenchus is useless, that it cannot discover what the virtues are, but only 
what people think they are, as a result of being victims of a false ideology 
imposed on them by their stronger rulers. Thus Thrasymachus does not 
merely give an argument that justice is not in everyone’s best interests; he 
also gives an argument that imposes a severe restriction on the evidence 
we can use to show that he is wrong. 

This two-sided challenge is Plato’s major target in the Republic. Thus 


z- 


6. First-time readers may want to return to this Introduction after they have read the 
Republic for themselves. 


7. See p. x above. 


INTRODUCTION ХУ 


his aim is to show that justice is іп everyone’s best interests, because it is 
required for true happiness, and to do so without presupposing that 
people’s beliefs about the virtues (or about happiness, for that matter) are 
true. 

Once we see that this is Plato’s aim, many otherwise obscure aspects of 
his argument become intelligible to us. For example, we can understand 
why he begins, in Book II, to develop an account of the best kind of city, 
or kallipolis; for the problem of ideology has to be confronted at the 
political level, at the level of social or political influence on the formation 
of people’s beliefs. Second, we understand why he might think that the 
rulers of the kallipolis, the philosopher-kings, must study mathematical 
science and use it to define justice, courage, moderation, and the other 
virtues in precisely the way that it was already being used to define harmony 
in music; for mathematical science is surely less open to ideological influ- 
ence and contamination than ethical and political beliefs. Hence, by start- 
ing with it, the philosopher-kings can develop a theory of ethics that is 
itself free of the influence of false ideology. 

To escape the effects of false ideology, then, a city needs to be governed 
by rulers whose knowledge of mathematized ethics, politics, psychology, 
and the rest gives them access to undistorted ethical truth. But how can 
we be sure that rulers who possess that knowledge won’t use it, in the way 
Thrasymachean rulers do, to feather their own nests at the expense of 
their subjects? Plato’s answer to this question seems to be that only really 
virtuous people can actually gain genuine knowledge of ethical truth, 
because they alone can achieve genuine understanding of the good itself 
(521c—541b). 

How does he support this answer? Here are some rather unrefined 
thoughts. Plato believes that there are three fundamentally different kinds 
of desires: appetitive desires for food, drink, sex, and the money with which 
to acquire them; spirited desires for honor, victory, and good reputation; 
and rational desires for knowledge and truth (437b ff., 580d Ж). These 
desires, he argues in Book IV, must be located in different parts of the 
soul. It is these parts of the soul that determine someone’s character or 
fundamental psychological type. He is a money-lover if his soul or psyche 
is “ruled” by appetite, an honor-lover if it is “ruled” by the spirited part 
of his soul, and a wisdom-lover, or philosopher, if his soul is “ruled” by 
its rational part. 

Now, what psychic rule—or the rule of a soul by one of its parts— 
amounts to seems to be this: A part rules the soul just in case the whole 
soul aims primarily at satisfying the desires located in that part, because 
it believes that a fully good or happy life must be one in which the 
satisfaction of those desires takes precedence over other things. A money- 


хуі REPUBLIC 


lover takes the good or happiness to consist in reliably satisfying his 
appetitive desires; an honor-lover, his spirited desires; a philosopher, his 
rational desires. ‘Thus money-lovers, honor-lovers, and philosophers have 
different conceptions of what the good or happiness consists in, and the 
reason they have these different conceptions is because of a difference in 
the structure of their desires. To be crude about it: What we think the 
good is depends on what we want; hence people who want very different 
things will have very different conceptions of the good. 

Now, we know from Book I that the virtues are defined in terms of 
happiness ог the good (352d Ё). Hence, if money-lovers, honor-lovers, 
and philosophers have different conceptions of the good, they must also 
have different conceptions of the virtues. And the Republic shows us 
that people do indeed conceive of the virtues quite differently. Compare 
Polemarchus’ account of justice with Thrasymachus’, and both of these 
with the account Socrates defends in Book IV. 

One might think that at this point there is little left to be said, that these 
differences must simply be accepted, but Plato does not agree. He thinks 
he can show that only one of these conceptions of the good (and hence of 
the virtues) is correct, that only the philosopher’s conception is ultimately 
credible. His attempt to show this directly is to be found in Book IX 
(571a—592b). It is underwritten by the argument at the end of Book У, 
which is intended to show that, without forms, knowledge is impossible 
and that only philosophers have access to forms (473d—480). Both argu- 
ments are extraordinarily deep when properly understood, but both are 
likely to appear simply bizarre on first reading. Consequently, a charitable 
reader will want to consider them carefully and to look at what different 
critics have had to say about them. 

Suppose for the moment, however, that we are convinced by these 
Platonic arguments. We will then believe that the reason philosophers 
have access to the good and the virtues is that they are ruled by rational 
desires, or by the rational part of the soul in which those desires reside. 
But now Plato has a long argument, one of the many triumphs of the 
Republic, that to be virtuous—to be wise, courageous, moderate, and just— 
is simply to have a soul that is ruled by its rational part. It follows that the 
philosopher-kings must be virtuous. But if they are virtuous, they will rule 
the kallipolis as much in the interests of their subjects as in their own (see 
590с-е). 

It is not surprising, in the light of these arguments and doctrines, 
that Plato believes that the fundamental goal of education is not to put 
knowledge into people’s souls but to change their desires, thereby turning 
them around from the pursuit of what they falsely believe to be happiness 
to the pursuit of true happiness (5186-5194). Since the allegory of the 


INTRODUCTION xvii 


Cave illustrates the effects of education on us (514a), we ought to be able 
to see it as illustrating what happens as the internal rule of our soul passes 
from the desires in one part of our soul to those in another part. Here is 
a suggestion: 

STAGE 1: The prisoners at the bottom of the cave have received no 
education at all. They are bound by unnecessary appetitive desires (see 
5584-559с) and see images of models of “the things themselves” (516a). 

STAGE 2: When they have been appropriately educated in a craft or in 
music, poetry, and physical training, some of these prisoners are released 
from the bonds of unnecessary appetites and are then ruled only by 
necessary ones. They then see the models of the things of which they 
previously saw only images. 

STAGE 3: Through education in mathematical science, some of these 
people are released from the bonds of necessary appetites and are then 
bound by their spirited desires. They escape the cave and see the things 
themselves. 

STAGE 4: Through education in dialectic and practical city management, 
some of these people take the final step. They escape the bonds of their 
spirited desires and are then ruled only by their rational oncs. They see 
“the greatest object of study” (505a), the good itself, and see that it is in 
some way the cause of all the other things they have seen. 

Not everyone is able to take all these steps; there are some at each stage 
whose desires are too strong for education to break. That is why there are 
producers (money-lovers), guardians (honor-lovers), and philosopher- 
kings (wisdom-lovers) іп Plato’s ideal city. Nonetheless, everyone іп the 
kallipolis travels as far out of the cave as education can take him, given 
the innate strength of his desires. 

One more piece of supposing: Suppose we accept everything that has 
been said so far. Now let us ask ourselves this question: What sort of city 
would І most like to have been brought up in? Surely the answer would 
be something like this: I would like to be brought up in a city that would 
so educate me that I would come as close as possible to being ruled by 
the rational part of my soul, by my rational desires, for that way Га have 
the best chance of achieving true happiness. 

If that is the answer, then two things follow. First, we have a reason to 
want to be just and virtuous. Plato argues that a soul ruled by reason has 
to be just—indeed, he argues that justice in a soul simply is rational 
rule (441c—444e). It follows that Thrasymachus is mistaken: justice and 
happiness are so intimately bound up with one another that it is not 
possible to achieve true happiness without being just. Second, we have a 
reason to want to have been brought up in the city Plato describes in the 
Republic, for it now looks as if he designed that city to be one in which 


xviii REPUBLIC 


every one of us would receive the kind of education that would bring us 
as close to being ruled by reason as our nature (or the strength of our 
various desires) allows. As we read the Republic, we are likely to be 
disturbed by this conclusion. Anyone’s initial reaction to Plato’s ideal city 
is likely to be one of repugnance. Almost anyone nowadays will think that 
it is a repressive, even totalitarian place and that the freedoms we prize 
would be restricted there. This is a natural reaction, but itis one we ought 
to submit to the most careful scrutiny, for, if Plato is right, we may value 
these freedoms simply because of our enslavement to desires that distort 
our perception of the good and cause us to chase after things that will 
never make us really happy.® 


ше 


8. For а more detailed defense of the views expressed іп this section, see C.D.C. 
Reeve, Philosopher-Kings (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1988). 


BIBLIOGRAPHY 


Knowledge of the world in which Plato wrote can be acquired most easily 
by reading The World of Athens (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 
Ist ed., 1984) together with the relevant chapters of T. H. Irwin, Classical 
Thought (Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1989). Readers who want to 
know more about the pre-Socratic philosophers, such as Heraclitus and 
Parmenides, might begin with Edward Hussey, The Pre-Socratics (London: 
Duckworth, 1972). The sophists are well discussed in W.K.C. Guthrie, 
The Sophists (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1971). Selections 
from the writings of the lyric poets Plato mentions in the Republic are 
translated in Richmond Lattimore, Greek Lyrics (Chicago: Chicago Uni- 
versity Press, 1960). 

The first things to read on Socrates are, of course, Plato’s Socratic 
dialogues. Each of the following works are guides to them and to their 
interpretation: Т. Н. Irwin, Plato’s Moral Theory (Oxford: Clarendon Press, 
1977); Richard Kraut, Socrates and the State (Princeton: Princeton Univer- 
sity Press, 1984); C.D.C. Reeve, Socrates in the Apology (Indianapolis: 
Hackett, 1989); Gregory Vlastos, Socrates: Ironist and Moral Philosopher 
(Ithaca: Cornell University Press, 1991). 

It is useful, when reading the Republic, to have some sense of Plato’s 
philosophy as a whole. T. H. Irwin, Plato’s Moral Theory, is insightful 
about the dialogues up to and including the Republic. І. М. Crombie, An 
Examination of Plato’s Doctrines (London: Routledge and Kegan Paul, 
1962), though out of date in lots of ways, is still worth reading, as are 
W.K.C. Guthrie, 4 History of Greek Philosophy, vols. 4-5 (Cambridge: 
Cambridge University Press, 1975-78), J.C.B. Gosling, Plato (London: 
Routledge and Kegan Paul, 1973), and G.M.A. Grube, Plato’s Thought 
(Indianapolis: Hackett, 1980). 

On the Republic itself, the following works may be recommended: James 
Adam, The Republic of Plato (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 
1902) is still the best commentary on the Greek text, and much of it is 
accessible to Greekless readers. Julia Annas, An Introduction to Plato’s 
Republic (Oxford: Clarendon Press, 1981) is a lively philosophical discus- 
sion, accessible to undergraduates. Karl Popper, The Open Society and Its 


хіх 


хх REPUBLIC 


Enemies, vol. 1 (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1971) is a challenge 
to Plato that still deserves to be taken seriously. C.D.C. Reeve, Philosopher- 
Kings (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1988) is a philosophical 
reconstruction of the overall argument of the Republic, accessible to more 
advanced undergraduates. Nicholas White, A Companion to Plato’s Republic 
(Indianapolis: Hackett, 1979) is a useful commentary on the Republic, 
accessible to beginning students. 

The following articles on special topics in the Republic will be found 
particularly helpful: 


Myles Burnyeat, “Platonism and Mathematics: A Prelude to Discussion.” In A. 
Graeser, ed., Mathematics and Metaphysics in Aristotle (Bern: Paul Haupt, 1987). 

John М. Cooper, “The Psychology о Justice іп the Republic.” American Philosophical 
Quarterly (1977) 14: 151-57. 

—__________, “Plato’s Theory of Human Motivation.” History of Philosophy Quar- 
terly 1 (1984): 3-21. 

Gail Fine, “Knowledge and Belief in Republic V-VII.” In S. Everson, ed., Compan- 
tons to Ancient Thought 1: Epistemology (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 
1990). 

, Separation.” Oxford Studies in Ancient Philosophy 2 (1984): 31- 
87. 

J.C.B. Gosling, “Republic Book V: ta polla kala etc.” Phronesis У (1960): 116-28. 

T. H. Irwin, “Plato’s Heracleiteanism.” Philosophical Quarterly 27 (1977): 1-13. 

Sabina Lovibond, “Plato’s Theory of Mind.” In 5. Everson, ed., Companions to 
Ancient Thought 2: Psychology (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1991). 

Alexander Nehamas, “Plato on Imitation and Poetry in Republic 10.” In Julius 
Moravesik and Philip Temko, edd., Plato on Beauty, Wisdom and the Arts (Totowa: 
Rowman and Littlefield, 1982). 

C.D.C. Reeve, “Socrates Meets Thrasymachus.” Archiv fiir Geschichte der Philoso- 
phie 67 (1985): 246-65. 

David Sachs, “A Fallacy in Plato’s Republic.” Philosophical Review 72 (1963): 141- 
58. 

Gregory Vlastos, “The Theory of Social Justice in the Polis in Plato’s Republic.” 
In Helen North, ed., /nterpretations of Plato (Leiden: Brill, 1977). 

, “Elenchus and Mathematics: A Turning-Point in Plato’s Philo- 

sophical Development.” American Journal of Philology 109 (1988): 362-96. 

, “Was Plato a Feminist?” Times Literary Supplement March 17-23 


(1989). 


Book І 


On his way back from the Piraeus, where he has been attending a religious 
festival, Socrates meets Polemarchus and goes with him to the house of his aged 
father, Cephalus (327a—328b). Socrates and Cephalus discuss the burdens of old 
age. Cephalus claims that, while these burdens are eased by wealth, it is people’s 
character and habits that really determine whether or not their lives are hard to 
bear, not their age. Wealth is important mostly because it reduces the likelihood 
that someone will be tempted into being unjust because he is poor, and so lessens 
his fear of what will happen to him after he dies (3285-3318). This leads in a 
natural way into a discussion of what justice is, for Cephalus has suggested in 
his remarks that it is speaking the truth and paying one’s debts. 

Cephalus goes off to attend to religious matters, and Polemarchus becomes heir 
to his argument, as he will later become heir to his estate. There follows a lengthy 
examination of Polemarchus, in the course of which he is forced to abandon a 
number of views about justice he has adopted along the way (331c—336b). One 
of these, suggested not by Polemarchus but by Socrates, is that virtue 15 a craft or 
techné (332d). This is also assumed in the subsequent exchange with Thrasy- 
machus. 

Thrasymachus 1s irritated by this examination and demands that Socrates give 
his own positive account of justice, instead of simply refuting other people’s. 
Socrates claims that he cannot give such an account, because he does not know 
what justice is, and he persuades Thrasymachus to give an account in his place 
(336b-338a). The account Thrasymachus gives is that justice is the advantage 
of the stronger (3380). He defends this account in two separate arguments (3384- 
341а, 343a—344c). Socrates makes a number of attempts to refute these argu- 
ments (342с-а, 345b-347d, 348b-350c, 351а-3524, 352d—354a), but, 
though Thrasymachus cannot defend himself against them, they leave him uncon- 
vinced (34la—b, 349a, 3504-е, 3520, 353e, 354a). Since Glaucon, Adeiman- 
tus, and indeed Socrates himself (354b) are also dissatisfied with the outcome of 
Book I (358b, 3670), we must wonder how successful Plato himself thought 
Socrates’ refutations of Thrasymachus actually were. 


2, SOCRATES/ POLEMARCHUS/ Сі. АОСОМҺ/ CEPHALUS 


I went down to the Piraeus yesterday with Glaucon, the son of Ariston. I 
327 wanted to say a prayer to the goddess,’ and I was also curious to see how 
they would manage the festival, since they were holding it for the first 
time. I thought the procession of the local residents was a fine one and 
that the one conducted by the Thracians was no less outstanding. After 
we had said our prayer and seen the procession, we started back towards 
b Athens. Polemarchus saw us from a distance as we were setting off for 
home and told his slave to run and ask us to wait for him. The slave caught 
hold of my cloak from behind: Polemarchus wants you to wait, he said. I 
turned around and asked where Polemarchus was. He’s coming up behind 
you, he said, please wait for him. And Glaucon replied: All right, we will. 

Just then Polemarchus caught up with us. Adeimantus, Glaucon’s 

c brother, was with him and so were Niceratus, the son of Nicias, and some 
others, all of whom were apparently on their way from the procession. 

Polemarchus said: It looks to me, Socrates, as if you two are starting 
off for Athens. 

It looks the way it is, then, I said. 

Do you see how many we are? he said. 

I do. 

Well, you must either prove stronger than we are, or you will have to 
stay here. 

Isn’t there another alternative, namely, that we persuade you to let us 
go? 

But could you persuade us, if we won’t listen? 

Certainly not, Glaucon said. 

Well, we won’t listen; you’d better make up your mind to that. 

328 Don’t you know, Adeimantus said, that there is to be a torch race on 
horseback for the goddess tonight? 

On horseback? I said. That’s something new. Are they going to race on 
horseback and hand the torches on in relays, or what? 

In relays, Polemarchus said, and there will be an all-night festival that 
will be well worth seeing. After dinner, we’ll go out to look at it. We’ll be 
joined there by many of the young men, and we’li talk. So don’t go; stay. 

b It seems, Glaucon said, that we’ll have to stay. 

If you think so, I said, then we must. 

So we went to Polemarchus’ house, and there we found Lysias and 
Euthydemus, the brothers of Polemarchus, Thrasymachus of Chalcedon, 


1. The Thracian goddess Bendis, whose-cult had recently been introduced in the 
Piraeus, the harbor area near Athens. 

2. Glaucon and Adeimantus were Plato’s brothers. They are Socrates’ chief interlocu- 
tors after Book I. 


BOOK! 327a-329c 3 


Charmantides of Paiania, and Cleitophon the son of Aristonymus.? Pole- 
marchus’ father, Cephalus, was also there, and I thought he looked quite 
old, as I hadn’t seen him for some time. He was sitting on a sort of cush- 
ioned chair with a wreath on his head, as he had been offering a sacrifice 
in the courtyard. There was a circle of chairs, and we sat down by him. 

As soon as he saw me, Cephalus welcomed me and said: Socrates, you 
don’t come down to the Piraeus to see us as often as you should. If it were 
still easy for me to walk to town, you wouldn’t have to come here; we’d 
come to you. But, as it is, you ought to come here more often, for you 
should know that as the physical pleasures wither away, my desire for con- 
versation and its pleasures grows. So do as I say: Stay with these young 
men now, but come regularly to see us, just as you would to friends or 
relatives. 

Indeed, Cephalus, I replied, I enjoy talking with the very old, for we 
should ask them, as we might ask those who have travelled a road that we 
too will probably have to follow, what kind of road it is, whether rough and 
difficult or smooth and easy. And Га gladly find out from you what you 
think about this, as you have reached the point in life the poets call “the 
threshold of old age.”* Is it a difficult time? What is your report about it? 

By god, Socrates, ГІ] tell you exactly what I think. A number of us, who 
are more or less the same age, often get together in accordance with the 
old saying.” When we meet, the majority complain about the lost pleasures 
they remember from their youth, those of sex, drinking parties, feasts, and 
the other things that go along with them, and they get angry as if they had 
been deprived of important things and had lived well then but are now 
hardly living at all. Some others moan about the abuse heaped on old 
people by their relatives, and because of this they repeat over and over 
that old age is the cause of many evils. But I don’t think they blame the 
real cause, Socrates, for if old age were really the cause, I should have 
suffered in the same way and so should everyone else of my age. But as 
it is, Гуе met some who don’t feel like that in the least. Indeed, I was once 
present when someone asked the poet Sophocles: “How are you as far as 
sex goes, Sophocles? Can you still make love with a woman?” “Quiet, 


3. Lysias was a well-known writer of speeches for use in legal trials. Socrates discusses 
a speech attributed to him in the Phaedrus. Thrasymachus was a sophist, a paid teacher 
of oratory and virtue. The few fragments of his writings that survive are translated in 
Freeman, Ancilla to the Pre-Socratic Philosophers (Cambridge: Harvard University Press, 
1977). Charmantides is otherwise unknown. 

4. Homer, Шаа 22.60, 24.487; Odyssey 25.246, 348, 23.212. 

5. “God ever draws together like to like” (Homer, Odyssey 17.218). See Plato, Lysis 
214а-215с. 


329 


4 CEPHALUS/SOCRATES 


man,” the poet replied, “I am very glad to have escaped from all that, like 
a slave who has escaped from a savage and tyrannical master.” I thought 
at the time that he was right, and I still do, for old age brings peace and 
freedom from all such things. When the appetites relax and cease to 
importune us, everything Sophocles said comes to pass, and we escape 

d from many mad masters. In these matters and in those concerning rela- 
tives, the real cause isn’t old age, Socrates, but the way people live. If they 
are moderate and contented, old age, too, is only moderately onerous; if 
they aren’t, both old age and youth are hard to bear. 

I admired him for saying that and I wanted him to tell me more, so I 
urged him on: When you say things like that, Cephalus, I suppose that 

e Ше majority of people don’t agree, they think that you bear old age more 
easily not because of the way you live but because you’re wealthy, for the 
wealthy, they say, have many consolations. 

That’s true; they don’t agree. And there is something in what they say, 
though not as much as they think. Themistocles’ retort is relevant here. 
When someone from Seriphus insulted him by saying that his high reputa- 

330 tion was due to his city and not to himself, he replied that, had he been 
a Seriphian, he wouldn’t be famous, but neither would the other even if 
һе had been an Athenian.° The same applies to those who aren’t rich and 
find old age hard to bear: A good person wouldn’t easily bear old age if 
he were poor, but a bad one wouldn’t be at peace with himself even if he 
were wealthy. 

Did you inherit most of your wealth, Cephalus, I asked, or did you make 
it for yourself? 

What did I make for myself, Socrates, you ask. As a money-maker I’m 

b ina sort of mean between my grandfather and my father. My grandfather 
and namesake inherited about the same amount of wealth as I possess but 
multiplied it many times. My father, Lysanias, however, diminished that 
amount to even less than I have now. As for me, I’m satisfied to leave my 
sons here not less but a little more than I inherited. 

The reason I asked is that you don’t seem to love money too much. And 
those who haven’t made their own money are usually like you. But those 

c who have made it for themselves are twice as fond of it as those who 
haven’t. Just as poets love their poems and fathers love their children, so 
those who have made their own money don’t just care about it because 


6. Themistocles, a fifth-century Athenian statesman, was the chief architect of the 
Greek victory over Persia. By building up*the navy, he secured Athens’ future as a 
naval power and also paved the way for the increased political power of the poorer 
classes, from which sailors were largely drawn. Seriphus is a small island in the 
Cyclades. 


воокі 329с-331с 5 


it’s useful, as other people do, but because it’s something they’ve made 
themselves. This makes them poor company, for they haven’t a good word 
to say about anything except money. 

That’s true. 

It certainly is. But tell me something else. What’s the greatest good 
you've received from being very wealthy? 

What I have to say probably wouldn’t persuade most people. But you 
know, Socrates, that when someone thinks his end is near, he becomes 
frightened and concerned about things he didn’t fear before. It’s then that 
the stories we’re told about Hades, about how people who’ve been unjust 
here must pay the penalty there—stories he used to make fun of—twist 
his soul this way and that for fear they're true. And whether because of 
the weakness of old age or because he is now closer to what happens in 
Hades and has a clearer view of it, or whatever it is, he is filled with 
foreboding and fear, and he examines himself to see whether he has been 
unjust to anyone. If he finds many injustices in his life, he awakes from 
sleep in terror, as children do, and lives in anticipation of bad things to 


(2 


come. But someone who knows that һе hasn’t been unjust has sweet good 331 


hope as his constant companion—a nurse to his old age, as Pindar’ says, 
for he puts it charmingly, Socrates, when he says that when someone lives 
a just and pious life 


Sweet hope is in his heart, 

Nurse and companion to his age. 
Hope, captain of the ever-twisting 
Minds of mortal men. 


How wonderfully well he puts that. It’s in this connection that wealth is 
most valuable, I’d say, not for every man but for a decent and orderly one. 
Wealth can do a lot to save us from having to cheat or deceive someone 
against our will and from having to depart for that other place in fear 
because we owe sacrifice to a god or money to a person. It has many other 
uses, but, benefit for benefit, I’d say that this is how it is most useful to 
a man of any understanding. 

A fine sentiment, Cephalus, but, speaking of this very thing itself, namely, 
justice,” are we to say unconditionally that it is speaking the truth and paying 


7. Pindar (518-438 в.с.), a lyric poet from Boeotia, was most famous for his poems 
in celebration of the victors in the games, such as the Olympian and Pythian, held in 
various parts of Greece. 

8. Unlike their usual equivalents “just” and “justice,” the adjective dikaios and the 
noun dikaiosuné are often used in a wider sense, better captured by our words “right” 
or “correct.” The opposite, adikia, then has the sense of general wrongdoing. 


222 


6 SOCRATES/CEPHALUS/ POLEMARCHUS 


whatever debts one has incurred? Or is doing these things sometimes just, 
sometimes unjust? I mean this sort of thing, for example: Everyone would 
surely agree that if a sane man lends weapons to a friend and then asks for 
them back when he is out of his mind, the friend shouldn’t return them, and 
wouldn’t be acting justly if he did. Nor should anyone be willing to tell the 
whole truth to someone who is out of his mind. 

That’s true. 

Then the definition of justice isn’t speaking the truth and repaying what 
one has borrowed. 

It certainly is, Socrates, said Polemarchus, interrupting, if indeed we’re 
to trust Simonides at all.’ 

Well, then, Cephalus said, ГІЇ hand over the argument to you, as I have 
to look after the sacrifice. 

So, Polemarchus said, am I then to be your heir in everything? 

You certainly are, Cephalus said, laughing, and off he went to the 
sacrifice. 

Then tell us, heir to the argument, I said, just what Simonides stated 
about justice that you consider correct. 

He stated that it is just to give to each what is owed to him. And it’s a 
fine saying, in my view. 

Well, now, it isn’t easy to doubt Simonides, for he’s a wise and godlike 
man. But what exactly does he mean? Perhaps you know, Polemarchus, 
but I don’t understand him. Clearly, he doesn’t mean what we said a 
moment ago, that it is just to give back whatever a person has lent to you, 
even if he’s out of his mind when he asks for it. And yet what he has lent 
to you is surely something that’s owed to him, isn’t it? 

Yes. 

But it is absolutely not to be given to him when he’s out of his mind? 

That’s true. 

Then it seems that Simonides must have meant something different 
when he says that to return what is owed is just. 

Something different indeed, by god. He means that friends owe it to 
their friends to do good for them, never harm. 

I follow you. Someone doesn’t give a lender back what he’s owed by 
giving him gold, if doing so would be harmful, and both he and the lender 
are friends. Isn’t that what you think Simonides meant? 

It is. 

But what about this? Should one also give one’s enemies whatever is 
owed to them? 


z- 


9. Simonides (с. 548-468 в.с.), a lyric and elegiac poet, was born in the Aegean 
island of Ceos. 


BOOK1 331с-332е 7 


By all means, one should give them what is owed to them. And in my 
view what enemies owe to each other is appropriately and precisely— 
something bad. 

It seems then that Simonides was speaking in riddles—just like a 
poet!—when he said what justice is, for he thought it just to give to each 
what is appropriate to him, and this is what he called giving him what is 
owed to him. 

What else did you think he meant? 

Then what do you think he’d answer if someone asked him: “Simonides, 
which of the things that are owed or that are appropriate for someone or 
something to have does the стай!“ we call medicine give, and to whom or 
what does it give them?” 

It’s clear that it gives medicines, food, and drink to bodies. 

And what owed or appropriate things does the craft we call cooking 
give, and to whom or what does it give them? 

It gives seasonings to food. 

Good. Now, what does the craft we call justice give, and to whom or 
what does it give it? 

If we are to follow the previous answers, Socrates, it gives benefits to 
friends and does harm to enemies. 

Simonides means, then, that to treat friends well and enemies badly is 
justice? 

I believe so. 

And who is most capable of treating friends well and enemies badly in 
matters of disease and health? 

A doctor. 

And who can do so best in a storm at sea? 

A ship’s captain. 

What about the just person? In what actions and what work is he most 
capable of benefiting friends and harming enemies? 

In wars and alliances, I suppose. 

All right. Now, when people aren’t sick, Polemarchus, a doctor is useless 
to them? 

True. 

And so is a ship’s captain to those who aren’t sailing? 

Yes. 


10. The Greek word translated as “craft” here is techne. It has the sort of connotation 
for Socrates and Plato that “science” has for us. Thus fifth-century doctors tried to 
show that medicine is a craft, much as contemporary psychoanalysts try to convince us 
that psychoanalysis is a science. For further discussion see Reeve, Socrates in the Apology, 


37-45. 


333 


8 SOCRATES/ POLEMARCHUS 


And to people who aren’t at war, a just man is useless? 

No, I don’t think that at all. 

Justice is also useful in peacetime, then? 

It is. 

And so is farming, isn’t it? 

Yes. 

For getting produce? 

Yes. 

And shoemaking as well? 

Yes. 

For getting shoes, I think you’d say? 

Certainly. 

Well, then, what is justice useful for getting and using in peacetime? 

Contracts, Socrates. 

And by contracts do you mean partnerships, or what? 

I mean partnerships. 

Is someone a good and useful partner in a game of checkers because 
he’s just or because he’s a checkers player? 

Because he’s a checkers player. 

And in laying bricks and stones, is a just person a better and more useful 
partner than a builder? 

Not at all. 

In what kind of partnership, then, is a just person a better partner than 
a builder or a lyre-player, in the way that a lyre-player is better than a just 
person at hitting the right notes? 

In money matters, I think. 

Except perhaps, Polemarchus, in using money, for whenever one needs 
to buy a horse jointly, I think a horse breeder is a more useful partner, 
isn’t he? 

Apparently. 

And when one needs to buy a boat, it’s a boatbuilder or a ship’s captain? 

Probably. 

In what joint use of silver or gold, then, is a just person a more useful 
partner than the others? 

When it must be deposited for safekeeping, Socrates. 

You mean whenever there is no need to use them but only to keep 
them? 

That’s right. 

Then it is when money isn’t being used that justice is useful for it? 

Pm afraid so. J 

And whenever one needs to keep a pruning knife safe, but not to use 
it, justice is useful both in partnerships and for the individual. When you 
need to use it, however, it is skill at vine pruning that’s useful? 


BOOK I 332е-334с 9 


Apparently. 

You'll agree, then, that when one needs to keep a shield or a lyre safe 
and not to use them, justice is a useful thing, but when you need to use 
them, it is soldiery or musicianship that’s useful? 

Necessarily. 

And so, too, with everything else, justice is useless when they are in use 
but useful when they aren’t? 

It looks that way. 

In that case, justice isn’t worth much, since it is only useful for useless 
things. But let’s look into the following point. Isn’t the person most able 
to land a blow, whether in boxing or any other kind of fight, also most 
able to guard against it? 

Certainly. 

And the one who is most able to guard against disease is also most able 
to produce it unnoticed? 

So it seems to me, anyway. 

And the one who is the best guardian of an army is the very one who 
can steal the enemy’s plans and dispositions? 

Certainly. 

Whenever someone is a clever guardian, then, he is also a clever thief. 

Probably so. 

If a just person is clever at guarding money, therefore, he must also be 
clever at stealing it. 

According to our argument, at any rate. 

A just person has turned out then, it seems, to be a kind of thief. Maybe 
you learned this from Homer, for he’s fond of Autolycus, the maternal 
grandfather of Odysseus, whom he describes as better than everyone at 
lying and stealing.’’ According to you, Homer, and Simonides, then, 
justice seems to be some sort of craft of stealing, one that benefits friends 
and harms enemies. Isn’t that what you meant? 

No, by god, it isn’t. I don’t know any more what I did mean, but I still 
believe that to benefit one’s friends and harm one’s enemies is justice. 

Speaking of friends, do you mean those a person believes to be good 
and useful to him or those who actually are good and useful, even if he 
doesn’t think they are, and similarly with enemies? 

Probably, one loves those one considers good and useful and hates 
those one considers bad and harmful. 

But surely people often make mistakes about this, believing many people 
to be good and useful when they aren’t, and making the opposite mistake 
about enemies? 

They do indeed. 


11. The reference is to Odyssey 19.392-8. 


334 


10 SOCRATES/ POLEMARCHUS 


And then good people are their enemies and bad ones their friends? 

That’s right. 

d And so it’s just to benefit bad people and harm good ones? 

Apparently. 

But good people are just and able to do no wrong? 

True. 

Then, according to your account, it’s just to do bad things to those who 
do no injustice. 

No, that’s not just at all, Socrates; my account must be a bad one. 

It’s just, then, is it, to harm unjust people and benefit just ones? 

That’s obviously a more attractive view than the other one, anyway. 

Then, it follows, Polemarchus, that it is just for the many, who are 
mistaken in their judgment, to harm their friends, who are bad, and benefit 

e their enemies, who are good. And so we arrive at a conclusion opposite 
to what we said Simonides meant. 

That certainly follows. But let’s change our definition, for it seems that 
we didn’t define friends and enemies correctly. 

How did we define them, Polemarchus? 

We said that a friend is someone who is believed to be useful. 

And how are we to change that now? 

Someone who is both believed to be useful and is useful is a friend; 
someone who is believed to be useful but isn’t, is believed to be a friend 

335 but isn’t. And the same for the enemy. 

According to this account, then, a good person will be a friend and a 
bad one an enemy. 

Yes. 

So you want us to add something to what we said before about justice, 
when we said that it is just to treat friends well and enemies badly. You 
want us to add to this that it is just to treat well a friend who is good and 
to harm an enemy who is bad? 

b Right. That seems fine to me. 

Is it, then, the role of a just man to harm anyone? 

Certainly, he must harm those who are both bad and enemies. 

Do horses become better or worse when they are harmed? 

Worse. 

With respect to the virtue” that makes dogs good or the one that makes 
horses good? 


12. If something is a knife (say) or a man, its areté or virtue as a knife or a man is that 
state or property of it that makes it a good knife or a good man. See Charmides 161a8— 
9; Euthyphro 649-е1; Gorgias 506d2—4; Protagoras 332Һ4-6; Republic 353d9-354a2. 
The areté of a knife might include having a sharp blade; the areté of a man might include 
being intelligent, well-born, just, or courageous. Areté is thus broader than our notion 


BOOK I 334c-335e 11 


The one that makes horses good. 

And when dogs are harmed, they become worse in the virtue that makes 
dogs good, not horses? 

Necessarily. 

Then won’t we say the same about human beings, too, that when they 
are harmed they become worse in human virtue? 

Indeed. 

But isn’t justice human virtue? 

Yes, certainly. 

Then people who are harmed must become more unjust? 

So it seems. 

Can musicians make people unmusical through music? 

They cannot. 

Or horsemen make people unhorsemanlike through horsemanship? 

No. 

Well, then, can those who are just make people unjust through justice? 
In a word, can those who are good make people bad through virtue? 

They cannot. 

It isn’t the function of heat to cool things but of its opposite? 

Yes. 

Nor the function of dryness to make things wet but of its opposite? 

Indeed. 

Nor the function of goodness to harm but of its opposite? 

Apparently. 

And a just person is good? 

Indeed. 

Then, Polemarchus, it isn’t the function of a just person to harm a 
friend or anyone else, rather it is the function of his opposite, an unjust 
person? 

In my view that’s completely true, Socrates. 

If anyone tells us, then, that it is just to give to each what he’s owed and 
understands by this that a just man should harm his enemies and benefit 
his friends, he isn’t wise to say it, since what he says isn’t true, for it has 
become clear to us that it is never just to harm anyone? 

І agree. 

You and I shall fight as partners, then, against anyone who tells us that 


of moral virtue. It applies to things (such as knives) which are not moral agents. And 
it applies to aspects of moral agents (such as intelligence or family status) which are 
not normally considered to be moral aspects of them. For these reasons it is sometimes 
more appropriate to render areté as “excellence.” But “virtue” remains the best overall 
translation, and once these few facts are borne in mind, it should seldom mislead. 


12 SOCRATES/POLEMARCHUS/ THRASYMACHUS 


Simonides, Bias, Pittacus, or any of our other wise and blessedly happy 
men said this.” 

І, at any rate, am willing to be your partner in the battle. 

336 Do you know to whom I think the saying belongs that it is just to benefit 
friends and harm enemies? 

Who? 

I think it belongs to Periander, or Perdiccas, or Xerxes, or Ismenias of 
Corinth, or some other wealthy man who believed himself to have great 
power." 

Thats absolutely true. 

All right, since it has become apparent that justice and the just aren’t 
what such people say they are, what else could they be? 

While we were speaking, Thrasymachus had tried many times to take 

b over the discussion but was restrained by those sitting near him, who 
wanted to hear our argument to the end. When we paused after what Га 
just said, however, he couldn’t keep quiet any longer. He coiled himself 
up like a wild beast about to spring, and he hurled himself at us as if to 
tear us to pieces. 

Polemarchus and I were frightened and flustered as he roared into our 
midst: What nonsense have you two been talking, Socrates? Why do you 

c act like idiots by giving way to one another? If you truly want to know what 
justice is, don’t just ask questions and then refute the answers simply to 
satisfy your competitiveness or love of honor. You know very well that it 
is easier to ask questions than answer them. Give an answer yourself, and 
tell us what you say the just is. And don’t tell me that it’s the right, the 

d beneficial, the profitable, the gainful, or the advantageous, but tell me 
clearly and exactly what you mean; for I won’t accept such nonsense from 
you. 

His words startled me, and, looking at him, I was afraid. And І think 
that if I hadn’t seen him before he stared at me, Га have been dumbstruck. 
But as it was, І happened to look at him just as our discussion began to 

е exasperate him, so I was able to answer, and, trembling a little, І said: 
Don’t be too hard on us, Thrasymachus, for if Polemarchus and I made 
an error in our investigation, you should know that we did so unwillingly. 


13. Bias of Priene in Ionia (now the region of Turkey bordering on the eastern shore 
of the Aegean) and Pittacus of Mytilene (on the island of Lesbos in the eastern Aegean), 
both sixth century В.С., were two of the legendary seven sages of Greece. 

14. Periander was tyrant of the city of Corinth (650-570 в.с.). Perdiccas is probably 
Perdiccas П, King of Macedon (с. 450-413 в.с.), who is also mentioned in the Gorgias 
4Т1а-е. Xerxes was the king of Persia who invaded Greece in the second Persian war 
(begun in 480 B.c.). Ismenias is mentioned in the Meno 90a. All four are either notorious 
tyrants or men famous for their wealth. 


BOOK I 335e-337d 13 


If we were searching for gold, we’d never willingly give way to each other, 
if by doing so we’d destroy our chance of finding it. So don’t think that 
in searching for justice, a thing more valuable than even a large quantity 
of gold, we’d mindlessly give way to one another or be less than completely 
serious about finding it. You surely mustn’t think that, but rather—as I 
do—that we’re incapable of finding it. Hence it’s surely far more appro- 
priate for us to be pitied by you clever people than to be given rough 
treatment. 227 

When he heard that, he gave а loud, sarcastic laugh. Ву Heracles, he 
said, that’s just Socrates’ usual irony.” I knew, and I said so to these 
people earlier, that you’d be unwilling to answer and that, if someone 
questioned you, you'd be ironical and do anything rather than give an 
answer. 

That’s because you’re a clever fellow, Thrasymachus. You knew very 
well that if you ask someone how much twelve is, and, as you ask, you 
warn him by saying “Don’t tell me, man, that twelve is twice six, or three b 
times four, or six times two, or four times three, for I won’t accept such 
nonsense,” then you'll see clearly, I think, that no one could answer a 
question framed like that. And if he said to you: “What are you saying, 
Thrasymachus, am I not to give any of the answers you mention, not even 
if twelve happens to be one of those things? I’m amazed. Do you want me 
to say something other than the truth? Or do you mean something else?” 
What answer would you give him? с 

Well, so you think the two cases are alike? 

Why shouldn’t they be alike? But even if they aren’t alike, yet seem so 
to the person you asked, do you think him any less likely to give the answer 
that seems right to him, whether we forbid him to or not? 

Is that what you’re going to do, give one of the forbidden answers? 

I wouldn’t be surprised—provided that it’s the one that seems right to 
me after I’ve investigated the matter. 

What if I show you a different answer about justice than all these—and 
a better one? What would you deserve then? d 

What else than the appropriate penalty for one who doesn’t know, 
namely, to learn from the one who does know? Therefore, that’s what I 
deserve. 

You amuse me, but in addition to learning, you must pay a fine. 


15. The Greek word eirõneia, unlike its usual translation “irony,” is correctly applied 
only to someone who intends to deceive. Thus Thrasymachus is not simply accusing 
Socrates of saying one thing while meaning another; he is accusing him of trying to 
deceive those present. See G. Vlastos, “Socratic Irony,” Classical Quarterly 37 (1987): 
79-96. 


14 SocraTes/GLAUCON/ THRASYMACHUS 


I will as soon as I have some money. 

He has some already, said Glaucon. If it’s a matter of money, speak, 
Thrasymachus, for we’ll all contribute for Socrates. 

I know, he said, so that Socrates can carry on as usual. He gives no 

e answer himself, and then, when someone else does give опе, he takes up 
the argument and refutes it. 

How can someone give an answer, I said, when he doesn’t know it and 
doesn’t claim to know it, and when an eminent man forbids him to express 
the opinion he has? It’s much more appropriate for you to answer, since 

338 you say you know and can tell us. So do it as a favor to me, and don’t 
begrudge your teaching to Glaucon and the others. 

While I was saying this, Glaucon and the others begged him to speak. 
It was obvious that Thrasymachus thought he had a fine answer and that 
he wanted to earn their admiration by giving it, but he pretended that he 
wanted to indulge his love of victory by forcing me to answer. However, 

b he agreed in the end, and then said: There you have Socrates’ wisdom; 
he himself isn’t willing to teach, but he goes around learning from others 
and isn’t even grateful to them. 

When you say that I learn from others you are right, Thrasymachus, 
but when you say that I’m not grateful, that isn’t true. I show what gratitude 
I can, but since I have no money, I can give only praise. But just how 
enthusiastically I give it when someone seems to me to speak well, you'll 
know as soon as you’ve answered, for I think that you will speak well. 

c Listen, then. I say that justice is nothing other than the advantage of 
the stronger. Well, why don’t you praise me? But then you’d do anything 
to avoid having to do that. 

I must first understand you, for I don’t yet know what you mean. 
The advantage of the stronger, you say, is just. What do you mean, 
Thrasymachus? Surely you don’t mean something like this: Polydamus, 
the pancratist,'° is stronger than we аге; it is to his advantage to eat beef 
to build up his physical strength; therefore, this food is also advantageous 

4 апа just for us who are weaker than he is? 

You disgust me, Socrates. Your trick is to take hold of the argument at 
the point where you can do it the most harm. 

Not at all, but tell us more clearly what you mean. 

Don’t you know that some cities are ruled by a tyranny, some by a 
democracy, and some by an aristocracy? 

Of course. 


16. Pancration was a mixture of boxing and wrestling combined with kicking and 
strangling. Biting and gouging were forbidden, but pretty well everything else, including 
breaking and dislocating limbs, was permitted. 


воок 1 3374-3394 15 


And in each city this element is stronger, namely, the ruler? 

Certainly. 

And each makes laws to its own advantage. Democracy makes demo- 
cratic laws, tyranny makes tyrannical laws, and so on with the others. And 
they declare what they have made—what is to their own advantage—to 
be just for their subjects, and they punish anyone who goes against this 
as lawless and unjust. This, then, is what I say justice is, the same in all 
cities, the advantage of the established rule. Since the established rule is 
surely stronger, anyone who reasons correctly will conclude that the just 
is the same everywhere, namely, the advantage of the stronger. 

Now I see what you mean. Whether it’s true or not, PI try to find 
out. But you yourself have answered that the just is the advantageous, 
Thrasymachus, whereas you forbade that answer to me. True, you’ve 
added “of the stronger” to it. 

And І suppose you think that’s an insignificant addition. 

It isn’t clear yet whether it’s significant. But it is clear that we must 
investigate to see whether or not it’s true. I agree that the just is some 
kind of advantage. But you add that it’s of the stronger. I don’t know about 
that. We’ll have to look into it. 

Go ahead and look. 

We will. Tell me, don’t you also say that it is just to obey the rulers? 

I do. 

And are the rulers in all cities infallible, or are they liable to error? 

No doubt they are liable to error. 

When they undertake to make laws, therefore, they make some correctly, 
others incorrectly? 

І suppose so. 

And a law is correct if it prescribes what is to the rulers’ own advantage 
and incorrect if it prescribes what is to their disadvantage? Is that what 
you mean? 

It is. 

And whatever laws they make must be obeyed by their subjects, and 
this is justice? 

Of course. 

Then, according to your account, it is just to do not only what is to the 
advantage of the stronger, but also the opposite, what is not to their 
advantage. 

What are you saying? 

The same as you. But let’s examine it more fully. Haven’t we agreed 
that, in giving orders to their subjects, the rulers are sometimes in error 
as to what is best for themselves, and yet that it is just for their subjects 
to do whatever their rulers order? Haven’t we agreed to that much? 


339 


16 THRASYMACHUS/SOCRATES/ POLEMARCHUS/CLEITOPHON 


I think so. 

е Then you must also think that you have agreed that it is just to do what 
is disadvantageous to the rulers and those who are stronger, whenever 
they unintentionally order what is bad for themselves. But you also say 
that it is just for the others to obey the orders they give. You’re terribly 
clever, Thrasymachus, but doesn’t it necessarily follow that it is just to do 
the opposite of what you said, since the weaker are then ordered to do 
what is disadvantageous to the stronger? 

340 Ву god, Socrates, said Polemarchus, that’s quite clear. 

If you are to be his witness anyway, said Cleitophon, interrupting. 

Who needs a witness? Polemarchus replied. Thrasymachus himself 
agrees that the rulers sometimes order what is bad for themselves and that 
it is just for the others to do it. 

That, Polemarchus, is because Thrasymachus maintained that it is just 
to obey the orders of the rulers. 

He also maintained, Cleitophon, that the advantage of the stronger is 

b just. And having maintained both principles he went on to agree that the 
stronger sometimes gives orders to those who are weaker than he is—in 
other words, to his subjects—that are disadvantageous to the stronger 
himself. From these agreements it follows that what is to the advantage of 
the stronger is no more just than what is not to his advantage. 

But, Cleitophon responded, he said that the advantage of the stronger 
15 what the stronger believes to be his advantage. This is what the weaker 
must do, and this is what he maintained the just to be. 

That isn’t what he said, Polemarchus replied. 

It makes no difference, Polemarchus, I said. If Thrasymachus wants to 

с ри it that way now, lets accept it. Tell me, Thrasymachus, is this what 
you wanted to say the just is, namely, what the stronger believes to be to 
his advantage, whether it is in fact to his advantage or not? Is that what 
we are to say you mean? 

Not at all. Do you think Га call someone who is in error stronger at the 
very moment he errs? 

І did think that was what you meant when you agreed that the rulers 
aren't infallible but are liable to error. 

d That’s because you are a false witness in arguments, Socrates. When 
someone makes an error in the treatment of patients, do you call him a 
doctor in regard to that very error? Or when someone makes an error in 
accounting, do you call him an accountant in regard to that very error in 
calculation? I think that we express ourselves in words that, taken literally, 
do say that a doctor is in error, or an accountant, or a grammarian. But 

e еасһ of these, insofar as һе is what we call him, never errs, so that, 
according to the precise account (and you are a stickler for precise ac- 


BOOK! 3394-3414 17 


counts), no craftsman ever errs. It’s when his knowledge fails him that he 
makes an error, and in regard to that error he is no craftsman. No 
craftsman, expert, or ruler makes an error at the moment when he is 
ruling, even though everyone will say that a physician or a ruler makes 
errors. It’s in this loose way that you must also take the answer I gave 
earlier. But the most precise answer is this. A ruler, insofar as hc is a 
ruler, never makes errors and unerringly decrees what is best for himself, 
and this his subject must do. Thus, as I said from the first, it is just to do 
what is to the advantage of the stronger. 

All right, Thrasymachus, so you think I’m a false witness? 

You certainly are. 

And you think that I asked the questions I did in order to harm you in 
the argument? 

I know it very well, but it won’t do you any good. You’ll never be able 
to trick me, so you can’t harm me that way, and without trickery you'll 
never be able to overpower me in argument. 

I wouldn’t so much as try, Thrasymachus. But in order to prevent this 
sort of thing from happening again, define clearly whether it is the ruler 
and stronger in the ordinary sense or in the precise sense whose advantage 
you said it is just for the weaker to promote as the advantage of the 
stronger. 

I mean the ruler in the most precise sense. Now practice your harm- 
doing and false witnessing on that if you can—I ask no concessions from 
you—but you certainly won’t be able to. 

Do you think that I’m crazy enough to try to shave a lion or to bear false 
witness against Thrasymachus? 

You certainly tried just now, though you were a loser at that too. 

Enough of this. Tell me: Is a doctor in the precise sense, whom you 
mentioned before, а money-maker or someone who treats the sick? Tell 
me about the one who is really a doctor. 

He’s the one who treats the sick. 

What about a ship’s captain? Is a captain in the precise sense a ruler of 
sailors or a sailor? 

A ruler of sailors. 

We shouldn’t, I think, take into account the fact that he sails in a ship, 
and he shouldn’t be called a sailor for that reason, for it isn’t because of 
his sailing that he is called a ship’s captain, but because of his craft and 
his rule over sailors? 

That’s true. 

And is there something о to each of these, that is, to bodies 
and to sailors? 

Certainly. 


341 


еу 


а 


18 SOCRATES/ THRASYMACHUS 


And aren’t the respective crafts by nature set over them to seek and 
provide what is to their advantage? 

They are. 

And is there any advantage for each of the crafts themselves except to 
be as complete or perfect as possible? 

е What аге you asking? 

This: If you asked me whether our bodies are sufficient in themselves, 
or whether they need something else, I’d answer: “They certainly have 
needs. And because of this, because our bodies are deficient rather than 
self-sufficient, the craft of medicine has now been discovered. The craft 
of medicine was developed to provide what is advantageous for a body.” 
Do you think that I’m right in saying this or not? 

You are right. 

342 Now, is medicine deficient? Does а craft need some further virtue, as 
the eyes are in need of sight, and the ears of hearing, so that another 
craft is needed to seek and provide what is advantageous (о them?” Does 
a craft itself have some similar deficiency, so that each craft needs another, 
to seek out what is to its advantage? And does the craft that does the 
seeking need still another, and so on without end? Or does each seek out 

b what is to its own advantage by itself? Or does it need neither itself nor 
another craft to seek out what is advantageous to it, because of its own 
deficiencies? Or is it that there is no deficiency or error in any craft? That 
it isn’t appropriate for any craft to seek what is to the advantage of anything 
except that of which it is the craft? And that, since it is itself correct, it 
is without either fault or impurity, as long as it is wholly and precisely 
the craft that it is? Consider this with the preciseness of language you 
mentioned. Is it so or not? 

It appears to be so. 

с Medicine doesn’t seek its own advantage, then, but that of the body? 

Yes. 

And horse-breeding doesn’t seek its own advantage, but that of horses? 
Indeed, no other craft seeks its own advantage—for it has no further 
needs—but the advantage of that of which it is the craft? 

Apparently so. 

Now, surely, Thrasymachus, the crafts rule over and are stronger than 
the things of which they are the crafts? 

Very reluctantly, he conceded this as well. 


17. Sight is the virtue or excellence of the eyes (see 335b n. 12). Without it, the eyes 
cannot achieve what is advantageous to them, namely, sight. So eyes need some 
further virtue to seek and provide what is advantageous to them. But Socrates assumes 
throughout Book I that virtues are crafts (see 332d). Hence he can conclude that the 
eyes need a further craft to achieve what is advantageous to them. 


BOOK! 3414-3434 | 19 


No kind of knowledge seeks ог orders what is advantageous to itself, 
then, but what is advantageous to the weaker, which is subject to it. 

He tried to fight this conclusion, but he conceded it in the end. And 
after he had, I said: Surely, then, no doctor, insofar as he is a doctor, seeks 
or orders what is advantageous to himself, but what is advantageous to his 
patient? We agreed that a doctor in the precise sense is a ruler of bodies, 
not a money-maker. Wasn’t that agreed? 

Yes. 

So a ship’s captain in the precise sense is a ruler of sailors, not a sailor? 

That’s what we agreed. 

Doesn’t it follow that a ship’s captain or ruler won’t seek and order 
what is advantageous to himself, but what is advantageous to a sailor? 

He reluctantly agreed. 

So, then, Thrasymachus, no one in any position of rule, insofar as he 
is a ruler, seeks or orders what is advantageous to himself, but what is 
advantageous to his subjects; the ones of whom he is himself the craftsman. 
It is to his subjects and what is advantageous and proper to them that he 
looks, and everything he says and does he says and does for them. 

When we reached this point in the argument, and it was clear to all that 
his account of justice had turned into its opposite, instead of answering, 
Thrasymachus said: Tell me, Socrates, do you still have a wet nurse? 

What’s this? Hadn’t you better answer my questions rather than asking 
me such things? 

Because she’s letting you run around with a snotty nose, and doesn’t 
wipe it when she needs to! Why, for all she cares, you don’t even know 
about sheep and shepherds. 

Just what is it I don’t know? 

You think that shepherds and cowherds seek the good of their sheep 
and cattle, and fatten them and take care of them, looking to something 
other than their master’s good and their own. Moreover, you believe that 
rulers in cities—true rulers, that is—think about their subjects differently 
than one does about sheep, and that night and day they think of something 
besides their own advantage. You are so far from understanding about 
justice and what’s just, about injustice and what’s unjust, that you don’t 
realize that justice is really the good of another, the advantage of the 
stronger and the ruler, and harmful to the one who obeys and serves. 
Injustice is the opposite, it rules the truly simple and just, and those it 
rules do what is to the advantage of the other and stronger, and they make 
the one they serve happy, but themselves not at all. You must look at it as 
follows, my most simple Socrates: A just man always gets less than an 
unjust one. First, in their contracts with one another, you'll never find, 
when the partnership ends, that a just partner has got more than an unjust 


343 


20 THRASYMACHUS/SOCRATES 


one, but less. Second, in matters relating to the city, when taxes are to be 
paid, a just man pays more on the same property, an unjust one less, but 
when the city is giving out refunds, a just man gets nothing, while an 

e unjust one makes a large profit. Finally, when each of them holds a ruling 
position in some public office, a just person, even if he isn’t penalized in 
other ways, finds that his private affairs deteriorate because he has to 
neglect them, that he gains no advantage from the public purse because 
of his justice, and that he’s hated by his relatives and acquaintances when 
he’s unwilling to do them an unjust favor. The opposite is true of an unjust 
man in every respect. Therefore, І repeat what I said before: A person of 

344 great power outdoes everyone else.'* Consider him if you want to figure 
out how much more advantageous it is for the individual to be just rather 
than unjust. You’ll understand this most easily if you turn your thoughts 
to the most complete injustice, the one that makes the doer of injustice 
happiest and the sufferers of it, who are unwilling to do injustice, most 
wretched. This is tyranny, which through stealth or force appropriates the 
property of others, whether sacred or profane, public or private, not little 
by little, but all at once. If someone commits only one part of injustice 

b and is caught, he’s punished and greatly reproached—such partly unjust 
people are called temple-robbers,” kidnappers, housebreakers, robbers, 
and thieves when they commit these crimes. But when someone, in addi- 
tion to appropriating their possessions, kidnaps and enslaves the citizens 
as well, instead of these shameful names he is called happy and blessed, 

с not only by the citizens themselves, but by all who learn that he has done 
the whole of injustice. Those who reproach injustice do so because they 
are afraid not of doing it but of suffering it. So, Socrates, injustice, if it is 
on a large enough scale, is stronger, freer, and more masterly than justice. 
And, as I said from the first, justice is what is advantageous to the stronger, 
while injustice is to one’s own profit and advantage. 

d Having emptied this great flood of words into our ears all at once like 
a bath attendant, Thrasymachus intended to leave. But those present 
didn’t let him and made him stay to give an account of what he had said. 
I too begged him to stay, and I said to him: After hurling such a speech 
at us, Thrasymachus, do you intend to leave before adequately instructing 


18. Outdoing (p/eonektein) is an important notion in the remainder of the Republic. It 
is connected to pleonexia, which is what one succumbs to when one always wants to 
outdo everyone else by getting and having more and more. Pleonevia is, or is the cause 
of, injustice (359c), since always wanting to outdo others leads one to try to get what 
belongs to them, what isn’t one’s own. It is contrasted with doing or having one’s own, 
which is, or is the cause of, justice (434a, 441e). 


19. The temples acted as public treasuries, so that a temple robber is the equivalent 
of a present-day bank robber. 


BOOK I 343d-346a 2 


us or finding out whether you are right or not? Or do you think it a small 
matter to determine which whole way of life would make living most 
worthwhile for each of us? 

Is that what I seem to you to think? Thrasymachus said. 

Either that, or else you care nothing for us and aren’t worried about 
whether we'll live better or worse lives because of our ignorance of what 
you say you know. So show some willingness to teach it to us. It wouldn’t 
be a bad investment for you to be the benefactor of a group as large as 
ours. For my own part, PII tell you that Iam not persuaded. I don’t believe 
that injustice is more profitable than justice, not even if you give it full 
scope and put no obstacles in its way. Suppose that there is an unjust 
person, and suppose he does have the power to do injustice, whether by 
trickery or open warfare; nonetheless, he doesn’t persuade me that injus- 
tice is more profitable than justice. Perhaps someone here, besides myself, 
feels the same as I do. So come now, and persuade us that we are wrong 
to esteem justice more highly than injustice in planning our lives. 

And how am I to persuade you, if you aren’t persuaded by what I said 
just now? What more can I do? Am I to take my argument and pour it into 
your very soul? 

God forbid! Don’t do that! But, first, stick to what you’ve said, and 
then, if you change your position, do it openly and don’t deceive us. You 
see, Thrasymachus, that having defined the true doctor—to continue 
examining the things you said before—you didn’t consider it necessary 
later to keep a precise guard on the true shepherd. You think that, insofar 
as he’s a shepherd, he fattens sheep, not looking to what is best for the 
sheep but to a banquet, like a guest about to be entertained at a feast, or 
to a future sale, like a money-maker rather than a shepherd. Shepherding 
is concerned only to provide what is best for the things it is set over, and 
it is itself adequately provided with all it needs to be at its best when it 
doesn’t fall short in any way of being the craft of shepherding. That’s why 
I thought it necessary for us to agree before” that every kind of rule, 
insofar as it rules, doesn’t seek anything other than what is best for the 
things it rules and cares for, and this is true both of public and private 
kinds of rule. But do you think that those who rule cities, the true rulers, 
rule willingly? 

I don’t think it, by god, I know it. 

But, Thrasymachus, don’t you realize that in other kinds of rule no one 
wants to rule for its own sake, but they ask for pay, thinking that their 
ruling will benefit not themselves but their subjects? Tell me, doesn’t 
every craft differ from every other in having a different function? Please 


20. See 341е-342е. 


З 


346 


22 ЅОСКАТЕЅ/ THRASYMACHUS/GLAUCON 


don’t answer contrary to what you believe, so that we can соте to some 
definite conclusion. 

Yes, that’s what differentiates them. 

And each craft benefits us in its own peculiar way, different from the 
others. For example, medicine gives us health, navigation gives us safety 
while sailing, and so on with the others? 

Certainly. 

And wage-earning gives us wages, for this is its function? Or would you 
call medicine the same as navigation? Indeed, if you want to define matters 
precisely, as you proposed, even if someone who is a ship’s captain be- 
comes healthy because sailing is advantageous to his health, you wouldn’t 
for that reason call his craft medicine? 

Certainly not. 

Nor would you call wage-earning medicine, even if someone becomes 
healthy while earning wages? 

Certainly not. 

Nor would you call medicine wage-earning, even if someone earns pay 
while healing? 

No. 

We are agreed, then, that each craft brings its own peculiar benefit? 

It does. 

Then whatever benefit all craftsmen receive in common must clearly 
result from their joint practice of some additional craft that benefits each 
of them? 

So it seems. 

And we say that the additional craft in question, which benefits the 
craftsmen by earning them wages, is the craft of wage-earning? 

He reluctantly agreed. 

Then this benefit, receiving wages, doesn’t result from their own craft, 
but rather, if we’re to examine this precisely, medicine provides health, 
and wage-earning provides wages; house-building provides a house, and 
wage-earning, which accompanies it, provides a wage; and so on with the 
other crafts. Each of them does its own work and benefits the things it is 
set over. So, if wages aren’t added, is there any benefit that the craftsman 
gets from his craft? 

Apparently none. 

But he still provides a benefit when he works for nothing? 

Yes, I think he does. 

Then, it is clear now, Thrasymachus, that no craft or rule provides for 
its own advantage, but, as we’ve been saying for some time, it provides 
and orders for its subject and aims at its advantage, that of the weaker, 
not of the stronger. That’s why I said just now, Thrasymachus, that no 


BOOK I 346а-348а 23 


one willingly chooses to rule and to take other people’s troubles in hand 
and straighten them out, but each asks for wages; for anyone who intends 347 
to practice his craft well never does or orders what is best for himself — 

at least not when he orders as his craft prescribes—but what is best for 

his subject. It is because of this, it seems, that wages must be provided to 

a person if he’s to be willing to rule, whether in the form of money or 
honor or a penalty if he refuses. 

What do you mean, Socrates? said Glaucon. I know the first two kinds 
of wages, but I don’t understand what penalty you mean or how you can 
call it a wage. 

Then you don’t understand the best people’s kind of wages, the kind 
that moves the most decent to rule, when they are willing to rule at all. 
Don’t you know that the love of honor and the love of money аге despised, % 
and rightly so? 

I do. 

Therefore good people won’t be willing to rule for the sake of either 
money or honor. ‘They don’t want to be paid wages openly for ruling and 
get called hired hands, nor to take them in secret from their rule and be 
called thieves. And they won’t rule for the sake of honor, because they 
aren’t ambitious honor-lovers. So, if they’re to be willing to rule, some с 
compulsion or punishment must be brought to bear on them—perhaps 
that’s why it is thought shameful to seek to rule before one is compelled 
to. Now, the greatest punishment, if one isn’t willing to rule, is to be ruled 
by someone worse than oneself. And I think that it’s fear of this that makes 
decent people rule when they do. They approach ruling not as something 
good or something to be enjoyed, but as something necessary, since it 
can’t be entrusted to anyone better than—or even as good as—themselves. 4 
In a city of good men, if it came into being, the citizens would fight in 
order not to rule, just as they do now in order to rule. There it would be 
quite clear that anyone who is really a true ruler doesn’t by nature seek 
his own advantage but that of his subjects. And everyone, knowing this, 
would rather be benefited by others than take the trouble to benefit them. 

So I can’t at all agree with Thrasymachus that justice is the advantage 

of the stronger—but желі look further into that another time. What е 
Thrasymachus is now saying—that the life of an unjust person is better 
than that of a just one—seems to be of far greater importance. Which life 
would you choose, Glaucon? And which of our views do you consider 
truer? 

I certainly think that the life of a just person is more profitable. 

Did you hear all of the good things Thrasymachus listed a moment ago 348 
for the unjust life? 

I heard, but I wasn’t persuaded. 


24 SOCRATES/GLAUCON/ THRASYMACHUS 


Then, do you want us to persuade him, if we’re able to find a way, that 
what he says isn’t true? 

Of course I do. 

If we oppose him with a parallel speech about the blessings of the just 
life, and then he replies, and then we do, we’d have to count and measure 
the good things mentioned on each side, and we’d need a jury to decide 

b the case. But if, on the other hand, we investigate the question, as we’ve 
been doing, by seeking agreement with each other, we ourselves can be 
both jury and advocates at once. 

Certainly. 

Which approach do you prefer? I asked. 

The second. 

Come, then, Thrasymachus, I said, answer us from the beginning. You 
say that complete injustice is more profitable than complete justice? 

2 I certainly do say that, and I’ve told you why. 

Well, then, what do you say about this? Do you call one of the two a 
virtue and the other a vice? 

Of course. 

That is to say, you call justice a virtue and injustice a vice? 

That’s hardly likely, since I say that injustice is profitable and justice 
isn’t. 

Then, what exactly do you say? 

The opposite. 

That justice is a vice? 

No, just very high-minded simplicity. 

d Then do you call being unjust being low-minded? 

No, I call it good judgment. 

You consider unjust people, then, Thrasymachus, to be clever and 
good? 

Yes, those who are completely unjust, who can bring cities and whole 
communities under their power. Perhaps, you think I meant pickpockets? 
Not that such crimes aren’t also profitable, if they’re not found out, but 
they aren’t worth mentioning by comparison to what I’m talking about. 


е I’m not unaware of what you want to say. But I wonder about this: Do 
you really include injustice with virtue and wisdom, and justice with their 
opposites? 


I certainly do. 

That’s harder, and it isn’t easy now to know what to say. If you had 
declared that injustice is more profitable, but agreed that it is a vice or 
shameful, as some others do, we could have discussed the matter on the 
basis of conventional beliefs. But now, obviously, you’ll say that injustice 
is fine and strong and apply to it all the attributes we used to apply to 

349 justice, since you dare to include it with virtue and wisdom. 


BOOK 1 348а-349е 25 


You’ve divined my views exactly. 

Nonetheless, we mustn’t shrink from pursuing the argument and look- 
ing into this, just as long as I take you to be saying what you really think. 
And I believe that you aren’t joking now, Thrasymachus, but are saying 
what you believe to be the truth. 

What difference does it make to you, whether / believe it or not? It’s 
my account you’re supposed to be refuting. 

It makes no difference. But try to answer this further question: Do you 
think that a just person wants to outdo” someone else who’s just? 

Not at all, for he wouldn’t then be as polite and innocent as he is. 

Or to outdo someone who does a just action? 

No, he doesn’t even want to do that. 

And does he claim that he deserves to outdo an unjust person and 
believe that it is just for him to do so, or doesn’t he believe that? 

He’d want to outdo him, and he’d claim to deserve to do so, but he 
wouldn’t be able. 

That’s not what I asked, but whether a just person wants to outdo an 
unjust person but not a just one, thinking that this is what he deserves? 

He does. 

What about an unjust person? Does he claim that he deserves to outdo 
a just person or someone who does a just action? 

Of course he does; he thinks he deserves to outdo everyone. 

Then will an unjust person also outdo an unjust person or someone who 
does an unjust action, and will he strive to get the most he can for himself 
from everyone? 

He will. 

Then, let’s put it this way: A just person doesn’t outdo someone like 
himself but someone unlike himself, whereas an unjust person outdoes 
both like and unlike. 

Very well put. 

An unjust person is clever and good, and a just one is neither? 

That’s well put, too. 

It follows, then, that an unjust person is like clever and good people, 
while the other isn’t? 

Of course that’s so. How could he fail to be like them when he has their 
qualities, while the other isn’t like them? 

Fine. Then each of them has the qualities of the people he’s like? 

Of course. 

All right, Thrasymachus. Do you call one person musical and another 
nonmusical? 


I do. 


21. Pleon echein. See 344a n. 18. 


350 


26 SOCRATES/ THRASYMACHUS 


Which of them is clever in music, and which isn’t? 

The musical one is clever, of course, and the other isn’t. 

And the things he’s clever in, he’s good in, and the things he isn’t clever 
in, he’s bad in? 

Yes. 

Isn’t the same true of a doctor? 

It is. 

Do you think that a musician, in tuning his lyre and in tightening and 
loosening the strings, wants to outdo another musician, claiming that this 
is what he deserves?” 

I do not. 

But he does want to outdo a nonmusician? 

Necessarily. 

What about a doctor? Does he, when prescribing food and drink, want 
to outdo another doctor or someone who does the action that medicine 
prescribes? 

Certainly not. 

But he does want to outdo a nondoctor? 

Yes. 

In any branch of knowledge or ignorance, do you think that a knowledge- 
able person would intentionally try to outdo other knowledgeable people 
or say something better or different than they do, rather than doing or 
saying the very same thing as those like him? 

Well, perhaps it must be as you say. 

And what about an ignorant person? Doesn’t he want to outdo both a 
knowledgeable person and an ignorant one? 

Probably. 

A knowledgeable person is clever? 

I agree. 

And a clever one is good? 

I agree. 

Therefore, a good and clever person doesn’t want to outdo those like 
himself but those who are unlike him and his opposite. 

So it seems. 

But a bad and ignorant person wants to outdo both his like and his 
opposite. 


22. Socrates’ point may seem obscure, but what he has in mind is explained at 350a. 
All expert musicians try to get the same thing, perfect harmony, so they tighten and 
loosen their strings to exactly the same degree, namely, the one that will produce the 
right pitch. In the same way, all doctors who are masters of medicine prescribe the 
same diet for people with the same diseases, namely, the one that will best restore them 


to health. 


воок 1 349е-351Ь 27 


Apparently. 

Now, Thrasymachus, we found that an unjust person tries to outdo 
those like him and those unlike him? Didn’t you say that? 

I did. 

And that a just person won’t outdo his like but his unlike? с 

Yes. 

Then, a just person is like a clever and good one, and an unjust is like 
an ignorant and bad one. 

It looks that way. 

Moreover, we agreed that each has the qualities of the one he resembles. 

Yes, we did. 

Then, a just person has turned out to be good and clever, and an unjust 
one ignorant and bad. 

Thrasymachus agreed to all this, not easily as I’m telling it, but reluc- 
tantly, with toil, trouble, and—since it was summer—a quantity of sweat d 
that was a wonder to behold. And then I saw something Га never seen 
before—Thrasymachus blushing. But, in any case, after we’d agreed that 
justice is virtue and wisdom and that injustice is vice and ignorance, I said: 

All right, let’s take that as established. But we also said that injustice is 
powerful, or don’t you remember that, Thrasymachus? 

I remember, but I’m not satisfied with what you’re now saying. I could 
make a speech about it, but, if I did, I know that you’d accuse me of 
engaging in oratory. So either allow me to speak, or, if you want to ask е 
questions, go ahead, and ГІ say, “All right,” and nod yes and no, as one 
does to old wives’ tales. 

Don’t do that, contrary to your own opinion. 

Г] answer so as to please you, since you won’t let me make a speech. 
What else do you want? 

Nothing, by god. But if that’s what you’re going to do, go ahead and do 
it. Pll ask my questions. 

Ask ahead. 

РІ ask what I asked before, so that we may proceed with our argument 351 
about justice and injustice in an orderly fashion, for surely it was claimed 
that injustice is stronger and more powerful than justice. But, now, if 
justice is indeed wisdom and virtue, it will easily be shown to be stronger 
than injustice, since injustice is ignorance (no one could now be ignorant 
of that). However, I don’t want to state the matter so unconditionally, 
Thrasymachus, but to look into it in some such way as this. Would you ) 
say that it is unjust for a city to try to enslave other cities unjustly and to 
hold them in subjection when it has enslaved many of them? 

Of course, that’s what the best city will especially do, the one that is 
most completely unjust. 


352 


28 SOCRATES/ THRASYMACHUS 


I understand that’s your position, but the point I want to examine is 
this: Will the city that becomes stronger than another achieve this power 
without justice, or will it need the help of justice? 

If what you said a moment ago stands, and justice is cleverness or 
wisdom, it will need the help of justice, but if things are as I stated, it will 
need the help of injustice. 

Рт impressed, Thrasymachus, that you don’t merely nod yes ог no but 
give very fine answers. 

That’s because I’m trying to please you. 

You’re doing well at it, too. So please me some more by answering this 
question: Do you think that a city, an army, a band of robbers or thieves, 
or any other tribe with a common unjust purpose would be able to achieve 
it if they were unjust to each other? 

No, indeed. 

What if they weren’t unjust to one another? Would they achieve more? 

Certainly. 

Injustice, Thrasymachus, causes civil war, hatred, and fighting among 
themselves, while justice brings friendship and a sense of common pur- 
pose. Isn’t that so? 

Let it be so, in order not to disagree with you. 

You're still doing well on that front. So tell me this: If the effect of 
injustice is to produce hatred wherever it occurs, then, whenever it arises, 
whether among free men or slaves, won’t it cause them to hate one 
another, engage in civil war, and prevent them from achieving any common 
purpose? 

Certainly. 

What if it arises between two people? Won’t they be at odds, hate each 
other, and be enemies to one another and to just people? 

They will. 

Does injustice lose its power to cause dissension when it arises within 
a single individual, or will it preserve it intact? 

Let it preserve it intact. 

Apparently, then, injustice has the power, first, to make whatever it 
arises in—whether it is a city, a family, an army, or anything else— 
incapable of achieving anything as a unit, because of the civil wars and 
differences it creates, and, second, it makes that unit an enemy to itself 
and to what is in every way its opposite, namely, justice. Isn’t that so? 

Certainly. 

And even in a single individual, it has by its nature the very same effect. 
First, it makes him incapable of achieving anything, because he is in a 
state of civil war and not of one mind; second, it makes him his own 
enemy, as well as the enemy of just people. Hasn’t it that effect? 


воокі 351b-352e 29 


Yes. 

And the gods too are just? 

Let it be so. 

So an unjust person is also an enemy of the gods, Thrasymachus, while 
a just person is their friend? 

Enjoy your banquet of words! Have no fear, I won’t oppose you. That 
would make these people hate me. 

Come, then, complete the banquet for me by continuing to answer as 
you've been doing. We have shown that just people аге cleverer and more 
capable of doing things, while unjust ones aren’t even able to act together, 
for when we speak of a powerful achievement by unjust men acting 
together, what we say isn’t altogether true. They would never have been 
able to keep their hands off each other if they were completely unjust. But 
clearly there must have been some sort of justice in them that at least 
prevented them from doing injustice among themselves at the same time 
as they were doing it to others. And it was this that enabled them to achieve 
what they did. When they started doing unjust things, they were only 
halfway corrupted by their injustice (for those who are all bad and com- 
pletely unjust are completely incapable of accomplishing anything). These 
are the things I understand to hold, not the ones you first maintained. We 
must now examine, as we proposed before,” whether just people also live 
better and are happier than unjust ones. I think it’s clear already that this 
is so, but we must look into it further, since the argument concerns no 
ordinary topic but the way we ought to live. 

Go ahead and look. 

I will. Tell me, do you think there is such a thing as the function of a 
horse? 

I do. 

And would you define the function of a horse or of anything else as that 
which one can do only with it or best with it? 

I don’t understand. 

Let me put it this way: Is it possible to see with anything other than 
eyes? 

Certainly not. 

Or to hear with anything other than ears? 

No. 

Then, we are right to say that seeing and hearing are the functions of 
eyes and ears? 

Of course. 


23. See 347e. 


30 SOCRATES/ THRASYMACHUS 


What about this? Could you use a dagger or a carving knife or lots of 
353 other things in pruning a vine? 

Of course. 

But wouldn’t you do a finer job with a pruning knife designed for the 
purpose than with anything else? 

You would. 

Then shall we take pruning to be its function? 

Yes. 

Now, I think you’ll understand what I was asking earlier when I asked 
whether the function of each thing is what it alone can do or what it does 
better than anything else. 

b I understand, and І think that this is the function of each. 

All right. Does each thing to which a particular function is assigned 
also have а virtue?” Let’s go over the same ground again. We say that eyes 
have some function? 


They do. 
So there is also a virtue of eyes? 
There is. 
And ears have a function? 
Nes: 
So there is also a virtue of ears? 
There is. 
And all other things are the same, aren’t they? 
They are. 
с And could eyes perform their function well if they lacked their peculiar 


virtue and had the vice instead? 

How could they, for don’t you mean if they had blindness instead of 
sight? 

Whatever their virtue is, for Рт not now asking about that but about 
whether anything that has a function performs it well by means of its own 
peculiar virtue and badly by means of its vice? 

That’s true, it does. 

So ears, too, deprived of their own virtue, perform their function badly? 

That’s right. 

d And the same could be said about everything else? 

So it seems. 

Come, then, and let’s consider this: Is there some function of a soul 
that you couldn’t perform with anything else, for example, taking care of 
things, ruling, deliberating, and the like? Is there anything other than a 


247 осе 3330 п. 12. 


BOOK I 352e-354c 31 


soul to which you could rightly assign these, and say that they are its 
peculiar function? 

No, none of them. 

What of living? Isn’t that a function of a soul? 

It certainly is. 

And don’t we also say that there is a virtue of a soul? 

We do. 

Then, will а soul ever perform its function well, Thrasymachus, if it is е 
deprived of its own peculiar virtue, or is that impossible? 

It’s impossible. 

Doesn’t it follow, then, that a bad soul rules and takes care of things 
badly and that a good soul does all these things well? 

It does. 

Now, we agreed that justice is a soul’s virtue, and injustice its vice? 

We did. 

Then, it follows that a just soul and a just man will live well, and an 
unjust one badly. 

Apparently so, according to your argument. 

And surely anyone who lives well is blessed and happy, and anyone who 354 
doesn’t is the opposite. 

Of course. 

Therefore, a just person is happy, and an unjust one wretched. 

So be it. 

It profits no one to be wretched but to be happy. 

Of course. 

And so, Thrasymachus, injustice is never more profitable than justice. 

Let that be your banquet, Socrates, at the feast of Bendis. 

Given by you, Thrasymachus, after you became gentle and ceased to 
give me rough treatment. Yet I haven’t had a fine banquet. But that’s my 
fault not yours. I seem to have behaved like a glutton, snatching at every b 
dish that passes and tasting it before properly savoring its predecessor. 
Before finding the answer to our first inquiry about what justice is, I let 
that go and turned to investigate whether it is a kind of vice and ignorance 
or a kind of wisdom and virtue. Then an argument came up about injustice 
being more profitable than justice, and I couldn’t refrain from abandoning 
the previous one and following up on that. Hence the result of the discus- 
sion, as far as Pm concerned, is that I know nothing, for when I don’t с 
know what justice is, ГІ hardly know whether it is a kind of virtue or not, 
or whether a person who has it is happy or unhappy. 


Воок П 


Glaucon introduces a sophisticated division of goods into three classes and asks 
Socrates to which class justice belongs. Socrates places it in the highest class, 
consisting of things valued both because of themselves and because of their conse- 
quences (35 7а—358а). This conflicts with the general view that justice belongs in 
the lowest class, consisting of things harsh in themselves and valued only for their 
consequences. It is this view that Glaucon, with the help of Adeimantus, challenges 
Socrates to defeat. Не 15 to show that justice itself (justice stripped of its conse- 
quences) makes its possessor happier than injustice itself (injustice stripped of tts 
consequences), for this is what the general view dentes. Socrates does not complete 
his response to this challenge until the end of Book IX. 

The first step in his response is to shift the debate from individual justice to 
political justice. He will construct an ideal or completely good polis or city—the 
kallipolis—in theory, knowing, on the basis of the argument that concludes Book 
I, that such a city would have to be completely virtuous and so completely just 
(352d—354a). Having located justice in that city, he will then look for it in the 
soul. If the same thing is justice in both, he will feel secure that what he has 
identified in them is indeed justice (434d—43 5a). 

The construction of the ideal city proceeds in stages. Socrates first introduces a 
city of people—the first city—whose souls are ruled by their necessary appetites 
(defined at 558d—559¢). That is why they eat, drink, and have sex (372а—с), 
but neither fight for honor nor philosophize to come to know the truth. But this 
city 1s not, given human psychology, a real possibility, for unnecessary appetites 
exist in all of us by nature (571b). The introduction of the second stage in the 
construction of the kallipolis—the luxurious city—seems to be introduced to make 
this point (373a, b, а). 

The result of the introduction of unnecessary appetites 15 war, both civil and 
intercity (373d—e). To prevent this from destroying the kallipolis, soldier-police 
are needed to constrain both internal and external enemies (414b): These are the 
guardians. And like all the citizens of the kallipolis, they must specialize in their 
job, for Socrates argues that a completely good city would require all its members 
to specialize in the one craft for which they have the highest natural aptitude (see 
370a-b, 374а-с, 394е, 423с-а, 433a, 443%, 453). 


The natural assets that а good guardian needs апа the education he must have 


32 


BOOK ш 357а-357а 33 


to develop them in the best possible way are, therefore, the next topic. The almost 
exclusively “moral” focus of the discussion is at first somewhat difficult to justify 
or understand. But if one asks oneself, What sort of soldier-police would I want 
to have in the city of which I was a citizen? this focus becomes more readily 
intelligible, for who would want to live in a city whose soldier-police were unjust 
and intemperate cowards? 

The appropriate basic education for future guardians, Socrates claims, is the 
traditional one consisting of music and poetry, on the one hand, and physical 
training, on the other.’ Since education in music and poetry begins before physical 
training, its content—more specifically the kinds of stories that the future guard- 
tans should hear about gods and heroes—is his first topic (377e). His discussion 
of it continues into Book Ш. 


When I said this, І thought I had done with the discussion, but it turned 
out to have been only a prelude. Glaucon showed his characteristic courage 
on this occasion too and refused to accept Thrasymachus’ abandonment 
of the argument. Socrates, he said, do you want to seem to have persuaded 
us that it is better in every way to be just than unjust, or do you want truly 
to convince us of this? 

І want truly to convince you, І said, if I can. 

Well, then, you certainly aren’t doing what you want. Tell me, do you 
think there is a kind of good we welcome, not because we desire what 
comes from it, but because we welcome it for its own sake—joy, for 
example, and all the harmless pleasures that have no results beyond the 
joy of having them? 

Certainly, І think there are such things. 

And is there a kind of good we like for its own sake and also for the 
sake of what comes from it—knowing, for example, and seeing and being 
healthy? We welcome such things, I suppose, on both counts. 

Yes. 

And do you also see a third kind of good, such as physical training, 
medical treatment when sick, medicine itself, and the other ways of making 
money? We’d say that these are onerous but beneficial to us, and we 
wouldn’t choose them for their own sakes, but for the sake of the rewards 
and other things that come from them. 


1. “Music” or “music and poetry” and “physical training” are more transliterations 
than translations of mousiké and gymnastike, which have no English equivalents. It is 
clear from Plato’s discussion, for example, that mousike includes poetry and stories, as 
well as music proper, and that gymmnastiké includes dance and training in warfare, as well 
as what we call physical training. The aims of mousiké and gymnastiké are characterized at 
522а. For further discussion see F.A.G. Beck, Greek Education 430-350 в.с. (London: 
Methuen, 1964). 


724 


34 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


There is also this third kind. But what of it? 

Where do you put justice? 

I myself put it among the finest goods, as something to be valued by 

358 anyone who is going to be blessed with happiness, both because of itself 
and because of what comes from it. 

That isn’t most people’s opinion. They’d say that justice belongs to the 
onerous kind, and is to be practiced for the sake of the rewards and 
popularity that come from a reputation for justice, but is to be avoided 
because of itself as something burdensome. 

I know that’s the general opinion. Thrasymachus faulted justice on 
these grounds a moment ago and praised injustice, but it seems that Рт 
a slow learner. 

b Come, then, and listen to me as well, and see whether you still have 
that problem, for I think that Thrasymachus gave up before he had to, 
charmed by you as if he were a snake. But I’m not yet satisfied by the 
argument on either side. I want to know what justice and injustice are and 
what power each itself has when it’s by itself in the soul. I want to leave 
out of account their rewards and what comes from each of them. So, if 
you agree, I’ll renew the argument of Thrasymachus. First, ГІЇ state what 

с kind of thing people consider justice to be and what its origins are. Second, 
РІ argue that all who practice it do so unwillingly, as something necessary, 
not as something good. Third, ГІ argue that they have good reason to act 
as they do, for the life of an unjust person is, they say, much better than 
that of a just one. 

It isn’t, Socrates, that I believe any of that myself. I’m perplexed, indeed, 
and my ears are deafened listening to Thrasymachus and countless others. 
But Гуе yet to hear anyone defend justice in the way I want, proving that 

d itis better than injustice. I want to hear it praised by itself, and I think that 
I’m most likely to hear this from you. Therefore, Pm going to speak at 
length in praise of the unjust life, and in doing so ГЇ show you the way 
I want to hear you praising justice and denouncing injustice. But see 
whether you want me to do that or not. 

I want that most of all. Indeed, what subject could someone with any 
understanding enjoy discussing more often? 

е Excellent. Then lets discuss the first subject I mentioned—what justice 
is and what its origins are. 

They say that to do injustice is naturally good and to suffer injustice 
bad, but that the badness of suffering it so far exceeds the goodness of 
doing it that those who have done and suffered injustice and tasted both, 
but who lack the power to do it and avoid suffering it, decide that it is 

359 profitable to come to an agreement with each other neither to do injustice 
nor to suffer it. As a result, they begin to make laws and covenants, and 


BOOK ш 3574-360а 35 


what the law commands they call lawful and just. This, they say, is the 
origin and essence of justice. It is intermediate between the best and the 
worst. The best is to do injustice without paying the penalty; the worst is 
to suffer it without being able to take revenge. Justice is a mean between 
these two extremes. People value it not as a good but because they are too 
weak to do injustice with impunity. Someone who has the power to do 
this, however, and is a true man wouldn’t make an agreement with anyone 
not to do injustice in order not to suffer it. For him that would be madness. 
This is the nature of justice, according to the argument, Socrates, and 
these are its natural origins. 

We can see most clearly that those who practice justice do it unwillingly 
and because they lack the power to do injustice, if in our thoughts we 
grant to a just and an unjust person the freedom to do whatever they like. 
We can then follow both of them and see where their desires would lead. 
And we'll catch the just person red-handed travelling the same road as 
the unjust. The reason for this is the desire to outdo others and get more 
and more.’ This is what anyone’s nature naturally pursues as good, but 
nature is forced by law into the perversion of treating fairness with respect. 

The freedom I mentioned would be most easily realized if both people 
had the power they say the ancestor of Gyges of Lydia possessed. The 
story goes that he was a shepherd in the service of the ruler of Lydia. 
There was a violent thunderstorm, and an earthquake broke open the 
ground and created a chasm at the place where he was tending his sheep. 
Seeing this, he was filled with amazement and went down into it. And 
there, in addition to many other wonders of which we’re told, he saw a 
hollow bronze horse. There were windowlike openings in it, and, peeping 
in, he saw a corpse, which seemed to be of more than human size, wearing 
nothing but a gold ring on its finger. He took the ring and came out of 
the chasm. He wore the ring at the usual monthly meeting that reported 
to the king on the state of the flocks. And as he was sitting among the 
others, he happened to turn the setting of the ring towards himself to the 
inside of his hand. When he did this, he became invisible to those sitting 


е 


near him, and they went on talking as if he had gone. Не wondered at 360 


this, and, fingering the ring, he turned the setting outwards again and 
became visible. So he experimented with the ring to test whether it indeed 
had this power—and it did. If he turned the setting inward, he became 
invisible; if he turned it outward, he became visible again. When he 
realized this, he at once arranged to become one of the messengers sent 
to report to the king. And when hc arrived there, he seduced the king’s 


2. Pleonexian. See 343е п. 18. 


361 


36 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


wife, attacked the king with her help, killed him, and took over the 
kingdom. 

Let’s suppose, then, that there were two such rings, one worn by a just 
and the other by an unjust person. Now, no one, it seems, would be so 
incorruptible that he would stay on the path of justice or stay away from 
other people’s property, when he could take whatever he wanted from the 
marketplace with impunity, go into people’s houses and have sex with 
anyone he wished, kill or release from prison anyone he wished, and do 
all the other things that would make him like a god among humans. Rather 
his actions would be in no way different from those of an unjust person, 
and both would follow the same path. This, some would say, is a great 
proof that one is never just willingly but only when compelled to be. No 
one believes justice to be a good when it is kept private, since, wherever 
either person thinks he can do injustice with impunity, he does it. Indeed, 
every man believes that injustice is far more profitable to himself than 
justice. And any exponent of this argument will say he’s right, for someone 
who didn’t want to do injustice, given this sort of opportunity, and who 
didn’t touch other people’s property would be thought wretched and 
stupid by everyone aware of the situation, though, of course, they’d praise 
him in public, deceiving each other for fear of suffering injustice. So much 
for my second topic. 

As for the choice between the lives we’re discussing, we’ll be able to 
make a correct judgment about that only if we separate the most just and 
the most unjust. Otherwise we won’t be able to do it. Here’s the separation 
I have іп тіпа. We’ll subtract nothing from the injustice of an unjust 
person and nothing from the justice of a just one, but we’ll take each to 
be complete in his own way of life. First, therefore, we must suppose that 
an unjust person will act as clever craftsmen do: A first-rate captain or 
doctor, for example, knows the difference between what his craft can and 
can’t do. He attempts the first but lets the second go by, and if he happens 
to slip, he can put things right. In the same way, an unjust person’s 
successful attempts at injustice must remain undetected, if he is to be fully 
unjust. Anyone who is caught should be thought inept, for the extreme of 
injustice is to be believed to be just without being just. And our completely 
unjust pcrson must be given complete injustice; nothing may be subtracted 
from it. We must allow that, while doing the greatest injustice, he has 
nonetheless provided himself with the greatest reputation for justice. If 
he happens to make a slip, he must be able to put it right. If any of his unjust 
activities should be discovered, he.must be able to speak persuasively or 
to use force. And if force is needed, he must have the help of courage and 
strength and of the substantial wealth and friends with which he has 
provided himself. 


BOOK п 360b-362b 37 


Having hypothesized such a person, let’s now in our argument put 
beside him a just man, who is simple and noble and who, as Aeschylus 
says, doesn’t want to be believed to be good but to be во.” We must take 
away his reputation, for a reputation for justice would bring him honor с 
and rewards, so that it wouldn’t be clear whether he is just for the sake of 
justice itself or for the sake of those honors and rewards. We must strip 
him of everything except justice and make his situation the opposite of an 
unjust person’s. Though he does no injustice, he must have the greatest 
reputation for it, so that his justice may be tested full-strength and not 
diluted by wrong-doing and what comes from it. Let him stay like that 
unchanged until he dies—just, but all his life believed to be unjust. In this d 
way, both will reach the extremes, the one of justice and the other of 
injustice, and we'll be able to judge which of them is happier. 

Whew! Glaucon, І said, how vigorously you’ve scoured each of the 
men for our competition, just as you would a pair of statues for an art 
competition. 

I do the best I can, he replied. Since the two are as I’ve described, in 
any case, it shouldn’t be difficult to complete the account of the kind of 
life that awaits each of them, but it must be done. And if what I say sounds 
crude, Socrates, remember that it isn’t І who speak but those who praise е 
injustice at the expense of justice. They'll say that a just person in such 
circumstances will be whipped, stretched on a rack, chained, blinded with 
fire, and, at the end, when he has suffered every kind of evil, he’ll be 
impaled, and will realize then that one shouldn’t want to be just but to be 
believed to be just. Indeed, Aeschylus’ words are far more correctly applied 362 
to unjust people than to just ones, for the supporters of injustice will say 
that a really unjust person, having a way of life based on the truth about 
things and not living in accordance with opinion, doesn’t want simply to 
be believed to be unjust but actually to be so— 


Harvesting a deep furrow in his mind, 
Where wise counsels propagate. b 


He rules his city because of his reputation for justice; he marries into any 
family he wishes; he gives his children in marriage to anyone he wishes; 
he has contracts and partnerships with anyone he wants; and besides 
benefiting himself in all these ways, he profits because he has no scruples 
about doing injustice. In any contest, public or private, he’s the winner 


3. In Seven Against Thebes, 592-94, it is said of Amphiaraus that “he did not wish to 
be believed to be the best but to be it.” The passage continues with the words Glaucon 
quotes below at 362a-b. 


363 


38 GLAUCON/ADEIMANTUS/SOCRATES 


and outdoes* his enemies. And by outdoing them, he becomes wealthy, 
benefiting his friends and harming his enemies. He makes adequate 
sacrifices to the gods and sets up magnificent offerings to them. He takes 
better care of the gods, therefore, (and, indeed, of the human beings he’s 
fond of) than a just person does. Hence it’s likely that the gods, in turn, 
will take better care of him than of a just person. That’s what they say, 
Socrates, that gods and humans provide a better life for unjust people 
than for just ones. 

When Glaucon had said this, I had it in mind to respond, but his brother 
Adeimantus intervened: You surely don’t think that the position has been 
adequately stated? 

Why not? I said. 

The most important thing to say hasn’t been said yet. 

Well, then, I replied, a man’s brother must stand by him, as the saying 
goes.” If Glaucon has omitted something, you must help him. Yet what he 
has said is enough to throw me to the canvas and make me unable to come 
to the aid of justice. 

Nonsense, he said. Hear what more I have to say, for we should also 
fully explore the arguments that are opposed to the ones Glaucon gave, 
the ones that praise justice and find fault with injustice, so that what I take 
to be his intention may be clearer. 

When fathers speak to their sons, they say that one must be just, as do 
all the others who have charge of anyone. But they don’t praise justice 
itself, only the high reputations it leads to and the consequences of being 
thought to be just, such as the public offices, marriages, and other things 
Glaucon listed. But they elaborate even further on the consequences of 
reputation. By bringing in the esteem of the gods, they are able to talk 
about the abundant good things that they themselves and the noble Hesiod 
and Homer say that the gods give to the pious,° for Hesiod says that the 
gods make the oak trees 


Bear acorns at the top and bees in the middle 
And make fleecy sheep heavy laden with wool 


for the just, and tells of many other good things akin to these. And Homer 
is similar: 


When a good king, in his piety, 
Upholds justice, the black earth bears 


ек 


4. pleonektein. See 343е п. 18. 
5. See Homer, Odyssey 16.97-98. 


6. The two quotations which follow are from Hesiod, Works and Days 332-33, and 
Homer, Odyssey 19.109. 


BOOK II 3625-3644 39 


Wheat and barley for him, and his trees are heavy with fruit. с 
His sheep bear lambs unfailingly, and the sea yields up its fish. 


Musaeus and his son make the gods give the just more headstrong goods 
than these.’ In their stories, they lead the just to Hades, seat them on 
couches, provide them with a symposium of pious people, crown them 
with wreaths, and make them spend all their time drinking—as if they 
thought drunkenness was the finest wage of virtue. Others stretch even d 
further the wages that virtue receives from the gods, for they say that 
someone who is pious and keeps his promises leaves his children’s children 
and a whole race behind him. In these and other similar ways, they praise 
justice. They bury the impious and unjust in mud in Hades; force them 
to carry water in a sieve; bring them into bad repute while they’re still 
alive, and all those penalties that Glaucon gave to the just person they give 
to the unjust. But they have nothing else to say. This, then, is the way е 
people praise justice and find fault with injustice. 
Besides this, Socrates, consider another form of argument about justice 
and injustice employed both by private individuals and by poets. All go on 
repeating with one voice that justice and moderation are fine things, but 
hard and onerous, while licentiousness and injustice are sweet and easy 364 
to acquire and are shameful only in opinion and law. They add that unjust 
deeds are for the most part more profitable than just ones, and, whether 
in public or private, they willingly honor vicious people who have wealth 
and other types of power and declare them to be happy. But they dishonor 
and disregard the weak and the poor, even though they agree that they 
are better than the others. b 
But the most wonderful of all these arguments concerns what they have 
to say about the gods and virtue. They say that the gods, too, assign 
misfortune and a bad life to many good people, and the opposite fate to 
their opposites. Begging priests and prophets frequent the doors of the 
rich and persuade them that they possess a god-given power founded on 
sacrifices and incantations. If the rich person or any of his ancestors has с 
committed an injustice, they can fix it with pleasant rituals. Moreover, if 
he wishes to injure some enemy, then, at little expense, he’ll be able to 
harm just and unjust alike, for by means of spells and enchantments they 
can persuade the gods to serve them. And the poets are brought forward 
as witnesses to all these accounts. Some harp on the ease of vice, as 
follows: 


Vice in abundance 15 easy to get; 
The road is smooth and begins beside you, d 


7. Musaeus was a legendary poet closely associated with the mystery religion of 
Orphism. 


365 


40 ADEIMANTUS 
But the gods have put sweat between us and virtue, 


and a road that is long, rough, and steep.” Others quote Homer to bear 
witness that the gods can be influenced by humans, since he said: 


The gods themselves can be swayed by prayer, 

And with sacrifices and soothing promises, 

Incense and libations, human beings turn them from their purpose 
When someone has transgressed and sinned.’ 


And they present a noisy throng of books by Musaeus and Orpheus, 
offspring as they say of Selene and the Muses, in accordance with which 
they perform their rituals.” And they persuade not only individuals but 
whole cities that the unjust deeds of the living or the dead can be absolved 
or purified through sacrifices and pleasant games, whether those who have 
committed them are still alive, or have died. These initiations, as they call 
them, free people from punishment hereafter, while a terrible fate awaits 
those who have not performed rituals. 

When all such sayings about the attitudes of gods and humans to virtue 
and vice are so often repeated, Socrates, what effect do you suppose they 
have on the souls of young people? I mean those who are clever and are 
able to flit from one of these sayings to another, so to speak, and gather 
from them an impression of what sort of person he should be and of how 
best to travel the road of life. He would surely ask himself Pindar’s 
question, “Should I by justice or by crooked deceit scale this high wall 
and live my life guarded and secure?” And he’ll answer: “The various 
sayings suggest that there is no advantage in my being just if I’m not also 
thought just, while the troubles and penalties of being just are apparent. 
But they tell me that an unjust person, who has secured for himself a 
reputation for justice, lives the life of a god. Since, then, ‘opinion forcibly 
overcomes truth’ and ‘controls happiness,’ as the wise men say, I must 
surely turn entirely to it.'' I should create a facade of illusory virtue around 
me to deceive those who come near, but keep behind it the greedy and 
crafty fox of the wise Archilochus.””” 

“But surely,” someone will object, “it isn’t easy for vice to remain always 


8. Works and Days 287-89, with minor alterations. 
9. Iliad 9.497-501, with minor alterations. 


10. It is not clear whether Orpheus was a real person or a mythical figure. His fame 
in Greek myth rests on the poems in which the doctrines of the Orphic religion are set 
forth. These are discussed in W. Burkert, Greek Religion (Cambridge: Harvard Univer- 
sity Press, 1985). Musaeus was a mythical‘singer closely related to Orpheus. Selene is 
the Moon. 


11. The quotation is attributed to Simonides, whom Polemarchus cites in Book І. 


12. Archilochus of Paros (с. 756-16 в.с.), was an iambic and elegiac poet who com- 
posed a famous fable about the fox and the hedgehog. 


BOOK п 364d-366d 4] 


hidden.” We’ll reply that nothing great is easy. And, in any case, if we’re 
to be happy, we must follow the path indicated in these accounts. To 
remain undiscovered we’ll form secret societies and political clubs. And 
there are teachers of persuasion to make us clever in dealing with assem- 
blies and law courts. Therefore, using persuasion in one place and force 
in another, we’ll outdo others” without paying a penalty. 

“What about the gods? Surely, we can’t hide from them or use violent 
force against them!” Well, if the gods don’t exist or don’t concern them- 
selves with human affairs, why should we worry at all about hiding from 
them? If they do exist and do concern themselves with us, we’ve learned 
all we know about them from the laws and the poets who give their 
genealogies—nowhere else. But these are the very people who tell us that 
the gods can be persuaded and influenced by sacrifices, gentle prayers, 
and offerings. Hence, we should believe them on both matters or neither. 
If we believe them, we should be unjust and offer sacrifices from the fruits 
of our injustice. If we are just, our only gain is not to be punished by the 
gods, since we lose the profits of injustice. But if we are unjust, we get 
the profits of our crimes and transgressions and afterwards persuade the 
gods by prayer and escape without punishment. 

“But in Hades won’t we pay the penalty for crimes committed here, 
either ourselves or our children’s children?” “My friend,” the young man 
will say as he does his calculation, “mystery rites have great power and 
the gods have great power of absolution. The greatest cities tell us this, 
as do those children of the gods who have become poets and prophets.” 

Why, then, should we still choose justice over the greatest injustice? 
Many eminent authorities agree that, if we practice such injustice with a 
false facade, we’ll do well at the hands of gods and humans, living and 
dying as we’ve a mind to. So, given all that has been said, Socrates, how 
is it possible for anyone of any power—whether of mind, wealth, body, or 
birth—to be willing to honor justice and not laugh aloud when he hears 
it praised? Indeed, if anyone can show that what we’ve said is false and 
has adequate knowledge that justice is best, he’ll surely be full not of anger 
but of forgiveness for the unjust. He knows that, apart from someone of 
godlike character who is disgusted by injustice or one who has gained 
knowledge and avoids injustice for that reason, no one is just willingly. 
Through cowardice or old age or some other weakness, people do indeed 
object to injustice. But it’s obvious that they do so only because they lack 
the power to do injustice, for the first of them to acquire it is the first to 
do as much injustice as he can. 

And all of this has no other cause than the one that led Glaucon and 
me to say to you: “Socrates, of all of you who claim to praise justice, from 


13. Pleonektountes. See 343e n. 18. 


366 


367 


42 ADEIMANTUS/SOCRATES 


the original heroes of old whose words survive, to the men of the present 
day, not one has ever blamed injustice or praised justice except by men- 
tioning the reputations, honors, and rewards that are their consequences. 
No one has ever adequately described what each itself does of its own 
power by its presence in the soul of the person who possesses it, even if 
it remains hidden from gods and humans. No one, whether in poetry or 
in private conversations, has adequately argued that injustice is the worst 
thing a soul can have in it and that justice is the greatest good. If you had 
treated the subject in this way and persuaded us from youth, we wouldn’t 
now be guarding against one another’s injustices, but each would be his 
own best guardian, afraid that by doing injustice he’d be living with the 
worst thing possible.” 

Thrasymachus or anyone else might say what we’ve said, Socrates, or 
maybe even more, in discussing justice and injustice—crudely inverting 
their powers, in my opinion. And, frankly, it’s because I want to hear the 
opposite from you that I speak with all the force I can muster. So don’t 
merely give us a theoretical argument that justice is stronger than injustice, 
but tell us what each itself does, because of its own powers, to someone who 
possesses it, that makes injustice bad and justice good. Follow Glaucon’s 
advice, and don’t take reputations into account, for if you don’t deprive 
justice and injustice of their true reputations and attach false ones to them, 
we'll say that you are not praising them but their reputations and that 
уоште encouraging us to be unjust in secret. In that case, we’ll say that 
you agree with Thrasymachus that justice is the good of another, the 
advantage of the stronger, while injustice is one’s own advantage and 
profit, though not the advantage of the weaker. 

You agree that justice is one of the greatest goods, the ones that are 
worth getting for the sake of what comes from them, but much more so 
for their own sake, such as seeing, hearing, knowing, being healthy, and 
all other goods that are fruitful by their own nature and not simply because 
of reputation. Therefore, praise justice as a good of that kind, explaining 
how—because of its very self—it benefits its possessors and how injustice 
harms them. Leave wages and reputations for others to praise. 

Others would satisfy me if they praised justice and blamed injustice in 
that way, extolling the wages of one and denigrating those of the other. 
But you, unless you order me to be satisfied, wouldn’t, for you’ve spent 
your whole life investigating this and nothing else. Don’t, then, give us 
only a theoretical argument that justice is stronger than injustice, but show 
what effect each has because of itself on the person who has it—the опе 
for good and the other for bad—whether it remains hidden from gods 
and human beings or not. 

While Га always admired the natures of Glaucon and Adeimantus, I 


BOOK ш 366d-369a 43 


was especially pleased on this occasion, and I said: You are the sons of a 368 


great man, and Glaucon’s lover began his elegy well when he wrote, 
celebrating your achievements at the battle of Megara, 


Sons of Ariston, godlike offspring of a famous man. 


That’s well said in my opinion, for you must indeed be affected by the 
divine if you’re not convinced that injustice is better than justice and yet 
can speak on its behalf as you have done. And I believe that you really are 
unconvinced by your own words. I infer this from the way you live, for if 
I had only your words to go on, I wouldn’t trust you. The more I trust 
you, however, the more I’m at a loss as to what to do. I don’t see how I 
can be of help. Indeed, I believe I’m incapable of it. And here’s my 
evidence. I thought what I said to Thrasymachus showed that justice is 
better than injustice, but you won’t accept it from me. On the other hand, 
I don’t see how I can refuse my help, for I fear that it may even be impious 
to have breath in one’s body and the ability to speak and yet to stand idly 
by and not defend justice when it is being prosecuted. So the best course 
is to give justice any assistance I can. 

Glaucon and the others begged me not to abandon the argument but to 
help in every way to track down what justice and injustice are and what 
the truth about their benefits is. So I told them what I had in mind: The 
investigation we’re undertaking is not an easy one but requires keen eye- 
sight. Therefore, since we aren’t clever people, we should adopt the 
method of investigation that we'd use if, lacking keen eyesight, we were 
told to read small letters from a distance and then noticed that the same 
letters existed elsewhere іп a larger size and оп а larger surface. We'd con- 
sider it a godsend, I think, to be allowed to read the larger ones first and 
then to examine the smaller ones, to see whether they really are the same. 

That’s certainly true, said Adeimantus, but how is this case similar to 
our investigation of justice? 

РІ tell you. We say, don’t we, that there is the justice of a single man 
and also the justice of a whole city? 

Certainly. 

And a city is larger than a single man? 

It is larger. 

Perhaps, then, there is more justice in the larger thing, and it will be 
easier to learn what it is. So, if you’re willing, let’s first find out what sort 
of thing justice is in a city and afterwards look for it in the individual, 
observing the ways in which the smaller is similar to the larger. 

That seems fine to me. 

If we could watch a city coming to be in theory, wouldn’t we also see 
its justice coming to be, and its injustice as well? 


b 


369 


44 ADEIMANTUS/SOCRATES 


Probably so. 

And when that process is completed, we can hope to find what we are 
looking for more easily? 

b Of course. 

Do you think we should try to carry it out, then? It’s no small task, in 
my view. So think it over. 

We have already, said Adeimantus. Don’t even consider doing anything 
else. 

I think a city comes to be because none of us is self-sufficient, but we 
all need many things. Do you think that a city is founded on any other 
principle? 

No. 

And because people need many things, and because one person calls 

с опа second out of one need and on a third out of a different need, many 
people gather in a single place to live together as partners and helpers. 
And such a settlement is called a city.“ Isn’t that so? 

It is. 

And if they share things with one another, giving and taking, they do 
so because each believes that this is better for himself? 

That’s right. 

Come, then, let’s create a city in theory from its beginnings. And it’s 
our needs, it seems, that will create it. 

It is, indeed. 

d Surely our first and greatest need is to provide food to sustain life. 

Certainly. 

Our second is for shelter, and our third for clothes and such. 

That’s right. 

How, then, will a city be able to provide all this? Won’t one person have 
to be a farmer, another a builder, and another a weaver? And shouldn’t 
we add a cobbler and someone else to provide medical care? 

All right. 

So the essential minimum for a city is four or five men? 

е Apparently. 

And what about this? Must each of them contribute his own work for 
the common use of all? For example, will a farmer provide food for 
everyone, spending quadruple the time and labor to provide food to be 
shared by them all? Or will he not bother about that, producing one quarter 

370 the food in one quarter the time, and spending the other three quarters, 
one in building a house, one in the production of clothes, and one in 


14. Notice that a city (polis) is a collection of people, not a collection of buildings. 


BOOK ш 369a-370e 45 


making shoes, not troubling to associate with the others, but minding his 
own business on his own? 

Perhaps, Socrates, Adeimantus replied, the way you suggested first 
would be easier than the other. 

That certainly wouldn’t be surprising, for, even as you were speaking it 
occurred to me that, in the first place, we aren’t all born alike, but each 
of us differs somewhat in nature from the others, one being suited to one 
task, another to another. Or don’t you think so? 

I do. 

Second, does one person do a better job if he practices many crafts 
or—since he’s one person himself—if he practices one? 

If he practices one. 

It’s clear, at any rate, I think, that if one misses the right moment in 
anything, the work is spoiled. 

It is. 

That’s because the thing to be done won’t wait on the leisure of the 
doer, but the doer must of necessity pay close attention to his work rather 
than treating it as a secondary occupation. 

Yes, he must. 

The result, then, is that more plentiful and better-quality goods are 
more easily produced if each person does one thing for which he is 
naturally suited, does it at the right time, and is released from having to 
do any of the others. 

Absolutely. 

Then, Adeimantus, we’re going to need more than four citizens to 
provide the things we’ve mentioned, for a farmer won’t make his own 
plough, not if it’s to be a good one, nor his hoe, nor any of his other 
farming tools. Neither will a builder—and he, too, needs lots of things. 
And the same is true of a weaver and a cobbler, isn’t it? 

It is. 

Hence, carpenters, metal workers, and many other craftsmen of that 
sort will share our little city and make it bigger. 

That’s right. 

Yet it won’t be a huge settlement even if we add cowherds, shepherds, 
and other herdsmen in order that the farmers have cows to do their 
ploughing, the builders have oxen to share with the farmers in hauling 
their materials, and the weavers and cobblers have hides and fleeces to 
use. 

It won’t be a small one either, if it has to hold all those. 

Moreover, it’s almost impossible to establish a city in a place where 
nothing has to be imported. 

Indeed it is. 


a7 i 


46 SOcRATES/ADEIMANTUS/ GLAUCON 


So we’ll need yet further people to import from other cities whatever is 
needed. 

Yes. 

And if an importer goes empty-handed to another city, without a cargo 
of the things needed by the city from which he’s to bring back what his 
own city needs, he’ll come away empty-handed, won’t he? 

So it seems. 

Therefore our citizens must not only produce enough for themselves 
at home but also goods of the right quality and quantity to satisfy the 
requirements of others. 

They must. 

So we’ll need more farmers and other craftsmen in our city. 

Yes. 

And others to take care of imports and exports. And they’re called 
merchants, aren’t they? 

Yes. 

So we’ll need merchants, too. 

Certainly. 

And if the trade is by sea, we’ll need a good many others who know 
how to sail. 

A good many, indeed. 

And how will those in the city itself share the things that each produces? 
It was for the sake of this that we made their partnership and founded 
their city. 

Clearly, they must do it by buying and selling. 

Then we'll need a marketplace and a currency for such exchange. 

Certainly. 

Ifa farmer or any other craftsman brings some of his products to market, 
and he doesn’t arrive at the same time as those who want to exchange 
things with him, is he to sit idly in the marketplace, away from his own 
work? 

Not at all. There’ll be people who'll notice this and provide the requisite 
service—in well-organized cities they’ll usually be those whose bodies аге 
weakest and who aren’t fit to do any other work. They’ll stay around the 
market exchanging money for the goods of those who have something to 
sell and then exchanging those goods for the money of those who want 
them. 

Then, to fill this need there will have to be retailers in our city, for 
aren’t those who establish themselves in the marketplace to provide this 
service of buying and selling called retailers, while those who travel be- 
tween cities are called merchants? 

That’s right. 

There are other servants, I think, whose minds alone wouldn’t qualify 


BOOK п 370e-372e 47 


them for membership in our society but whose bodies are strong enough 
for labor. These sell the use of their strength for a price called a wage and 
hence are themselves called wage-earners. Isn’t that so? 

Certainly. 

So wage-earners complete our city? 

I think so. 

Well, Adeimantus, has our city grown to completeness, then? 

Perhaps it has. 

Then where are justice and injustice to be found in it? With which of 
the things we examined did they come in? 

I’ve no idea, Socrates, unless it was somewhere in some need that these 
people have of one another. 

You may be right, but we must look into it and not grow weary. First, 
then, let’s see what sort of life our citizens will lead when they’ve been 
provided for in the way we have been describing. They'll produce bread, 
wine, clothes, and shoes, won’t they? They'll build houses, work naked 
and barefoot in the summer, and wear adequate clothing and shoes in the 
winter. For food, they’ll knead and cook the flour and meal they've made 
from wheat and barley. They’ll put their honest cakes and loaves on reeds 
or clean leaves, and, reclining on beds strewn with yew and myrtle, they'll 
feast with their children, drink their wine, and, crowned with wreaths, 
hymn the gods. They’ll enjoy sex with one another but bear no more 
children than their resources allow, lest they fall into either poverty or 
war. 

It seems that you make your people feast without any delicacies, Glaucon 
interrupted. 

True enough, І said, I was forgetting that they'll obviously need salt, 
olives, cheese, boiled roots, and vegetables of the sort they cook in the 
country. We’ll give them desserts, too, of course, consisting of figs, 
chickpeas, and beans, and they’ll roast myrtle and acorns before the fire,” 
drinking moderately. And so they’ll live in peace and good health, and 
when they die at a ripe old age, they’ll bequeath a similar life to their 
children. 

If you were founding a city for pigs, Socrates, he replied, wouldn’t you 
fatten them on the same diet? 

Then how should I feed these people, Glaucon? I asked. 

In the conventional way. If they aren’t to suffer hardship, they should 
recline on proper couches, dine at a table, and have the delicacies and 
desserts that people have nowadays. 

All right, I understand. It isn’t merely the origin of a city that we’re 


15. It seems likely that a sexual pun is intended since myrtle (murton) and acorn (phégos) 
are common slang terms for the female and male genitalia respectively. 


е. 


SWE 


48 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


considering, it seems, but the origin of a luxurious city. And that may not 
be a bad idea, for by examining it, we might very well see how justice and 
injustice grow up in cities. Yet the true city, in my opinion, is the one we’ve 
described, the healthy one, as it were. But let’s study a city with a fever, if 

373 that’s what you want. There’s nothing to stop us. The things I mentioned 
earlier and the way of life I described won’t satisfy some people, it seems, 
but couches, tables, and other furniture will have to be added, and, of 
course, all sorts of delicacies, perfumed oils, incense, prostitutes, and past- 
ries. We mustn’t provide them only with the necessities 9 we mentioned at 
first, such as houses, clothes, and shoes, but painting and embroidery must 
be begun, and gold, ivory, and the like acquired. Isn’t that so? 

b Yes. 

Then we must enlarge our city, for the healthy one is no longer adequate. 
We must increase it in size and fill it with a multitude of things that go 
beyond what is necessary for a city—hunters, for example, and artists or 
imitators, many of whom work with shapes and colors, many with music. 
And there’ll be poets and their assistants, actors, choral dancers, contrac- 
tors, and makers of all kinds of devices, including, among other things, 
those needed for the adornment of women. And so we’ll need more 

с servants, too. Or don’t you think that we’ll need tutors, wet nurses, nannies, 
beauticians, barbers, chefs, cooks, and swineherds? We didn’t need any 
of these in our earlier city, but гелі need them in this one. And we'll also 
need many more cattle, won’t we, if the people are going to eat meat? 

Of course. 

And if we live like that, we’ll have a far greater need for doctors than 

а we did before? 

Much greater. 

And the land, I suppose, that used to be adequate to feed the population 
we had then, will cease to be adequate and become too small. What do 
you think? 

The same. 

Then we'll have to seize some of our neighbors’ land if we’re to have 
enough pasture and ploughland. And won’t our neighbors want to seize 
part of ours as well, if they too have surrendered themselves to the endless 
acquisition of money and have overstepped the limit of their necessities? 

е That’s completely inevitable, Socrates. 

Then our next step will be war, Glaucon, won’t it? 

It will. 

We won’t say yet whether the effects of war are good or bad but only 
that we’ve now found the origins of war. It comes from those same desires 


16. See 554a for an explanation. 


BOOK II 372e-374e 49 


that are most of all responsible for the bad things that happen to cities 
and the individuals in them. 

That’s right. 

Then the city must be further enlarged, and not just by a small number, 
either, but by a whole army, which will do battle with the invaders in 
defense of the city’s substantial wealth and all the other things we men- 
tioned. 

Why aren’t the citizens themselves adequate for that purpose? 

They won’t be, if the agreement you and the rest of us made when we 
were founding the city was a good one, for surely we agreed, if you 
remember, that it’s impossible for a single person to practice many crafts 
or professions well. 

That’s true. 

Well, then, don’t you think that warfare is a profession? 

Of course. 

Then should we be more concerned about cobbling than about warfare? 

Not at all. 

But we prevented a cobbler from trying to be a farmer, weaver, or 
builder at the same time and said that he must remain a cobbler in order 
to produce fine work. And each of the others, too, was to work all his life 
at a single trade for which he had a natural aptitude and keep away from 
all the others, so as not to miss the right moment to practice his own work 
well. Now, isn’t it of the greatest importance that warfare be practiced 
well? And is fighting a war so easy that a farmer or a cobbler or any other 
craftsman can be a soldier at the same time? Though no one can become 
so much as a good player of checkers or dice if he considers it only as a 
sideline and doesn’t practice it from childhood. Or can someone pick up 
a shield or any other weapon or tool of war and immediately perform 
adequately in an infantry battle or any other kind? No other tool makes 
anyone who picks it up a craftsman or champion unless he has acquired 
the requisite knowledge and has had sufficient practice. 

If tools could make anyone who picked them up an expert, they'd be 
valuable indeed. 

Then to the degree that the work of the guardians is most important, 
it requires most freedom from other things and the greatest skill and 
devotion. 

I should think so. 

And doesn’t it also require a person whose nature is suited to that way 
of life? 

Certainly. 

Then our job, it seems, is to select, if we can, the kind of nature suited 
to guard the city. 


374 


50 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


It is. 

By god, it’s no trivial task that we’ve taken on. But insofar as we are 
able, we mustn’t shrink from it. 

375 Мо, we mustn’t. 

Do you think that, when it comes to guarding, there is any difference 
between the nature of a pedigree young dog and that of a well-born youth? 

What do you mean? 

Well, each needs keen senses, speed to catch what it sees, and strength 
in case it has to fight it out with what it captures. 

They both need all these things. 

And each must be courageous if indeed he’s to fight well. 

Of course. 

And will a horse, a dog, or any other animal be courageous, if he isn’t 
spirited? Or haven’t you noticed just how invincible and unbeatable spirit 

b 15,50 that its presence makes the whole soul fearless and unconquerable? 

I have noticed that. 

The physical qualities of the guardians are clear, then. 

Yes. 

And as far as their souls are concerned, they must be spirited. 

That too. 

But if they have natures like that, Glaucon, won’t they be savage to each 
other and to the rest of the citizens? 

By god, it will be hard for them to be anything else. 

Yet surely they must be gentle to their own people and harsh to the 

c enemy. If they aren’t, they won’t wait around for others to destroy the city 
but will do it themselves first. 

That’s true. 

What are we to do, then? Where are we to find a character that is both 
gentle and high-spirited at the same time? After all, a gentle nature is the 
opposite of a spirited one. 

Apparently. 

If someone lacks either gentleness or spirit, he can’t be a good guardian. 
Yet it seems impossible to combine them. It follows that a good guardian 

d cannot exist. 

It looks like it. 

I couldn’t see a way out, but on reexamining what had gone before, I 
said: We deserve to be stuck, for we’ve lost sight of the analogy we put 
forward. 

How do you mean? А, 

We overlooked the fact that there are natures of the sort we thought 
impossible, natures in which these opposites are indeed combined. 


Where? 


BOOK ш 374e-376c 51 


You can see them in other animals, too, but especially in the one to 
which we compared the guardian, for you know, of course, that a pedigree 
dog naturally has a character of this sort—he is gentle as can be to those е 
he’s used to and knows, but the opposite to those he doesn’t know. 

I do know that. 

So the combination we want is possible after all, and our search for the 
good guardian is not contrary to nature. 

Apparently not. 

Then do you think that our future guardian, besides being spirited, 
must also be by nature philosophical?”’ 

How do you mean? І don’t understand. 376 

It’s something else you see in dogs, апа it makes you wonder at the 
animal. 

What? 

When a dog sees someone it doesn’t know, it gets angry before anything 
bad happens to it. But when it knows someone, it welcomes him, even if 
it has never received anything good from him. Haven’t you ever wondered 
at that? 

Гуе never paid any attention to it, but obviously that is the way a dog 
behaves. 

Surely this is a refined quality in its nature and one that is truly philo- 4 
sophical. 

In what way philosophical? 

Because it judges anything it sees to be either a friend or an enemy, on 
no other basis than that it knows the one and doesn’t know the other. And 
how could it be anything besides a lover of learning, if it defines what is 
its own and what is alien to it in terms of knowledge and ignorance? 

It couldn’t. 

But surely the love of learning is the same thing as philosophy or the 
love of wisdom? 

It is. 

Then, may we confidently assume in the case of a human being, too, 
that if he is to be gentle toward his own and those he knows, he must be 
a lover of learning and wisdom? c 

We may. 

Philosophy, spirit, speed, and strength must all, then, be combined in 
the nature of anyone who is to be a fine and good guardian of our city. 


17. The word philosophos is used here in its general sense to refer to intellectual 
curiosity or wanting to know things without ulterior motives. Plato is not suggesting 
(below) that pedigree dogs have the traits that he will attribute to full-blown philoso- 
phers in Books V-VII. 


Sie 


52 GLAUCON/SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


Absolutely. 

Then those are the traits a potential guardian would need at the outset. 
But how are we to bring him up and educate him? Will inquiry into that 
topic bring us any closer to the goal of our inquiry, which is to discover 
the origins of justice and injustice in a city? We want our account to be 
adequate, but we don’t want it to be any longer than necessary. 

I certainly expect, Glaucon’s brother said, that such inquiry will further 
our goal. 

Then, by god, Adeimantus, I said, we mustn’t leave it out, even if it 
turns out to be a somewhat lengthy affair. 

No, we mustn’t. 

Come, then, and just as if we had the leisure to make up stories, let’s 
describe in theory how to educate our men. 

All right. 

What will their education be? Or is it hard to find anything better than 
that which has developed over a long period—physical training for bodies 
and music and poetry for the soul?’ 

Yes, it would be hard. 

Now, we start education in music and poetry before physical training, 
don’t we? 

Of course. 

Do you include stories under music and poetry? 

I do. 

Aren’t there two kinds of story, one true and the other false? 

Yes. 

And mustn’t our men be educated in both, but first in false ones? 

I don’t understand what you mean. 

Don’t you understand that we first tell stories to children? These are 
false, on the whole, though they have some truth in them. And we tell 
them to small children before physical training begins. 

That’s true. 

And that’s what I meant by saying that we must deal with music and 
poetry before physical training. 

All right. 

You know, don’t you, that the beginning of any process is most impor- 
tant, especially for anything young and tender? It’s at that time that it is 
most malleable and takes on any pattern one wishes to impress on it. 

Exactly. 

Then shall we carelessly allow the.children to hear any old stories, told 
by just anyone, and to take beliefs into their souls that are for the most 


18. See p. 33 п. 1. 


BOOK ш 376c-378b 53 


part opposite to the ones we think they should hold when they are grown 
up? 

We certainly won't. 

Then we must first of all, it seems, supervise the storytellers. We’ll 
select their stories whenever they are fine or beautiful and reject them 
when they aren’t. And we’ll persuade nurses and mothers to tell their 
children the ones we have selected, since they will shape their children’s 
souls with stories much more than they shape their bodies by handling 
them. Many of the stories they tell now, however, must be thrown out. 

Which ones do you mean? 

We’ll first look at the major stories, and by seeing how to deal with 
them, we’ll see how to deal with the minor ones as well, for they exhibit 
the same pattern and have the same effects whether they’re famous or 
not. Don’t you think so? 

I do, but I don’t know which ones you’re calling major. 

Those that Homer, Hesiod, and other poets tell us, for surely they 
composed false stories, told them to people, and are still telling them. 

Which stories do you mean, and what fault do you find in them? 

The fault one ought to find first and foremost, especially ifthe falsehood 
isn’t well told. 

For example? 

When a story gives a bad image of what the gods and heroes are like, 
the way a painter does whose picture is not at all like the things he’s trying 
to paint. 

Үоште right to object to that. But what sort of thing in particular do 
you have in mind? 

First, telling the greatest falsehood about the most important things 
doesn’t make a fine story—I mean Hesiod telling us about how Ouranos 
behaved, how Cronos punished him for it, and how he was in turn 
punished by his own son.” But even if it were true, it should be passed 
over in silence, not told to foolish young people. And if, for some reason, 
it has to be told, only a very few people—pledged to secrecy and after 
sacrificing not just a pig but something great and scarce—should hear it, 
so that their number is kept as small as possible. 

Yes, such stories are hard to deal with. 

And they shouldn’t be told in our city, Adeimantus. Nor should a young 


19. Ouranos prevented his wife Gaia from giving birth to his children, by blocking 
them up inside her. Gaia gave a sickle to one of these children, Cronos, with which he 
castrated his father when the latter next had intercourse with her. Cronos ate the 
children he had by his wife Rheia, until, by deceiving him with a stone, she was able 
to save Zeus from suffering this fate. Zeus then overthrew his father. See Hesiod, 


Theogony 154-210, 453-506. 


378 


b 


54 SOCRATES/ADEIMANTUS 


person hear it said that in committing the worst crimes he’s doing nothing 
out of the ordinary, or that if he inflicts every kind of punishment on an 
unjust father, he’s only doing the same as the first and greatest of the 
gods. 
No, by god, I don’t think myself that these stories are fit to be told. 
Indeed, if we want the guardians of our city to think that it’s shameful 
to be easily provoked into hating one another, we mustn’t allow any stories 
c about gods warring, fighting, or plotting against one another, for they 
aren’t true. The battles of gods and giants, and all the various stories of 
the gods hating their families or friends, should neither be told nor even 
woven in embroideries. If we’re to persuade our people that no citizen has 
ever hated another and that it’s impious to do so, then that’s what should 
be told to children from the beginning by old men and women; and as 
these children grow older, poets should be compelled to tell them the same 
d sort of thing. We won’t admit stories into our city—whether allegorical or 
not—about Hera being chained by her son, nor about Hephaestus being 
hurled from heaven by his father when he tried to help his mother, who 
was being beaten, nor about the battle of the gods in Homer. The young 
can’t distinguish what is allegorical from what isn’t, and the opinions they 
absorb at that age are hard to erase and apt to become unalterable. For 
these reasons, then, we should probably take the utmost care to insure 
е Шаг the first stories they hear about virtue аге the best ones for them to 
hear. 
That’s reasonable. But if someone asked us what stories these are, what 
should we say? 
You and I, Adeimantus, aren’t poets, but we are founding a city. And 
379 it’s appropriate for the founders to know the patterns on which poets must 
base their stories and from which they mustn’t deviate. But we aren’t 
actually going to compose their poems for them. 
All right. But what precisely are the patterns for theology or stories 
about the gods? 
Something like this: Whether in epic, lyric, or tragedy, a god must 
always be represented as he is. 
Indeed, he must. 
b Now, a god is really good, isn’t he, and must be described as such? 
What else? 
And surely nothing good is harmful, is it? 
I suppose not. 
And can what isn’t harmful do harm? 
Never. Í 
Or can what does no harm do anything bad? 
No. 


BOOK п 378b-380a 39 


And can what does nothing bad be the cause of anything bad? 

How could it? 

Moreover, the good is beneficial? 

Yes. 

It is the cause of doing well? 

Yes. 

The good isn’t the cause of all things, then, but only of good ones; it 
isn’t the cause of bad ones. 

I agree entirely. c 

Therefore, since а god is good, he is not—as most people claim—the 
cause of everything that happens to human beings but of only a few things, 
for good things are fewer than bad ones in our lives. He alone is responsible 
for the good things, but we must find some other cause for the bad ones, 
not a god. 

That’s very true, and I believe it. 

Then we won’t accept from anyone the foolish mistake Homer makes 
about the gods when he says: d 


There are two urns at the threshold of Zeus, 
One filled with good fates, the other with bad ones.... 


and the person to whom he gives a mixture of these 
Sometimes meets with a bad fate, sometimes with good, 

but the one who receives his fate entirely from the second urn, 
Evil famine drives him over the divine earth. 

We won’t grant either that Zeus is for us е 
The distributor of both good and bad. 


And as to the breaking of the promised truce by Pandarus, if anyone tells 
us that it was brought about by Athena and Zeus or that Themis and Zeus 
were responsible for strife and contention among the gods, we will not 
praise him. Nor will we allow the young to hear the words of Aeschylus: 380 


A god makes mortals guilty 
When he wants utterly to destroy a house.” 


And if anyone composes a poem about the sufferings of Niobe, such as 
the one in which these lines occur, or about the house of Pelops, or the 


20. The first three quotations аге from Iliad 24. 527-532. The sources for the fourth 
and for the quotation from Aeschylus are unknown. The story of Athena urging 
Pandarus to break the truce is told in Jiad 4.73-126. 


381 


56 SOCRATES/ADEIMANTUS 


tale of Troy, or anything else of that kind, we must require him to say that 
these things are not the work of a god. Or, if they are, then poets must 
look for the kind of account of them that we are now seeking, and say that 
the actions of the gods are good and just, and that those they punish are 
benefited thereby. We won’t allow poets to say that the punished are made 
wretched and that it was a god who made them so. But we will allow them 
to say that bad people are wretched because they are in need of punishment 
and that, in paying the penalty, they are benefited by the gods. And, as for 
saying that a god, who is himself good, is the cause of bad things, we’ll 
fight that in every way, and we won’t allow anyone to say it in his own city, 
if it’s to be well governed, or anyone to hear it either—whether young or 
old, whether in verse or prose. These stories are not pious, not advanta- 
geous to us, and not consistent with one another. 

I like your law, and ГІ vote for it. 

This, then, is one of the laws or patterns concerning the gods to which 
speakers and poets must conform, namely, that a god isn’t the cause of all 
things but only of good ones. 

And it’s a fully satisfactory law. 

What about this second law? Do you think that a god is a sorcerer, able 
to appear in different forms at different times, sometimes changing himself 
from his own form into many shapes, sometimes deceiving us by making 
us think that he has done it? Or do you think he’s simple and least of all 
likely to step out of his own form? 

I can’t say offhand. 

Well, what about this? If he steps out of his own form, mustn’t he either 
change himself or be changed by something else? 

He must. 

But the best things are least liable to alteration or change, aren’t they? 
For example, isn’t the healthiest and strongest body least changed by food, 
drink, and labor, or the healthiest and strongest plant by sun, wind, and 
the like? 

Of course. 

And the most courageous and most rational soul is least disturbed or 
altered by any outside affection? 

Yes. 

And the same account is true of all artifacts, furniture, houses, and 
clothes. The ones that are good and well made are least altered by time 
or anything else that happens to them. 

That’s right. 

Whatever is in good condition, then, whether by nature or craft or both, 
admits least of being changed by anything else. 

So it seems. 


BOOK п 380а-382а 52 


Now, surely а god and what belongs to him аге іп every way in the best 
condition. 

How could they fail to be? 

Then a god would be least likely to have many shapes. 

Indeed. 

Then does he change or alter himself? 

Clearly he does, if indeed he is altered at all. 

Would he change himself into something better and more beautiful 
than himself or something worse and uglier? 

It would have to be into something worse, if he’s changed at all, for 
surely we won't say that a god is deficient in either beauty or virtue. 

Absolutely right. And do you think, Adeimantus, that anyone, whether 
god or human, would deliberately make himself worse in any way? 

No, that’s impossible. 

Is it impossible, then, for gods to want to alter themselves? Since they 
are the most beautiful and best possible, it seems that each always and 
unconditionally retains his own shape. 

That seems entirely necessary to me. 

Then let no poet tell us about Proteus or Thetis, or say that 


The gods, in the likeness of strangers from foreign lands, 
Adopt every sort of shape and visit our cities.” 


Nor must they present Hera, in their tragedies or other poems, as a 
priestess collecting alms for 


the life-giving sons of the Argive river Inachus,” 


or tell us other stories of that sort. Nor must mothers, believing bad stories 
about the gods wandering at night in the shapes of strangers from foreign 
lands, terrify their children with them. Such stories blaspheme the gods 
and, at the same time, make children more cowardly. 

They mustn’t be told. 

But though the gods are unable to change, do they nonetheless make 
us believe that they appear in all sorts of ways, deceiving us through 
sorcery? 

Perhaps. 


е 


What? Would а god be willing to be false, either іп word or deed, by 382 


presenting an illusion? 
I don’t know. 


21. Odyssey 17.485-86. 
22. Inachus was the father of lo, who was persecuted by Hera because Zeus was in 
love with her. The source for the part of the story Plato quotes is unknown. 


58 SOCRATES/ADEIMANTUS 


Don’t you know that a true falsehood, if one may call it that, is hated by 
all gods and humans? 

What do you mean? 

I mean that no one is willing to tell falsehoods to the most important 
part of himself about the most important things, but of all places he is 
most afraid to have falsehood there. 

I still don’t understand. 

That’s because you think I’m saying something deep. I simply mean 
that to be false to one’s soul about the things that are, to be ignorant and 
to have and hold falsehood there, is what everyone would least of all 
accept, for everyone hates a falsehood in that place most of all. 

That’s right. 

Surely, as I said just now, this would be most correctly called true 
falsehood—ignorance in the soul of someone who has been told a false- 
hood. Falsehood in words is a kind of imitation of this affection in the 
soul, an image of it that comes into being after it and is not a pure 
falsehood. Isn’t that so? 

Certainly. 

And the thing that is really a falsehood is hated not only by the gods 
but by human beings as well. 

It seems so to me. 

What about falsehood in words? When and to whom is it useful and so 
not deserving of hatred? Isn’t it useful against one’s enemies? And when 
any of our so-called friends are attempting, through madness or ignorance, 
to do something bad, isn’t it a useful drug for preventing them? It is also 
useful in the case of those stories we were just talking about, the ones we 
tell because we don’t know the truth about those ancient events involving 
the gods. By making a falsehood as much like the truth as we can, don’t 
we also make it useful? 

We certainly do. 

Then in which of these ways could a falsehood be useful to a god? 
Would he make false likenesses of ancient events because of his ignorance 
of them? 

It would be ridiculous to think that. 

Then there is nothing of the false poet in a god? 

Not in my view. 

Would he be false, then, through fear of his enemies? 

Far from it. 

Because of the ignorance or madness of his family or friends, then? 

No one who is ignorant or mad is a friend of the gods. 

Then there’s no reason for a god to speak falsely? 

None. 


BOOK ш 382a-383c 59 


Therefore the daimonic and the divine are in every way free from 
falsehood.” 
Completely. 
A god, then, is simple and true in word and deed. He doesn’t change 
himself or deceive others by images, words, or signs, whether in visions 
or in dreams. 
Thats what I thought as soon as I heard you say it. 383 
You agree, then, that this is our second pattern for speaking or compos- 
ing poems about the gods: They are not sorcerers who change themselves, 
nor do they mislead us by falsehoods in words or deeds. 
I agree. 
So, even though we praise many things in Homer, we won’t approve of 
the dream Zeus sent to Agamemnon, nor of Aeschylus when he makes 
Thetis say that Apollo sang in prophecy at her wedding: b 


About the good fortune my children would have, 

Free of disease throughout their long lives, 

And of all the blessings that the friendship of the gods would bring me, 
I hoped that Phoebus’ divine mouth would be free of falsehood, 
Endowed as it is with the craft of prophecy. 

But the very god who sang, the one at the feast, 

The one who said all this, he himself it 1s 

Who killed my son.*4 


Whenever anyone says such things about a god, we’ll be angry with him, 
refuse him a chorus,” and not allow his poetry to be used in the education с 
of the young, so that our guardians will be as god-fearing and godlike as 
human beings can be. 

I completely endorse these patterns, he said, and I would enact them 
as laws. 


23. Тһе daimonic (to daimonion) refers to such things as Socrates’ famous voice ог 
sign (see Apology 26b—28a, 31с8-44; Euthydemus 272e-273a; Alcibiades 1 103а; Theages 
1284-129е). In the Apology 274-е, Socrates says that daimons are gods or children of 
the gods, and in the Symposium 202e, they are described as messengers from the gods. 
24. In the Шаа 2.1-34, Zeus sends a dream to Agamemnon to promise success if he 
attacks Troy immediately. The promise is false. The source for the quotation from 
Aeschylus is unknown. 

25. I.e. deny him the funding necessary to hire a chorus of actors and produce his 


play. 


Book Ш 


Having completed his discussion of the content of stories about gods and heroes 
that the guardians should hear as part of their early training in music and poetry 
(392a), Socrates turns to the content of stories about human beings, only to 
postpone his discussion of it till Book X. He explains why this postponement is 
necessary at 392a—c. His next topic is the appropriate style for these stories to 
have and the appropriate mode and rhythm for lyric odes and songs (392c- 
4030. In the course of this discussion, he makes important remarks about all the 
arts (410b—d) and about the right sort of love between mature men and teenage 
boys (4024-403с). The latter topic may strike us as out of place, but in fact these 
sorts of relationships were conceived by Plato and his contemporaries as having 
an educational function. The discussion of physical training is next (403c—412b). 
It includes an important discussion of the sort of medical treatment that a Ба рой 
should provide (405а-410а) and а provision for the execution of incurable 
psychopaths (410a). 

The next topic is the selection of rulers or “complete guardians” from among 
the class of guardians (412b-414b). Socrates does not explain why he thinks 
there have to be rulers in the kallipolis. Perhaps, like Thrasymachus, he assumes 
that, in a world of unequal power, someone will in fact always rule. 

The final topic is the housing and life-styles of the rulers (414c-41 7b). It 
includes the so-called Myth of the Metals. 

The luxurious city (372е) has now been “purified” (399e). This purified city, 
complete with guardians and rulers, is the second stage т Plato’s account of the 
kallipolis. It contains money-loving producers and honor-loving guardians, but 
no full-blown Platonic philosophers, for the educational institutions needed to 
produce such philosophers have not yet been provided for in the city’s constitution. 


Such, then, I said, are the kinds of stories that I think future guardians 
386 should and should not hear about the gods from childhood on, if they are 
to honor the gods and their parents and not take their friendship with one 
another lightly. Қ 
Pm sure we’re right about that, at any rate. 
What if they are to be courageous as well? Shouldn’t they be told stories 


60 


BOOK ш 386a-386d 61 


that will make them least afraid of death? Or do you think that anyone 
ever becomes courageous if he’s possessed by this fear? 

No, I certainly don’t. 

And can someone be unafraid of death, preferring it to defeat in battle 
or slavery, if he believes in a Hades full of terrors? 

Not at all. 

Then we must supervise such stories and those who tell them, and ask 
them not to disparage the life in Hades in this unconditional way, but 
rather to praise it, since what they now say is neither true nor beneficial 
to future warriors. 

We must. 

Then we'll expunge all that sort of disparagement, beginning with the 
following lines: 


Г would rather labor on earth in service to another, 
To а man who is landless, with little to live on, 
Than be king over all the dead.’ 


and also these: 


He feared that his home should appear to gods and men 
Dreadful, dank, and hated even by the gods.’ 


and 


Alas, there survives in the Halls of Hades 
A soul, а mere phantasm, with its wits completely gone.’ 


and this: 
And he alone could think; the others are flitting shadows.* 
and 


The soul, leaving his limbs, made its way to Hades, 
Lamenting its fate, leaving manhood and youth behind.” 


1. Odyssey 11.489-91. Odysseus is being addressed by the dead Achilles in Hades. 

2. Шаа 20.64-65. The speaker is Hades—god of Hades or the underworld—who is 
afraid that the earth will split open and reveal that his home is dreadful, etc. 

3. Шаа 23.1034. Achilles speaks these lines as the soul of the dead Patroclus leaves 
for Hades. 

4. Odyssey 10.493-95. Circe is speaking to Odysseus about the prophet Tiresias. 

5. Шай 16.856-57. The words refer to Patroclus, who has just been mortally wounded 
by Hector. 


62. SocraTES/ADEIMANTUS 
387 and these: 


His soul went below the earth like smoke, 
Screeching as it теп... 


and 


As when bats in an awful cave 

Fly around screeching if one of them falls 

From the cluster on the ceiling, all clinging to one another, 
So their souls went screeching...’ 


We’ll ask Homer and the other poets not to be angry if we delete these 

b passages and all similar ones. It isn’t that they aren’t poetic and pleasing 
to the majority of hearers but that, the more poetic they are, the less they 
should be heard by children or by men who are supposed to be free and 
to fear slavery more than death. 

Most certainly. 

And the frightening and dreadful names for the underworld must be 
struck out, for example, “Cocytus” and “Styx,”® and also the names for 

с е dead, for example, “those below” and “the sapless ones,” and all those 
names of things in the underworld that make everyone who hears them 
shudder. They may be all well and good for other purposes, but we are 
afraid that our guardians will be made softer and more malleable by such 
shudders. 

And our fear is justified. 

Then such passages are to be struck out? 

Yes. 

And poets must follow the opposite pattern in speaking and writing? 

Clearly. 

Must we also delete the lamentations and pitiful speeches of famous 

4 men 

We must, if indeed what we said before is compelling. 

Consider though whether we are right to delete them or not. We surely 
say that a decent man doesn’t think that death is a terrible thing for 
someone decent to suffer—even for someone who happens to be his 
friend. 

We do say that. 


6. Шаа 23.100. The soul referred to is Patroclus’. 


7. Odyssey 24.6-9. The souls are those of the suitors of Penelope, whom Odysseus 
has killed. 


8. “Cocytus” means river of wailing or lamenting; “Styx” means river of hatred or 
gloom. 


воокш 387а-388с 63 


Then һе won’t mourn for him as for someone who has suffered a 
terrible fate. 

Certainly not. 

We also say that a decent person is most self-sufficient in living well 
and, above all others, has the least need of anyone else. е 

That’s true. 

Then it’s less dreadful for him than for anyone else to be deprived of 
his son, brother, possessions, or any other such things. 

Much less. 

Then he’ll least give way to lamentations and bear misfortune most 
quietly when it strikes. 

Certainly. 

We'd be right, then, to delete the lamentations of famous men, leaving 
them to women (and not even to good women, either) and to cowardly 
men, so that those we say we are training to guard our city will disdain to 388 
act like that. 

That’s right. 

Again, then, we’ll ask Homer and the other poets not to represent 
Achilles, the son of a goddess, as 


Lying now on his side, now on his back, now again 
On his belly; then standing up to wander distracted 
This way and that on the shore of the unharvested sea.’ 


Nor to make him pick up ashes in both hands and pour them over his 
head, weeping and lamenting in the ways he does іп Homer.” Nor to 4 
represent Priam, a close descendant of the gods, as entreating his men 
and 


Rolling around in dung, 


Calling upon each man by name." 


And we’ll ask them even more earnestly not to make the gods lament and 
say: 
Alas, unfortunate that I am, wretched mother of a great son.” с 


But, if they do make the gods do such things, at least they mustn’t dare 
to represent the greatest of the gods as behaving in so unlikely a fashion 
as to Say: 


9. Iliad 24.3-12. 
10. Шаа 18.23-24. 
11. Шаа 22.414-15. 
12. Шай 18.54. Thetis, the mother of Achilles, is mourning his fate among the Nereids. 


389 


64 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


Alas, with my own eyes I see a man who 1s most dear to me 
Chased around the city, and my heart laments” 


or 


Woe is me, that Sarpedon, who is most dear to me, should be 
Fated to be killed by Patroclus, the son of Menoetius .. ."* 


If our young people, Adeimantus, listen to these stories without ridiculing 
them as not worth hearing, it’s hardly likely that they’ll consider the things 
described in them to be unworthy of mere human beings like themselves 
or that they'll rebuke themselves for doing or saying similar things when 
misfortune strikes. Instead, they'll feel neither shame nor restraint but 
groan and lament at even insignificant misfortunes. 

What you say is completely true. 

Then, as the argument has demonstrated—and we must remain per- 
suaded by it until someone shows us a better one—they mustn’t behave 
like that. 

No, they mustn’t. 

Moreover, they mustn’t be lovers of laughter either, for whenever 
anyone indulges in violent laughter, a violent change of mood is likely to 
follow. 

So I believe. 

Then, if someone represents worthwhile people as overcome by laugh- 
ter, we won’t approve, and we’ll approve even less if they represent gods 
that way. 

Much less. 

Then we won’t approve of Homer saying things like this about the gods: 


And unquenchable laughter arose among the blessed gods 
As they saw Hephaestus limping through the Вай 


According to your argument, such things must be rejected. 

If you want to call it mine, but they must be rejected in any Case. 

Moreover, we have to be concerned about truth as well, for if what we 
said just now is correct, and falsehood, though of no use to the gods, is 
useful to people as a form of drug, clearly we must allow only doctors to 
use it, not private citizens. 

Clearly. 

Then if it is appropriate for anyone to use falsehoods for the good of 


13. Шаа 22.168-69. Zeus is watching Hector being pursued by Achilles. 
14. Шаа 16.433-34. 
15. Шаа 1.599-600. 


BOOK ш 388c-390a 65 


the city, because of the actions of either enemies or citizens, it is the rulers. 
But everyone else must keep away from them, because for a private citizen 
to lie to a ruler is just as bad a mistake as for a sick person or athlete not с 
to tell the truth to his doctor or trainer about his physical condition or for 
a Sailor not to tell the captain the facts about his own condition or that of 
the ship and the rest of its crew—indeed it is a worse mistake than either 
of these. 
That’s completely true. 
And if the ruler catches someone else telling falsehoods in the city— 4 


Any one of the crafismen, 
Whether a prophet, a doctor who heals the sick, or a maker of spears'® 


—he’ll punish him for introducing something as subversive and destructive 
to a city as it would be to a ship. 

He will, if practice is to follow theory. 

What about moderation? Won’t our young people also need that? 

Of course. 

And aren’t these the most important aspects of moderation for the 
majority of people, namely, to obey the rulers and to rule the pleasures of 
drink, sex, and food for themselves? е 

That’s my opinion at any rate. 

Then we’ll say that the words of Homer’s Diomedes are well put: 


Sit down in silence, my friend, and be persuaded by me.” 
and so is what follows: 


The Achaeans, breathing eagerness for battle, 
Marched in silence, fearing their commanders."* 


and all other such things. 
Those are well put. 
But what about this? 


Wine-bibber, with the eyes of a dog and the heart of a deer? 


and the rest, is it—or any other headstrong words spoken in prose or 
poetry by private citizens against their rulers—well put? 390 


16. Odyssey 17.384. 

17. Iliad 4.412. Agamemnon has unfairly rebuked Diomedes for cowardice. Diomedes’ 
squire protests, but Diomedes quiets him with these words. By obeying, the squire 
exhibits the kind of moderation that the majority of people can come to possess. 

18. Iliad 3.8 and 4.443 respectively. 

19. Iliad 1.225. Achilles is insulting his commander, Agamemnon. 


66 ADEIMANTUS/SOCRATES 


No, they aren’t. 

I don’t think they are suitable for young people to hear—not, in any 
case, with a view to making them moderate. Though it isn’t surprising 
that they are pleasing enough in other ways. What do you think? 

The same as you. 

What about making the cleverest man say that the finest thing of all is 
when 


The tables are well laden 
With bread and meat, and the winebearer 
Draws wine from the mixing bowl and pours it in the cups.” 


or 
Death by starvation is the most pitiful fate.” 


Do you think that such things make for self-control in young people? Or 
what about having Zeus, when all the other gods are asleep and he alone 
is awake, easily forget all his plans because of sexual desire and be so 
overcome by the sight of Hera that he doesn’t even want to go inside but 
wants to possess her there on the ground, saying that his desire for her is 
even greater than it was when—without their parents’ knowledge—they 
were first lovers? Or what about the chaining together of Ares and Aphrod- 
ite by Hephaestus”’—also the result of sexual passion? 

No, by god, none of that seems suitable to me. 

But if, on the other hand, there are words or deeds of famous men, who 
are exhibiting endurance in the face of everything, surely they must be 
seen or heard. For example, 


He struck his chest and spoke to his heart: 


“Endure, my heart, you've suffered more shameful things than this.” 


They certainly must. 

Now, we mustn’t allow our men to be money-lovers or to be bribable 
with gifts. 

Certainly not. 

Then the poets mustn’t sing to them: 


20. Odyssey 9.8-10. 


21. Odyssey 12.342. Eurylochus urges the men to slay the cattle of Helios in Odysseus’ 
absence. 


22. Odyssey 8.266 Е. 
23. Odyssey 20.27-28. The speaker is Odysseus. 


воок ш 390а-3914 67 
Gifis persuade gods, and gifts persuade revered kings.” 


Nor must Phoenix, the tutor of Achilles, be praised as speaking with 
moderation when he advises him to take the gifts and defend the Achaeans, 
but not to give up his anger without gifts.” Nor should we think such 
things to be worthy of Achilles himself. Nor should we agree that he was 
such a money-lover that he would accept the gifts of Agamemnon or 
release the corpse of Hector for a ransom but not otherwise.”° 20 
It certainly isn’t right to praise such things. 
It is only out of respect for Homer, indeed, that I hesitate to say that it 
is positively impious to accuse Achilles of such things or to believe others 
who say them. Or to make him address Apollo in these words: 


You ve injured me, Farshooter, most deadly of the gods; 
And Га punish you, if I had the power.” 


Or to say that he disobeyed the river—a god—and was ready to fight it,” 

or that he consecrated hair to the dead Patroclus, which was already 3) 
consecrated to a different river, Sphercheios.”’ It isn’t to be believed that 

he did any of these. Nor is it true that he dragged the dead Hector around 

the tomb of Patroclus*’ or massacred the captives on his руге. So we’ll 
deny that. Nor will we allow our people to believe that Achilles, who was с 
the son of a goddess and of Peleus (the most moderate of men and the 
grandson of Zeus) and who was brought up by the most wise Cheiron, 
was во full of inner turmoil as to have two diseases in his soul—slavishness 
accompanied by the love of money, on the one hand, and arrogance 
towards gods and humans, on the other. 

That’s right. 

We certainly won’t believe such things, nor will we allow it to be said 
that Theseus, the son of Poseidon, and Peirithous, the son of Zeus, 
engaged in terrible kidnappings,” or that any other hero and son ofa god d 
dared to do any of the terrible and impious deeds that they are now falsely 


24. The source of the passage is unknown. Cf. Euripides, Medea 964. 

25. Iliad 9.602-3. 

26. Iliad 24. 

Zila 22 15,20. 

28. Шаа 21.232 ff. 

29. Шаа 23.141-52. 

30. Шаа 24.14-18. 

31. Шаа 23.175. 

32. According to some legends, Theseus ала Peirithous abducted Helen and tried to 
abduct Persephone from Hades. 


68 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


said to have done. We’ll compel the poets either to deny that the heroes 
did such things or else to deny that they were children of the gods. They 
mustn’t say both or attempt to persuade our young people that the gods 
bring about evil or that heroes are no better than humans. As we said 

e earlier, these things are both impious and untrue, for we demonstrated 
that it is impossible for the gods to produce bad things.” 

Of course. 

Moreover, these stories are harmful to people who hear them, for 
everyone will be ready to excuse himself when he’s bad, if he is persuaded 
that similar things both are being done now and have been done in the 
past by 


Close descendants of the gods, 

Those near to Zeus, to whom belongs 

The ancestral altar high up on Mount Ida, 

In whom the blood of daimons has not weakened.” 


For that reason, we must put a stop to such stories, lest they produce in 
392 the youth a strong inclination to do bad things. 
Absolutely. 
Now, isn’t there a kind of story whose content we haven’t yet discussed? 
So far we’ve said how one should speak about gods, heroes, daimons, and 
things in Hades. 
We have. 
Then what’s left is how to deal with stories about human beings, isn’t 
it? 
Obviously. 
But we can’t settle that matter at present. 
Why not? 
Because І think we’ll say that what poets and prose-writers tell us about 
the most important matters concerning human beings is bad. They say 
b that many unjust people are happy and many just ones wretched, that 
injustice is profitable if it escapes detection, and that justice is another’s 
good but one’s own loss. I think we’ll prohibit these stories and order the 
poets to compose the opposite kind of poetry and tell the opposite kind of 
tales. Don’t you think so? 
I know so. 
But if you agree that what I said is correct, couldn’t I reply that you’ve 
agreed to the very point that is in question in our whole discussion? 
And you’d be right to make that reply. 
с Then we’ll agree about what stories should be told about human beings 


33. See 380d ff. 
34. Thought to be from Aeschylus’ lost play Niobe. 


BOOK ш 3914-393с 69 


only when we’ve discovered what sort of thing justice is and how by nature 
it profits the one who has it, whether he is believed to be just or not. 

That’s very true. 

This concludes our discussion of the content of stories. We should now, 

I think, investigate their style, for we’ll then have fully investigated both 
what should be said and how it should be said. 

I don’t understand what you mean, Adeimantus responded. 

But you must, I said. Maybe you'll understand it better if I put it this 
way. Isn’t everything said by poets and storytellers a narrative about past, 4 
present, or future events? 

What else could it be? 

And aren’t these narratives either narrative alone, or narrative through 
imitation, or both? 

I need a clearer understanding of that as well. 

I seem to be a ridiculously unclear teacher. So, like those who are 
incompetent at speaking, I won’t try to deal with the matter as a whole, 
but ГІЇ take up a part and use it as an example to make plain what I want 
to say. Tell me, do you know the beginning of the Ziad, where the е 
poet tells us that Chryses begs Agamemnon to release his daughter, that 
Agamemnon harshly rejects him, and that, having failed, Chryses prays to 
the god against the Achaeans? 393 

I do. 

You know, then, that up to the lines: 


And he begged all the Achaeans 
But especially the two sons of Atreus, the commanders of the army, 


the poet himself is speaking and doesn’t attempt to get us to think that the 
speaker is someone other than himself. After this, however, he speaks as 

if he were Chryses and tries as far as possible to make us think that the 
speaker isn’t Homer but the priest himself—an old man. And he composes b 
pretty well all the rest of his narrative about events in Troy, Ithaca, and 

the whole Odyssey in this way. 

That’s right. 

Now, the speeches he makes and the parts between them are both 
narrative? 

Of course. 

But when he makes a speech as if he were someone else, won’t we say 
that he makes his own style as much like that of the indicated speaker аѕ сг 
possible? 

We certainly will. 

Now, to make oneself liké someone else in voice or appearance is to 
imitate the person one makes oneself like. 

Certainly. 


70 SOCRATES/ АрЕІМАМТОЅ 


In these passages, then, it seems that he and the other poets effect their 
narrative through imitation. 

That’s right. 

d If the poet never hid himself, the whole of his poem would be narrative 
without imitation. In order to prevent you from saying again that you don’t 
understand, ГІ show you what this would be like. If Homer said that 
Chryses came with a ransom for his daughter to supplicate the Achaeans, 
especially the kings, and after that didn’t speak as if he had become 
Chryses, but still as Homer, there would be no imitation but rather simple 
narrative. It would have gone something like 115—111 speak without meter 
since I’m no poet: “And the priest came and prayed that the gods would 

e allow them to capture Troy and be safe afterwards, that they’d accept the 
ransom and free his daughter, and thus show reverence for the god. When 
he’d said this, the others showed their respect for the priest and consented. 
But Agamemnon was angry and ordered him to leave and never to return, 
lest his priestly wand and the wreaths of the god should fail to protect 
him. He said that, before freeing the daughter, he’d grow old in Argos by 
her side. He told Chryses to go away and not to make him angry, if he 

394 wanted to get home safely. When the old man heard this, he was frightened 
and went off in silence. But when he’d left the camp he prayed at length 
to Apollo, calling him by his various titles and reminding him of his own 
services to him. If any of those services had been found pleasing, whether 
it was the building of temples or the sacrifice of victims, he asked in return 
that the arrows of the god should make the Achaeans pay for his tears.” 

b ‘That is the way we get simple narrative without imitation. 

I understand. 

Then also understand that the opposite occurs when one omits the 
words between the speeches and leaves the speeches by themselves. 

I understand that too. Tragedies are like that. 

c That’s absolutely right. And now I think that I сап make clear to you 
what I couldn’t before. One kind of poetry and story-telling employs only 
imitation—tragedy and comedy, as you say. Another kind employs only 
narration by the poet himself—you find this most of all in dithyrambs.* 
A third kind uses both—as in epic poetry and many other places, if you 
follow me. 

Now I understand what you were trying to say. 

Remember, too, that before all that we said that we had dealt with what 
must be said in stories, but that we had yet to investigate how it must be 
said. 4 

Yes, І remember. 


35. Choral songs to the god Dionysus. 


BOOK ш 393c-395c 71 


Well, this, more precisely, is what І meant: We need to come to an 
agreement about whether we’ll allow poets to narrate through imitation, 
and, if so, whether they are to imitate some things but not others—and 
what things these are, or whether they are not to imitate at all. 

I divine that you’re looking into the question of whether or not we’ll 
allow tragedy and comedy into our city. 

Perhaps, and perhaps even more than that, for I myself really don’t 
know yet, but whatever direction the argument blows us, that’s where we 
must go. 

Fine. 

Then, consider, Adeimantus, whether our guardians should be imitators 
or not. Or does this also follow from our earlier statement that each 
individual would do a fine job of one occupation, not of many, and that if 
he tried the latter and dabbled in many things, he’d surely fail to achieve 
distinction in any of them? 

He would indeed. 

Then, doesn’t the same argument also hold for imitation—a single 
individual can’t imitate many things as well as he can imitate one? 

No, he can’t. 

Then, he’ll hardly be able to pursue any worthwhile way of life while 
at the same time imitating many things and being an imitator. Even in the 
case of two kinds of imitation that are thought to be closely akin, such as 
tragedy and comedy, the same people aren’t able to do both of them well. 
Did you not just say that these were both imitations? 

I did, and you’re quite right that the same people can’t do both. 

Nor can they be both rhapsodes and actors. 

True. 

Indeed, not even the same actors are used for tragedy and comedy. Yet 
all these are imitations, aren’t they? 

They are. 

And human nature, Adeimantus, seems to me to be minted in even 
smaller coins than these, so that it can neither imitate many things well 
nor do the actions themselves, of which those imitations are likenesses. 

That’s absolutely true. 

Then, if we’re to preserve our first argument, that our guardians must 
be kept away from all other crafts so as to be the craftsmen of the 
city’s freedom, and be exclusively that, and do nothing at all except what 
contributes to it, they must neither do nor imitate anything else. If they 
do imitate, they must imitate from childhood what is appropriate for them, 
namely, people who are courageous, self-controlled, pious, and free, and 
their actions. They mustn’t be clever at doing or imitating slavish or 
shameful actions, lest from enjoying the imitation, they come to enjoy the 


295 


396 


72 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


reality. Or haven’t you noticed that imitations practiced from youth become 
part of nature and settle into habits of gesture, voice, and thought? 

I have indeed. 

Then we won’t allow those for whom we profess to care, and who must 
grow into good men, to imitate either a young woman or an older one, or 
one abusing her husband, quarreling with the gods, or bragging because 
she thinks herself happy, or one suffering misfortune and possessed by 
sorrows and lamentations, and even less one who is ill, in love, or in labor. 

That’s absolutely right. 

Nor must they imitate either male or female slaves doing slavish things. 

No, they mustn’t. 

Nor bad men, it seems, who are cowards and are doing the opposite of 
what we described earlier, namely, libelling and ridiculing each other, 
using shameful language while drunk or sober, or wronging themselves 
and others, whether in word or deed, in the various other ways that 
are typical of such people. They mustn’t become accustomed to making 
themselves like madmen in either word or deed, for, though they must 
know about mad and vicious men and women, they must neither do nor 
imitate anything they do. 

That’s absolutely true. 

Should they imitate metal workers or other craftsmen, or those who 
row in triremes, or their time-keepers, or anything else connected with 
ships? 

How could they, since they aren’t to concern themselves with any of 
those occupations? 

And what about this? Will they imitate neighing horses, bellowing bulls, 
roaring rivers, the crashing sea, thunder, or anything of that sort? 

They are forbidden to be mad or to imitate mad people. 

If I understand what you mean, there is one kind of style and narrative 
that someone who is really a gentleman would use whenever he wanted 
to narrate something, and another kind, unlike this one, which his opposite 
by nature and education would favor, and in which he would narrate. 

Which styles are those? 

Well, I think that when a moderate man comes upon the words or 
actions of a good man in his narrative, he’ll be willing to report them as 
if he were that man himself, and he won’t be ashamed of that kind of 
imitation. He’ll imitate this good man most when he’s acting in a faultless 
and intelligent manner, but he’ll do so less, and with more reluctance, 
when the good man is upset by disease, sexual passion, drunkenness, or 
some other misfortune. When he comes upon a character unworthy of 
himself, however, he’ll be unwilling to make himself seriously resemble 
that inferior character—except perhaps for a brief period in which he’s 
doing something good. Rather he’ll be ashamed to do something like that, 


воокш 3954-397е 73 


both because he’s unpracticed in the imitation of such people and because 
he can’t stand to shape and mould himself according to a worse pattern. 
He despises this in his mind, unless it’s just done in play. 

That seems likely. 

He’ll therefore use the kind of narrative we described in dealing with 
the Homeric epics a moment ago. His style will participate both in imitation 
and in the other kind of narrative, but there’ll be only a little bit of imitation 
in a long story? Or is there nothing in what I say? 

That’s precisely how the pattern for such a speaker must be. 

As for someone who is not of this sort, the more inferior he is, the more 
willing he’ll be to narrate anything and to consider nothing unworthy of 
himself. As a result, he’ll undertake to imitate seriously and before a large 
audience all the things we just mentioned—thunder, the sounds of wind, 
hail, axles, pulleys, trumpets, flutes, pipes, and all the other instruments, 
even the cries of dogs, sheep, and birds. And this man’s style will consist 
entirely of imitation in voice and gesture, or else include only a small bit 
of plain narrative. 

That too is certain. 

These, then, are the two kinds of style I was talking about. 

There are these two. 

The first of these styles involves little variation, so that if someone 
provides a musical mode and rhythm appropriate to it, won’t the one who 
speaks correctly remain—with a few minor changes—pretty well within 
that mode and rhythm throughout? 

That’s precisely what he’ll do. 

What about the other kind of style? Doesn’t it require the opposite if it 
is to speak appropriately, namely, all kinds of musical modes and all kinds 
of rhythms, because it contains every type of variation? 

That’s exactly right. 

Do all poets and speakers adopt one or other of these patterns of style 
or a mixture of both? 

Necessarily. 

What are we to do, then? Shall we admit all these into our city, only 
one of the pure kinds, or the mixed one? 

If my opinion is to prevail, we’ll admit only the pure imitator of a decent 
person. 

And yet, Adeimantus, the mixed style is pleasant. Indeed, it is by far 
the most pleasing to children, their tutors, and the vast majority of people. 

Yes, it is the most pleasing. 

But perhaps you don’t think that it harmonizes with our constitution, 
because no one in our city is two or more people simultaneously, since 
each does only one job. 

Indeed, it doesn’t harmonize. 


397 


398 


74 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS/ GLAUCON 


And isn’t it because of this that it’s only in our city that we’ll find a 
cobbler who is a cobbler and not also a captain along with his cobbling, 
and a farmer who is a farmer and not also a juror along with his farming, 
and a soldier who is a soldier and not a money-maker in addition to his 
soldiering, and so with them all? 

That’s true. 

It seems, then, that if a man, who through clever training can become 
anything and imitate anything, should arrive in our city, wanting to give a 
performance of his poems, we should bow down before him as someone 
holy, wonderful, and pleasing, but we should tell him that there is no one 
like him in our city and that it isn’t lawful for there to be. We should pour 
myrrh on his head, crown him with wreaths, and send him away to another 
city. But, for our own good, we ourselves should employ a more austere 
and less pleasure-giving poet and storyteller, one who would imitate the 
speech of a decent person and who would tell his stories in accordance 
with the patterns we laid down when we first undertook the education of 
our soldiers. 

That is certainly what we’d do if it were up to us. 

It’s likely, then, that we have now completed our discussion of the part 
of music and poetry that concerns speech and stories, for we’ve spoken 
both of what is to be said and of how it is to be said. 

I agree. 

Doesn’t it remain, then, to discuss lyric odes and songs? 

Clearly. 

And couldn’t anyone discover what we would say about them, given 
that it has to be in tune with what we’ve already said? 

Glaucon laughed and said: I’m afraid, Socrates, that Pm not to be 
included under “anyone,” for І don’t have a good enough idea at the 
moment of what we’re to say. Of course, I have my suspicions. 

Nonetheless, I said, you know that, in the first place, a song consists of 
three elements—words, harmonic mode, and rhythm. 

Yes, I do know that. 

As far as words are concerned, they are no different in songs than they 
are when not set to music, so mustn’t they conform in the same way to 
the patterns we established just now? 

They must. 

Further, the mode and rhythm must fit the words. 

Of course. 

And we said that we no longer needed dirges and lamentations among 
our words. 

We did, indeed. 

What are the lamenting modes, then? You tell me, since you’re musical. 


BOOK ш 397e-399d 75 


The mixo-Lydian, the syntono-Lydian, and some others of that sort. 

Aren't they to be excluded, then? They’ re useless even to decent women, 
let alone to men. 

Certainly. 

Drunkenness, softness, and idleness are also most inappropriate for our 
guardians. 

How could they not be? 

What, then, are the soft modes suitable for drinking-parties? 

The Ionian and those Lydian modes that are said to be relaxed. 

Could you ever use these to make people warriors? 399 

Never. And now all you have left is the Dorian and Phrygian modes. 

I don’t know all the musical modes. Just leave me the mode that would 
suitably imitate the tone and rhythm of a courageous person who is active 
in battle or doing other violent deeds, or who is failing and facing wounds, 
death, or some other misfortune, and who, in all these circumstances, is % 
fighting off his fate steadily and with self-control. Leave me also another 
mode, that of someone engaged in a peaceful, unforced, voluntary action, 
persuading someone or asking a favor of a god in prayer or of a human 
being through teaching and exhortation, or, on the other hand, of someone 
submitting to the supplications of another who is teaching him and trying 
to get him to change his mind, and who, in all these circumstances, is 
acting with moderation and self-control, not with arrogance but with 
understanding, and is content with the outcome. Leave me, then, these с 
two modes, which will best imitate the violent or voluntary tones of voice 
of those who are moderate and courageous, whether in good fortune or 
in bad. 

The modes you’re asking for are the very ones I mentioned. 

Well, then, we’ll have no need for polyharmonic or multistringed instru- 
ments to accompany our odes and songs. 

It doesn’t seem so to me at least. 

Then we won’t need the craftsmen who make triangular lutes, harps, 
and all other such multistringed and polyharmonic instruments. d 

Apparently not. 

What about flute-makers and flute-players? Will you allow them into 
the city? Or isn’t the flute the most “many-stringed” of all? And aren’t the 
panharmonic instruments all imitations of it?” 

Clearly. 


36. The instrument being discussed is the aulos, which unlike the modern flute was а 
reed instrument, like an oboe. The description of it as “many-stringed” seems to refer 
only to the number of different notes which the aulos was capable of producing. The 
aulos was thought to be especially good at conveying emotion. 


400 


76 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


The lyre and the cithara are left, then, as useful in the city, while in the 
country, there’d be some sort of pipe for the shepherds to play. 

That is what our argument shows, at least. 

Well, we certainly aren’t doing anything new in preferring Apollo and 
his instruments to Marsyas and his.” 

By god, it doesn’t seem as though we are. 

And, by the йор, without being aware of it, we’ve been purifying the 
city we recently said was luxurious. 

That’s because we’re being moderate. 

Then let’s purify the rest. The next topic after musical modes is the 
regulation of meter. We shouldn’t strive to have either subtlety or great 
variety in meter. Rather, we should try to discover what are the rhythms 
of someone who leads an ordered and courageous life and then adapt the 
meter and the tune to his words, not his words to them. What these 
rhythms actually are is for you to say, just as in the case of the modes. 

I really don’t know what to say. I can tell you from observation that 
there are three basic kinds of metrical feet out of which the others are 
constructed, just as there are four in the case of modes. But I can’t tell 
you which sort imitates which sort of life.” 

Then we’ll consult with Оатоп“ as to which metrical feet are suited 
to slavishness, insolence, madness, and the other vices and which are 
suited to their opposites. I think I’ve heard him talking about an епоріоп,“ 
which is a composite metrical phrase (although I’m not clear on this), and 
also about dactylic or heroic meter, which he arranged, I don’t know how, 
to be equal up and down in the interchange of long and short. I think he 
called one foot an iambus, another a trochee, assigning a long and a short 
to both of them. In the case of some of these, I think he approved or 
disapproved of the tempo of the foot as much as of the rhythm itself, or 
of some combination of the two—I can’t tell you which. But, as I said, 


37. After Athena had invented the flute, she discarded it because it distorted her 
features to play it. It was picked up by the satyr Marsyas, who was foolish enough to 
challenge Apollo (inventor of the lyre) to a musical contest. He was defeated, and 
Apollo flayed him alive. Satyrs were bestial in their behavior and desires—especially 
their sexual desires. 


38. Socrates swears “by the dog” at 592a and “by the dog, the god of the Egyptians” 
at Gorgias 428b. 

39. The three kinds are probably those in which the foot is divided in the ratio of (1) 
2/2, e.g. the dactyl (-/< ~) and the spondee (-/-), (2) 3/2, e.g. the paeon (~ ~ </ е), 
and (3) 1/2 or 2/1, e.g. the iambus (У /—) and the trochee (—/~). 

40. Damon was an important fifth-century writer on music and meter. He is referred 
то at Laches 1974-200с. 


41. The епорШоп (or battle meter) is “-, »»—, ““-. 


BOOK ш 3994-401с 7/7) 


we'll leave these things to Damon, since to mark off the different kinds 
would require a long argument. Or do you think we should try it? 

No, І certainly don’t. 

But you can discern, can’t you, that grace and gracelessness follow good 
and bad rhythm respectively? 

Of course. 

Further, if, as we said just now, rhythm and mode must conform to the 
words and not vice versa, then good rhythm follows fine words and is 
similar to them, while bad rhythm follows the opposite kind of words, and 
the same for harmony and disharmony. 

To be sure, these things must conform to the words. 

What about the style and content of the words themselves? Don’t they 
conform to the character of the speaker’s soul? 

Of course. 

And the rest conform to the words? 

Yes. 

Then fine words, harmony, grace, and rhythm follow simplicity of 
character—and I do not mean this in the sense in which we use “simplicity” 
as a euphemism for “simple-mindedness”—but I mean the sort of fine 
and good character that has developed in accordance with an intelligent 
plan. 

That’s absolutely certain. 

And must not our young people everywhere aim at these, if they are to 
do their own work? 

They must, indeed. 

Now, surely painting is full of these qualities, as are all the crafts similar 
to it; weaving is full of them, and so are embroidery, architecture, and the 
crafts that produce all the other furnishings. Our bodily nature is full of 
them, as are the natures of all growing things, for in all of these there is 
grace and gracelessness. And gracelessness, bad rhythm, and disharmony 
are akin to bad words and bad character, while their opposites are akin to 
and are imitations of the opposite, a moderate and good character. 

Absolutely. 

Is it, then, only poets we have to supervise, compelling them to make 
an image of a good character in their poems or else not to compose them 
among us? Or are we also to give orders to other craftsmen, forbidding 
them to represent—whether in pictures, buildings, or any other works— 
a character that is vicious, unrestrained, slavish, and graceless? Are we to 
allow someone who cannot follow these instructions to work among us, so 
that our guardians will be brought up on images of evil, as if in a meadow 
of bad grass, where they crop and graze in many different places every 
day until, little by little, they unwittingly accumulate a large evil in their 


401 


78 SOcRATES/GLAUCON 


souls? Or must we rather seek out craftsmen who are by nature able to 
pursue what is fine and graceful in their work, so that our young people 
will live in a healthy place and be benefited on all sides, and so that 
something of those fine works will strike their eyes and ears like a breeze 
that brings health from a good place, leading them unwittingly, from 

а childhood on, to resemblance, friendship, and harmony with the beauty 
of reason? 

The latter would be by far the best education for them. 

Aren’t these the reasons, Glaucon, that education in music and poetry 
is most important? First, because rhythm and harmony permeate the inner 
part of the soul more than anything else, affecting it most strongly and 
bringing it grace, so that if someone is properly educated in music and 
poetry, it makes him graceful, but if not, then the opposite. Second, 

e because anyone who has been properly educated in music and poetry will 
sense it acutely when something has been omitted from a thing and when 
it hasn’t been finely crafted or finely made by nature. And since he has 
the right distastes, he’ll praise fine things, be pleased by them, receive 
them into his soul, and, being nurtured by them, become fine and good. 

402 He'll rightly object to what is shameful, hating it while he’s still young and 
unable to grasp the reason, but, having been educated in this way, he will 
welcome the reason when it comes and recognize it easily because of its 
kinship with himself. 

Yes, I agree that those are the reasons to provide education in music 
and poetry. 

It’s just the way it was with learning how to read. Our ability wasn’t 
adequate until we realized that there are only a few letters that occur in 

b all sorts of different combinations, and that—whether written large or 
small”—they were worthy of our attention, so that we picked them out 
eagerly wherever they occurred, knowing that we wouldn’t be competent 
readers until we knew our letters. 

True. 

And isn’t it also true that if there are images of letters reflected іп 
mirrors or water, we won’t know them until we know the letters themselves, 
for both abilities are parts of the same craft and discipline? 

Absolutely. 

с Then, by the gods, am I not right іп saying that neither we, nor the 
guardians we are raising, will be educated in music and poetry until 
we know the different forms of moderation, courage, frankness, high- 
mindedness, and all their kindred, and their opposites too, which are 
moving around everywhere, and see them in the things in which they are, 
both themselves and their images, and do not disregard them, whether 


42. See 368с-а, 


BOOK ш 401с-403Ь 79 


they are written оп small things or large, but accept that the knowledge 
of both large and small letters is part of the same craft and discipline? 

That’s absolutely essential. 

Therefore, if someone’s soul has a fine and beautiful character and his 
body matches it in beauty and is thus in harmony with it, so that both 4 
share in the same pattern, wouldn’t that be the most beautiful sight for 
anyone who has eyes to see? 

It certainly would. 

And isn’t what is most beautiful also most loveable? 

Of course. 

And a musical person would love such people most of all, but he 
wouldn’t love anyone who lacked harmony? 

No, he wouldn’t, at least not if the defect was in the soul, but if it was 
only in the body, he’d put up with it and be willing to embrace the boy 
who had it.” е 

I gather that you love ог have loved such а boy yourself, and I agree 
with you. Tell me this, however: Is excessive pleasure compatible with 
moderation? 

How can it be, since it drives one mad just as much as pain does? 

What about with the rest of virtue? 

No. 403 

Well, then, is it compatible with violence and licentiousness? 

Very much so. 

Can you think of a greater or keener pleasure than sexual pleasure? 

I can’t—or а madder one either. 

But the right kind of love is by nature the love of order and beauty that 
has been moderated by education in music and poetry? 

That’s right. 

Therefore, the right kind of love has nothing mad or licentious about 
it? 

No, it hasn’t. 

Then sexual pleasure mustn’t come into it, and the lover and the boy 
he loves must have no share in it, if they are to love and be loved inthe 2? 
right way? 

By god, no, Socrates, it mustn’t come into it. 

It seems, then, that you’ll lay it down as a law in the city we’re establishing 
that if a lover can persuade a boy to let him, then he may kiss him, be with 
him, and touch him, as a father would a son, for the sake of what is fine 
and beautiful, but—turning to the other things—his association with the 


43. The best discussion of the kind of erotic relationships between an older man and 
a younger boy to which Plato is referring here is K.J. Dover, Greek Homosexuality 
(Cambridge: Harvard University Press, 1978). 


80 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


с опе he cares about must never seem to go any further than this, otherwise 
he will be reproached as untrained in music and poetry and lacking in 
appreciation for what is fine and beautiful. 

That’s right. 

Does it seem to you that we’ve now completed our account of education 
in music and poetry? Anyway, it has ended where it ought to end, for it 
ought to end in the love of the fine and beautiful. 

I agree. 

After music and poetry, our young people must be given physical 
training. 

Of course. 

In this, too, they must have careful education from childhood through- 

4 ош life. The matter stands, I believe, something like this—but you, too, 
should look into it. It seems to me that a fit body doesn’t by its own virtue 
make the soul good, but instead that the opposite is true—a good soul by 
its own virtue makes the body as good as possible. How does it seem to 
you? 

The same. 

Then, if we have devoted sufficient care to the mind, wouldn’t we be 
right, in order to avoid having to do too much talking, to entrust it with 
the detailed supervision of the body, while we indicate only the general 

e patterns to be followed? 

Certainly. 

We said that our prospective guardians must avoid drunkenness, for it 
is less appropriate for a guardian to be drunk and not to know where on 
earth he is than it is for anyone else. 

It would be absurd for a guardian to need a guardian. 

What about food? Aren’t these men athletes in the greatest contest? 

They are. 

Then would the regimen currently prescribed for athletes in training 

404 be suitable for them? 

Perhaps it would. 

Yet it seems to result in sluggishness and to be of doubtful value for 
health. Or haven’t you noticed that these athletes sleep their lives away 
and that, if they deviate even a little from their orderly regimen, they 
become seriously and violently ill? 

I have noticed that. 

Then our warrior athletes need a more sophisticated kind of training. 
They must be like sleepless hounds, able to see and hear as keenly as 
possible and to endure frequent changes of water and food, as well as 

6 summer and winter weather on their campaigns, without faltering in 


health. 


воок ш 403с-405а 81 


That’s how it seems to me, too. 

Now, isn’t the best physical training akin to the simple music and poetry 
we were describing a moment ago? 

How do you mean? 

I mean a simple and decent physical training, particularly the kind 
involved in training for war. 

What would it be like? 

You might learn about such things from Homer. You know that, when 
his heroes are campaigning, he doesn’t give them fish to banquet on, even 
though they are by the sea in the Hellespont, nor boiled meat either. 
Instead, he gives them only roasted meat, which is the kind most easily 
available to soldiers, for it’s easier nearly everywhere to use fire alone than 
to carry pots and pans. 

That’s right. 

Nor, I believe, does Homer mention sweet desserts anywhere. Indeed, 
aren’t even the other athletes aware that, if one’s body is to be sound, one 
must keep away from all such things? 

They’re right to be aware of it, at any rate, and to avoid such things. 

If you think that, then it seems that you don’t approve of Syracusan 
cuisine or of Sicilian-style dishes. 

I do not. 

Then you also object to Corinthian girlfriends for men who are to be 
in good physical condition.” 

Absolutely. 

What about the reputed delights of Attic pastries? 

I certainly object to them, too. 

I believe that we’d be right to compare this diet and this entire life-style 
to the kinds of lyric odes and songs that are composed in all sorts of modes 
and rhythms. 

Certainly. 

Just as embellishment in the one gives rise to licentiousness, doesn’t it 
give rise to illness in the other? But simplicity in music and poetry makes for 
moderation in the soul, and in physical training it makes for bodily health? 

That’s absolutely true. 

And as licentiousness and disease breed in the city, aren’t many law 
courts and hospitals opened? And don’t the crafts of medicine and judging 
give themselves solemn airs when even large numbers of free men take 
them very seriously? 

How could it be otherwise? 


44. In the Classical period Corinthian prostitutes and hetairai enjoyed an international 
reputation. Plato is here objecting to them as hired female dinner companions. 


405 


82 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


Yet could you find a greater sign of bad and shameful education in a 
city than that the need for skilled doctors and lawyers is felt not only by 
inferior people and craftsmen but by those who claim to have been brought 
up in the manner of free men? Don’t you think it’s shameful and a great 

b sign of vulgarity to be forced to make use of a justice imposed by others, 
as masters and judges, because you are unable to deal with the situation 
yourself? 

I think that’s the most shameful thing of all. 

Yet isn’t it even more shameful when someone not only spends a good 
part of his life in court defending himself or prosecuting someone else 
but, through inexperience of what is fine, is persuaded to take pride in 

с being clever at doing injustice and then exploiting every loophole and trick 
to escape conviction—and all for the sake of little worthless things and 
because he’s ignorant of how much better and finer it is to arrange one’s 
own life so as to have no need of finding a sleepy or inattentive judge? 

This case is even more shameful than the other. 

And doesn’t it seem shameful to you to need medical help, not for 
wounds or because of some seasonal illness, but because, through idleness 

d апа the life-style we’ve described, one is full of gas and phlegm like a 
stagnant swamp, so that sophisticated Asclepiad doctors are forced to 
come up with names like “flatulence” and “catarrh” to describe one’s 
diseases? 

It does. And those certainly are strange new names for diseases. 

Indeed, I don’t suppose that they even existed in the time of Asclepius 
himself. I take it as a proof of this that his sons at Troy didn’t criticize either 

e the woman who treated Eurypylus when he was wounded, or Patroclus who 
prescribed the treatment, which consisted of Pramnian wine with barley 
meal and grated cheese sprinkled on it, though such treatment is now 

406 thought to cause inflammation.” 

Yet it’s a strange drink to give someone in that condition. 

Not if you recall that they say that the kind of modern medicine that 
plays nursemaid to the disease wasn’t used by the Asclepiads before 
Herodicus. He was a physical trainer who became ill, so he mixed physical 
training with medicine and wore out first himself and then many others 

b ав well. 

How did he do that? 

By making his dying a lengthy process. Always tending his mortal illness, 
he was nonetheless, it seems, unable to cure it, so he lived out his life 
under medical treatment, with no leisure for anything else whatever. If he 


45. At Iliad 11.580 ff. Eurypylus is wounded but not treated in this way (see 11.828- 
36). However, Machaon, the son of Asclepius, receives this treatment at 11.624-50. 


воок ш 405а-407с 83 


departed even а little from his accustomed regimen, һе became completely 
worn out, but because his skill made dying difficult, he lived into old age. 

That’s a fine prize for his skill. 

One that’s appropriate for someone who didn’t know that it wasn’t 
because he was ignorant or inexperienced that Asclepius failed to teach 
this type of medicine to his sons, but because he knew that everyone in a 
well-regulated city has his own work to do and that no one has the leisure 
to be ill and under treatment all his life. It’s absurd that we recognize this 
to be true of craftsmen while failing to recognize that it’s equally true of 
those who are wealthy and supposedly happy. 

How is that? 

When a carpenter is ill, he expects to receive an emetic or a purge from 
his doctor or to get rid of his disease through surgery or cautery. If anyone 
prescribed a lengthy regimen to him, telling him that he should rest with 
his head bandaged and so on, he’d soon reply that he had no leisure to be 
ill and that life is no use to him if he has to neglect his work and always 
be concerned with his illness. After that he’d bid good-bye to his doctor, 
resume his usual way of life, and either recover his health or, if his body 
couldn’t withstand the illness, he’d die and escape his troubles. 

It is believed to be appropriate for someone like that to use medicine 
in this way. 

Is that because his life is of no profit to him if he doesn’t do his work? 

Obviously. 

But the rich person, we say, has no work that would make his life 
unlivable if he couldn’t do it. 

That’s what people say, at least. 

That’s because you haven’t heard the saying of Phocylides that, once 
you have the means of life, you must practice virtue.” 

I think he must also practice virtue before that. 

We won’t quarrel with Phocylides about this. But let’s try to find out 
whether the rich person must indeed practice virtue and whether his life 
is not worth living if he doesn’t or whether tending an illness, while it is 
an obstacle to applying oneself to carpentry and the other crafts, is no 
obstacle whatever to taking Phocylides’ advice. 

But excessive care of the body, over and above physical training, is 
pretty well the biggest obstacle of all. It’s troublesome in managing a 
household, in military service, and even in a sedentary public office. 

Yet the most important of all, surely, is that it makes any kind of learning, 
thought, or private meditation difficult, for it’s always imagining some 


46. Phocylides of Miletus was á mid-sixth-century elegiac and hexameter poet best 
known for his epigrams. 


407 


84 SOcCRATES/GLAUCON 


headaches or dizziness and accusing philosophy of causing them. Hence, 
wherever this kind of virtue is practiced and examined, excessive care of 
the body hinders it, for it makes a person think he’s ill and be all the time 
concerned about his body. 
It probably does. 
Therefore, won’t we say that Asclepius knew this, and that he taught 
medicine for those whose bodies are healthy in their natures and habits 
d but have some specific disease? His medicine is for these people with 
these habits. He cured them of their disease with drugs or surgery and 
then ordered them to live their usual life so as not to harm their city’s 
affairs. But for those whose bodies were riddled with disease, he didn’t 
attempt to prescribe a regimen, drawing off a little here and pouring 
in a little there, in order to make their life a prolonged misery and 
enable them to produce offspring in all probability like themselves. He 
e didn’t think that he should treat someone who couldn’t live a normal 
life, since such a person would be of no profit either to himself or to 
the city. 
The Asclepius you’re talking about was quite a statesman. 
Clearly. And don’t you see that because he was a statesman his sons 
turned out to be good men at Troy, practicing medicine as I say they did? 
408 Don’t you remember that they “sucked out the blood and applied gentle 
potions” to the wound Pandarus inflicted on Menelaus, but without pre- 
scribing what he should eat or drink after that, any more than they did for 
Eurypylus?*’ They considered their drugs to be sufficient to cure men 
who were healthy and living an orderly life before being wounded, even 
b if they happened to drink wine mixed with barley and cheese right after 
receiving their wounds. But they didn’t consider the lives of those who 
were by nature sick and licentious to be profitable either to themselves or 
to anyone else. Medicine isn’t intended for such people and they shouldn’t 
be treated, not even if they’re richer than Midas. 
The sons of Asclepius you’re talking about were indeed very sophisti- 
cated. 
Appropriately so. But Pindar and the tragedians don’t agree with us. 
They say that Asclepius was the son of Apollo, that he was bribed with 
gold to heal a rich man, who was already dying, and that he was killed by 
lightning for doing so. But, in view of what we said before, we won’t 
c believe this. We’ll say that if Asclepius was the son of a god, he was not 
a money-grubber, and that if he was a money-grubber, he was not the son 
of a god. $ 
That’s right. But what do you say about the following, Socrates? Don’t 


47. Iliad 4.218-19. In our text Machaon is acting alone. 


BOOK ш 407с-409с 85 


we need to have good doctors in our city? And the best will surely be those 
who have handled the greatest number of sick and of healthy people. In 
the same way, the best judges” will be those who have associated with 
people whose natures are of every kind. 

I agree that the doctors and judges must be good. But do you know the 
kind I consider to be so? 

If you’ll tell me. 

ГІ try. But you ask about things that aren’t alike in the same question. 

In what way? 

The cleverest doctors are those who, in addition to learning their craft, 
have had contact with the greatest number of very sick bodies from 
childhood on, have themselves experienced every illness, and aren’t very 
healthy by nature, for they don’t treat bodies with their bodies, I suppose— 
if they did, we wouldn’t allow their bodies to be or become bad. Rather 
they treat the body with their souls, and it isn’t possible for the soul to 
treat anything well, if it is or has been bad itself. 

That’s right. 

As for the judge, he does rule other souls with his own soul. And it isn’t 
possible for a soul to be nurtured among vicious souls from childhood, to 
associate with them, to indulge in every kind of injustice, and come through 
it able to judge other people’s injustices from its own case, as it can 
diseases of the body. Rather, if it’s to be fine and good, and a sound judge 
of just things, it must itself remain pure and have no experience of bad 
character while it’s young. That’s the reason, indeed, that decent people 
appear simple and easily deceived by unjust ones when they are young. 
It’s because they have no models in themselves of the evil experiences of 
the vicious to guide their judgments. 

That’s certainly so. 

Therefore, a good judge must not be a young person but an old one, 
who has learned late in life what injustice is like and who has become 
aware of it not as something at home in his own soul, but as something 
alien and present in others, someone who, after a long time, has recognized 
that injustice is bad by nature, not from his own experience of it, but 
through knowledge. 

Such a judge would be the most noble one of all. 

And he’d be good, too, which was what you asked, for someone who 
has a good soul is good. The clever and suspicious person, on the other 


48. The Greek word is dikastés, a member of a jury. Athenian juries decided both the 
question of guilt and the penalty, however. Hence they combined the functions that 
we divide between the jury and’the judge. Since Plato is obviously thinking of the act 
of judging here, “judge” is a less misleading translation than “juror.” 


409 


86 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


hand, who has committed many injustices himself and thinks himself a 
wise villain, appears clever in the company of those like himself, because 
he’s on his guard and is guided by the models within himself. But when 
he meets with good older people, he’s seen to be stupid, distrustful at the 
wrong time, and ignorant of what a sound character is, since he has no 

d model of this within himself. But since he meets vicious people more often 
than good ones, he seems to be clever rather than unlearned, both to 
himself and to others. 

That’s completely true. 

Then we mustn’t look for the good judge among people like that but 
among the sort we described earlier. A vicious person would never know 
either himself or a virtuous one, whereas a naturally virtuous person, when 
educated, will in time acquire knowledge of both virtue and vice. And it 
is someone like that who becomes wise, in my view, and not the bad 

e person. 

I agree with you. 

Then won’t you legislate in our city for the kind of medicine we men- 
tioned and for this kind of judging, so that together they’ll look after those 

410 who are naturally well endowed in body and soul? But as for the ones 
whose bodies are naturally unhealthy or whose souls are incurably evil, 
won’t they let the former die of their own accord and put the latter to 
death? 

That seems to be best both for the ones who suffer such treatment and 
for the city. 

However, our young people, since they practice that simple sort of music 
and poetry that we said produces moderation, will plainly be wary of 
coming to the craft of judging. 

That’s right. 

And won’t a person who’s educated in music and poetry pursue physical 

b training in the same way, and choose to make no use of medicine except 
when unavoidable? 

I believe so. 

He’ll work at physical exercises in order to arouse the spirited part of 
his nature, rather than to acquire the physical strength for which other 
athletes diet and labor. 

That’s absolutely right. 

Then, Glaucon, did those who established education in music and 
poetry and in physical training do so with the aim that people attribute to 

c Шет, which is to take care of the body with the latter and the soul with 
the former, or with some other aim? 

What other aim do you mean? 

It looks as though they established both chiefly for the sake of the soul. 


BOOK ш 409с-411Ь 87 


How so? 

Haven’t you noticed the effect that lifelong physical training, unaccom- 
panied by any training in music and poetry, has on the mind, or the effect 
of the opposite, music and poetry without physical training? 

What effects are you talking about? 

Savagery and toughness in the one case and softness and overcultivation 4 
in the other. 

I get the point. You mean that those who devote themselves exclusively 
to physical training turn out to be more savage than they should, while 
those who devote themselves to music and poetry turn out to be softer 
than is good for them? 

Moreover, the source of the savageness is the spirited part of one’s 
nature. Rightly nurtured, it becomes courageous, but if it’s overstrained, 
it’s likely to become hard and harsh. 

So it seems. 

And isn’t it the philosophic part of one’s nature that provides the 
cultivation? If it is relaxed too far, it becomes softer than it should, but if е 
properly nurtured, it is cultivated and orderly. 

So it is. 

Now, we say that our guardians must have both these natures. 

They must indeed. 

And mustn’t the two be harmonized with each other? 

Of course. 

And if this harmony is achieved, the soul is both moderate and coura- 
geous? 411 

Certainly. 

But if it is inharmonious, it is cowardly and savage? 

Yes, indeed. 

Therefore, when someone gives music an opportunity to charm his 
soul with the flute and to pour those sweet, soft, and plaintive tunes we 
mentioned through his ear, as through a funnel, when he spends his whole 
life humming them and delighting in them, then, at first, whatever spirit 
he has is softened, just as iron is tempered, and from being hard and 
useless, it is made useful. But if he keeps at it unrelentingly and is beguiled 
by the music, after a time his spirit is melted and dissolved until it vanishes, % 
and the very sinews of his soul are cut out and he becomes “a feeble 
warrior.”” 

That’s right. 

And if he had a spiritless nature from the first, this process is soon 
completed. But if he had a spirited nature, his spirit becomes weak and 


49. Iliad 17.588. 


412 


88 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


unstable, flaring up at trifles and extinguished as easily. The result is that 
such people become quick-tempered, prone to anger, and filled witk 
discontent, rather than spirited. 

That’s certainly true. 

What about someone who works hard at physical training and eats well 
but never touches music or philosophy? Isn’t he in good physical condition 
at first, full of resolution and spirit? And doesn’t he become more coura- 
geous than he was before? 

Certainly. 

But what happens if he does nothing else and never associates with the 
Muse? Doesn’t whatever love of learning he might have had in his soul 
soon become enfeebled, deaf, and blind, because he never tastes any 
learning or investigation or partakes of any discussion or any of the rest 
of music and poetry, to nurture or arouse it? 

It does seem to be that way. 

I believe that someone like that becomes a hater of reason and of music. 
He no longer makes any use of persuasion but bulls his way through every 
situation by force and savagery like a wild animal, living in ignorance and 
stupidity without either rhythm or grace. 

That’s most certainly how he’ll live. 

It seems, then, that a god has given music and physical training to 
human beings not, except incidentally, for the body and the soul but for 
the spirited and wisdom-loving parts of the soul itself, in order that these 
might be in harmony with one another, each being stretched and relaxed 
to the appropriate degree. 

It seems so. 

Then the person who achieves the finest blend of music and physical 
training and impresses it on his soul in the most measured way is the one 
we’d most correctly call completely harmonious and trained in music, 
much more so than the one who merely harmonizes the strings of his 
instrument. 

That’s certainly so, Socrates. 

Then, won’t we always need this sort of person as an overseer in our 
city, Glaucon, if indeed its constitution is to be preserved? 

It seems that we’ll need someone like that most of all. 

These, then, are the patterns for education and upbringing. Should we 
enumerate the dances of these people, or their hunts, chases with hounds, 
athletic contests, and horse races? Surely, they’re no longer hard to dis- 
cover, since it’s pretty clear that they must follow the patterns we’ve already 
established. С 

Регһарв ѕо. 

All right, then what’s the next thing we have to determine? Isn’t it which 
of these same people will rule and which be ruled? 


BOOK II 411Һ-413Ь 89 


Of course. 

Now, isn’t it obvious that the rulers must be older and the ruled younger? 

Yes, it is. 

And mustn’t the rulers also be the best of them? 

That, too. 

And aren’t the best farmers the ones who are best at farming? 

Yes. 

Then, as the rulers must be the best of the guardians, mustn’t they be 
the ones who are best at guarding the city? 

Yes. 

Then, in the first place, mustn’t they be knowledgeable and capable, 
and mustn’t they care for the city? 

That’s right. 

Now, one cares most for what one loves. 

Necessarily. 

And someone loves something most of all when he believes that the 
same things are advantageous to it as to himself and supposes that if it 
does well, he’ll do well, and that if it does badly, then he’ll do badly too. 

That’s right. 

Then we must choose from among our guardians those men who, upon 
examination, seem most of all to believe throughout their lives that they 
must eagerly pursue what is advantageous to the city and be wholly 
unwilling to do the opposite. 

Such people would be suitable for the job at any rate. 

I think we must observe them at all ages to see whether they are 
guardians of this conviction and make sure that neither compulsion nor 
magic spells will get them to discard or forget their belief that they must 
do what is best for the city. 

What do you mean by discarding? 

ГІ] tell you. I think the discarding of a belief is either voluntary or 
involuntary—voluntary when one learns that the belief is false, involuntary 
in the case of all true beliefs. 

I understand voluntary discarding but not involuntary. 

What’s that? Don’t you know that people are voluntarily deprived of 
bad things, but involuntarily deprived of good ones? And isn’t being 
deceived about the truth a bad thing, while possessing the truth is good? 
Or don’t you think that to believe the things that are is to possess the 
truth? 

That’s right, and I do think that people are involuntarily deprived of 
true opinions. 

But can’t they also be so deprived by theft, magic spells, and compulsion? 

Now, I don’t understand again. 

I’m afraid I must be talking like a tragic poet! By “the victims of theft” 


е 


413 


414 


90 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


I mean those who are persuaded to change their minds or those who 
forget, because time, in the latter case, and argument, in the former, takes 
away their opinions without their realizing it. Do you understand now? 

Yes. 

By “the compelled” I mean those whom pain or suffering causes to 
change their mind. 

I understand that, and you’re right. 

The “victims of magic,” I think you’d agree, are those who change their 
mind because they are under the spell of pleasure or fear. 

It seems to me that everything that deceives does so by casting a spell. 

Then, as I said just now, we must find out who are the best guardians 
of their conviction that they must always do what they believe to be best 
for the city. We must keep them under observation from childhood and 
set them tasks that are most likely to make them forget such a conviction 
or be deceived out of it, and we must select whoever keeps on remembering 
it and isn’t easily deceived, and reject the others. Do you agree? 

Yes. 

And we must subject them to labors, pains, and contests in which we 
can watch for these traits. 

That’s right. 

Then we must also set up a competition for the third way in which 
people are deprived of their convictions, namely, magic. Like those who 
lead colts into noise and tumult to see if they’re afraid, we must expose 
our young people to fears and pleasures, testing them more thoroughly 
than gold is tested by fire. If someone is hard to put under a spell, is 
apparently gracious in everything, is a good guardian of himself and the 
music and poetry he has learned, and if he always shows himself to be 
rhythmical and harmonious, then he is the best person both for himself 
and for the city. Anyone who is tested in this way as a child, youth, and 
adult, and always comes out of it untainted, is to be made a ruler as well 
as a guardian; he is to be honored in life and to receive after his death the 
most prized tombs and memorials. But anyone who fails to prove himself 
in this way is to be rejected. 

It also seems to me, Glaucon, that rulers and guardians must be select- 
ed and appointed in some such way as this, though we’ve provided only a 
general pattern and not the exact details. 

It also seems to me that they must be selected in this sort of way. 

Then, isn’t it truly most correct to call these people complete guardians, 
since they will guard against external enemies and internal friends, so that 
the one will lack the power and the other the desire to harm the city? The 
young people we’ve hitherto called guardians we’ll now call auxiliaries and 
supporters of the guardians’ convictions. 

I agree. 


BOOK ш 413Һ-415с 91 


How, then, could we devise one of those useful falsehoods we were 
talking about a while ago,” one noble falsehood that would, in the best 
case, persuade even the rulers, but if that’s not possible, then the others с 
in the city? 

What sort of falsehood? 

Nothing new, but a Phoenician story which describes something that 
has happened in many places. At least, that’s what the poets say, and 
they’ve persuaded many people to believe it too. It hasn’t happened among 
us, and І don’t even know if it could. It would certainly take a lot of 
persuasion to get people to believe it. 

You seem hesitant to tell the story. 

When you hear it, you’ll realize that I have every reason to hesitate. 

Speak, and don’t be afraid. 

Pl tell it, then, though І don’t know where РІ get the audacity or even 4 
what words Р] use. ГІ first try to persuade the rulers and the soldiers and 
then the rest of the city that the upbringing and the education we gave 
them, and the experiences that went with them, were a sort of dream, that 
in fact they themselves, their weapons, and the other craftsmen’s tools 
were at that time really being fashioned and nurtured inside the earth, е 
and that when the work was completed, the earth, who is their mother, 
delivered all of them up into the world. Therefore, if anyone attacks the 
land in which they live, they must plan on its behalf and defend it as their 
mother and nurse and think of the other citizens as their earthborn 
brothers. 

It isn’t for nothing that you were so shy about telling your falsehood. 

Appropriately so. Nevertheless, listen to the rest of the story. “All of 4/5 
you in the city are brothers,” we’ll say to them in telling our story, “but 
the god who made you mixed some gold into those who are adequately 
equipped to rule, because they are most valuable. He put silver in those 
who are auxiliaries and iron and bronze in the farmers and other craftsmen. 

For the most part you will produce children like yourselves, but, because 
you are all related, a silver child will occasionally be born from a golden | ) 
parent, and vice versa, and all the others from each other. So the first and 
most important command from the god to the rulers is that there is nothing 
that they must guard better or watch more carefully than the mixture of 
metals in the souls of the next generation. If an offspring of theirs should 
be found to have a mixture of iron or bronze, they must not pity him in 
any way, but give him the rank appropriate to his nature and drive him с 
out to join the craftsmen and farmers. But if an offspring of these people 
is found to have a mixture of gold or silver, they will honor him and take 


50. See 382a ff. 


92 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


him up to join the guardians or the auxiliaries, for there is an oracle which 
says that the city will be ruined if it ever has an iron or a bronze guardian.” 
So, do you have any device that will make our citizens believe this story? 

d I can’t see any way to make them believe it themselves, but perhaps 
there is one in the case of their sons and later generations and all the other 
people who come after them. 

І understand pretty much what you mean, but even that would help to 
make them care more for the city and each other. However, let’s leave 
this matter wherever tradition takes it. And let’s now arm our earthborn 
and lead them forth with their rulers in charge. And as they march, let 
them look for the best place in the city to have their camp, a site from 

e which they can most easily control those within, if anyone is unwilling to 
obey the laws, or repel any outside enemy who comes like a wolf upon the 
flock. And when they have established their camp and made the requisite 
sacrifices, they must see to their sleeping quarters. What do you say? 

I agree. 

And won’t these quarters protect them adequately both in winter and 
summer? 

Of course, for it seems to me that you mean their housing. 

Yes, but housing for soldiers, not for money-makers. 

416 How do you mean to distinguish these from one another? 

PII try to tell you. The most terrible and most shameful thing of all is 
for a shepherd to rear dogs as auxiliaries to help him with his flocks in 
such a way that, through licentiousness, hunger, or some other bad trait 
of character, they do evil to the sheep and become like wolves instead of 
dogs. 

That’s certainly a terrible thing. 

b Isn’t it necessary, therefore, to guard in every way against our auxiliaries 
doing anything like that to the citizens because they are stronger, thereby 
becoming savage masters instead of kindly allies? 

It is necessary. 

And wouldn’t a really good education endow them with the greatest 
caution in this regard? 

But surely they have had an education like that. 

Perhaps we shouldn’t assert this dogmatically, Glaucon. What we can 
assert is what we were saying just now, that they must have the right 
education, whatever it is, if they are to have what will most make them 

c gentle to each other and to those they are guarding. 

That’s right. - 

Now, someone with some understanding might say that, besides this 
education, they must also have the kind of housing and other property 
that will neither prevent them from being the best guardians nor encourage 

4 Шет to do evil to the other citizens. 


BOOK ш 415c-417b 93 


That’s true. 

Consider, then, whether or not they should live in some such way as 
this, if they’re to be the kind of men we described. First, none of them 
should possess any private property beyond what is wholly necessary. 
Second, none of them should have a house or storeroom that isn’t open for 
all to enter at will. Third, whatever sustenance moderate and courageous 
warrior-athletes require in order to have neither shortfall nor surplus in 
a given year they’ll receive by taxation on the other citizens as a salary for 
their guardianship. Fourth, they'll have common messes and live together 
like soldiers іп a camp. We'll tell them that they always have gold and 
silver of a divine sort in their souls as a gift from the gods and so have no 
further need of human gold. Indeed, we’ll tell them that it’s impious for 
them to defile this divine possession by any admixture of such gold, 
because many impious deeds have been done that involve the currency 
used by ordinary people, while their own is pure. Hence, for them alone 
among the city’s population, it is unlawful to touch or handle gold or silver. 
They mustn’t be under the same roof as it, wear it as jewelry, or drink 
from gold or silver goblets. In this way they’d save both themselves and 
the city. But if they acquire private land, houses, and currency themselves, 
they'll be household managers and farmers instead of guardians—hostile 
masters of the other citizens instead of their allies. They'll spend their 
whole lives hating and being hated, plotting and being plotted against, 
more afraid of internal than of external enemies, and they'll hasten both 
themselves and the whole city to almost immediate ruin. For all these 
reasons, let’s say that the guardians must be provided with housing and 
the rest in this way, and establish this as a law. Or don’t you agree? 

I certainly do, Glaucon said. 


417 


Воок ІҮ 


Given the austere life-style afforded to the guardians іп the kallipolis, the question 

Adeimantus raises about their happiness at the beginning of this book is a natural 
one. Everyone is supposed to be happy in the kallipolis (420b, 51 9), yet the 
guardians, who have the most power, do not seem to have been made happy at 
all. Socrates’ response (4200—4210) is complex and should be read together with 
465е ff The goal of the kallipolis, he says, is not to make any one group in the 
city outstandingly happy at the expense of others, as Thrasymachus claimed, but 
to make everyone as happy as his nature allows (4210), This will be accomplished, 
he argues, if everyone in it practices the craft for which his natural aptitude is 
highest, whether it is producing, guarding, or ruling (434a—<). 

Hence the guardians must above all protect their system of elementary education, 
for this provides the training in civic virtue without which no system of laws, no 
constitution, can hope to achieve anything worthwhile (423с-427а). But though 
Socrates has proposed many innovations in religious education as part of his 
reform of music and poetry and physical training, he is more conservative when 
it comes to religious practice. The lams concerning that, he says, are to be left up 
to “the traditional lamgiver,” namely, the Delphian Apollo (427b-v). 

The kallipolis is pronounced established (427d). Since it is completely good 
(427e), it must have all the virtues of a city (ee 3524-35 4a), namely, wisdom, 
courage, moderation, and justice. Therefore the search for the justice in it is 
guaranteed not to be futile. 

By the time that search has concluded (434d), wisdom, courage, moderation, 
and justice have each been identified with distinct structural features of the 
kallipolis, but those identifications will not be secure until the very same structural 
features are shown to be identical to those virtues in the individual soul (434d- 
435а). 

This leads to the argument for the division of the soul into three parts— 
appetitive, spirited, rational—corresponding to the three major classes in the 
kallipolis—producers, guardians, rulers (4350-441 0). Once this argument is 
complete, it remains to find the virtues in the soul and to show that they are the 
same structural features of it as of the kallipolis (441 c—444e), 

The final question raised in Book IV is the central one of the Republic, namely, 
whether it is more profitable to be just or unjust (445а). Glaucon is ready to 


24 


BOOK у 419a-420d 95 


answer it at this point (445а-0) but Socrates is not (445b), for, in his view, the 
question cannot be clearly answered until much more work has been done on 


virtue and vice (445b-e). 


And Adeimantus interrupted: How would you defend yourself, Socrates, 
he said, if someone told you that you aren’t making these men very happy 419 
and that it’s their own fault? The city really belongs to them, yet they 
derive no good from it. Others own land, build fine big houses, acquire 
furnishings to go along with them, make their own private sacrifices to the 
gods, entertain guests, and also, of course, possess what you were talking 
about just now, gold and silver and all the things that are thought to belong 
to people who are blessedly happy. But one might well say that your 
guardians are simply settled in the city like mercenaries and that all they 
do is watch over it. 420 
Yes, І said, and what’s more, they work simply for their keep and get 
no extra wages as the others do. Hence, if they want to take a private trip 
away from the city, they won’t be able to; they'll have nothing to give to 
their mistresses, nothing to spend in whatever other ways they wish, as 
people do who are considered happy. You’ve omitted these and a host of 
other, similar facts from your charge. 
Well, let them be added to the charge as well. 
Then, are you asking how we should defend ourselves? b 
Yes. 
I think we’ll discover what to say if we follow the same path as before. 
We'll say that it wouldn’t be surprising if these people were happiest just 
as they are, but that, in establishing our city, we aren’t aiming to make any 
one group outstandingly happy but to make the whole city so, as far as 
possible. We thought that we’d find justice most easily in such a city and 
injustice, by contrast, in the one that is governed worst and that, by 
observing both cities, we’d be able to judge the question we’ve been 
inquiring into for so long. We take ourselves, then, to be fashioning the с 
happy city, not picking out a few happy people and putting them in it, but 
making the whole city happy. (We’ll look at the opposite city soon.’) 
Suppose, then, that someone came up to us while we were painting a 
statue and objected that, because we had painted the eyes (which are the 
most beautiful part) black rather than purple, we had not applied the most 
beautiful colors to the most beautiful parts of the statue. We’d think it 
reasonable to offer the following defense: “You mustn’t expect us to paint 
the eyes so beautifully that they no longer appear to be eyes at all, and ће 4 


1. This discussion begins at 445c, but is interrupted and doesn’t begin again until 
Book VIII. 


221 


96 SOCRATES/ADEIMANTUS 


same with the other parts. Rather you must look to see whether by dealing 
with each part appropriately, we are making the whole statue beautiful.” 
Similarly, you mustn’t force us to give our guardians the kind of happiness 
that would make them something other than guardians. We know how to 
clothe the farmers in purple robes, festoon them with gold jewelry, and 
tell them to work the land whenever they please. We know how to settle 
our potters on couches by the fire, feasting and passing the wine around, 
with their wheel beside them for whenever they want to make pots. And 
we can make all the others happy in the same way, so that the whole city 
is happy. Don’t urge us to do this, however, for if we do, a farmer wouldn’t 
be a farmer, nor a potter a potter, and none of the others would keep to 
the patterns of work that give rise to a city. Now, if cobblers become 
inferior and corrupt and claim to be what they are not, that won’t do much 
harm to the city. Hence, as far as they and the others like them are 
concerned, our argument carries less weight. But if the guardians of our 
laws and city are merely believed to be guardians but are not, you surely see 
that they'll destroy the city utterly, just as they alone have the opportunity to 
govern it well and make it happy. 

If we are making true guardians, then, who are least likely to do evil to 
the city, and if the one who brought the charge is talking about farmers 
and banqueters who are happy as they would be at a festival rather than 
in а city, then he isn’t talking about a city at all, but about something else. 
With this in mind, we should consider whether in setting up our guardians 
we are aiming to give them the greatest happiness, or whether—since our 
aim is to see that the city as a whole has the greatest happiness—we must 
compel and persuade the auxiliaries and guardians to follow our other 
policy and be the best possible craftsmen at their own work, and the same 
with all the others. In this way, with the whole city developing and being 
governed well, we must leave it to nature to provide each group with its 
share of happiness. 

I think you put that very well, he said. 

Will you also think that I’m putting things well when I make the next 
point, which is closely akin to this one? 

Which one exactly? 

Consider whether or not the following things corrupt the other workers, 
so that they become bad. 

What things? 

Wealth and poverty. 

How do they corrupt the other workers? 

Like this. Do you think that a potter who has become wealthy will still 
be willing to pay attention to his craft? 

Not at all. 


BOOK у 4204-4224 97 


Won’t he become more idle and careless than he was? 

Much more. 

Then won’t he become a worse potter? 

Far worse. 

And surely if poverty prevents him from having tools or any of the other 
things he needs for his craft, he’ll produce poorer work and will teach his 
sons, or anyone else he teaches, to be worse craftsmen. е 

Of course. 

So poverty and wealth make a craftsman and his products worse. 

Apparently. 

It seems, then, that we’ve found other things that our guardians must 
guard against in every way, to prevent them from slipping into the city 
unnoticed. 

What are they? 

Both wealth and poverty. The former makes for luxury, idleness, and 422 
revolution; the latter for slavishness, bad work, and revolution as well. 

That’s certainly true. But consider this, Socrates: If our city hasn’t got 
any money, how will it be able to fight a war, especially if it has to fight 
against a great and wealthy city? 

Obviously, it will be harder to fight one such city and easier to fight b 
two. 

How do you mean? 

First of all, if our city has to fight a city of the sort you mention, won’t 
it be a case of warrior-athletes fighting against rich men? 

Yes, as far as that goes. 

Well, then, Adeimantus, don’t you think that one boxer who has had 
the best possible training could easily fight two rich and fat nonboxers? 

Maybe not at the same time. 

Not even by escaping from them and then turning and hitting the one 
who caught up with him first, and doing this repeatedly in stifling heat 
and sun? Wouldn’t he, in his condition, be able to handle even more than с 
two such people? 

That certainly wouldn’t be surprising. 

And don’t you think that the rich have more knowledge and experience 
of boxing than of how to fight a war? 

I do. 

Then in all likelihood our athletes will easily be able to fight twice or 
three times their own numbers in a war. 

I agree, for I think what you say is right. 

What if they sent envoys to another city and told them the following 
truth: “We have no use for gold or silver, and it isn’t lawful for us to d&d 
possess them, so join us in this war, and you can take the property of those 


423 


98 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


who oppose us for yourselves.” Do you think that anyone hearing this 
would choose to fight hard, lean dogs, rather than to join them in fighting 
fat and tender sheep? 

No, I don’t. But if the wealth of all the cities came to be gathered in a 
single one, watch out that it doesn’t endanger your nonwealthy city. 

You're happily innocent if you think that anything other than the kind 
of city we are founding deserves to be called a city. 

What do you mean? 

We'll have to find a greater title for the others because each of them is 
a great many cities, not а city, as they say in the game.’ At any rate, each 
of them consists of two cities at war with one another, that of the poor 
and that of the rich, and each of these contains a great many. If you 
approach them as one city, you'll be making a big mistake. But if you 
approach them as many and offer to give to the one city the money, power, 
and indeed the very inhabitants of the other, you’ll always find many allies 
and few enemies. And as long as your own city is moderately governed in 
the way that we’ve just arranged, it will, even if it has only a thousand men 
to fight for it, be the greatest. Not in reputation; I don’t mean that, but 
the greatest in fact. Indeed, you won’t find a city as great as this one among 
either Greeks or barbarians, although many that are many times its size 
may seem to be as great. Do you disagree? 

No, I certainly don’t. 

Then this would also be the best limit for our guardians to put on the 
size of the city. And they should mark off enough land for a city that size 
and let the rest go. 

What limit is that? 

І suppose the following one. As long as it is willing to remain one city, 
it may continue to grow, but it cannot grow beyond that point. 

That is a good limit. 

Then, we'll give our guardians this further order, namely, to guard in 
every way against the city’s being either small or great in reputation instead 
of being sufficient in size and one in number. 

At any rate, that order will be fairly easy for them to follow. 

And the one we mentioned earlier is even easier, when we said that, if 
an offspring of the guardians is inferior, he must be sent off to join the 
other citizens and that, if the others have an able offspring, he must join 
the guardians. This was meant to make clear that each of the other citizens 


2. The reference is obscure; it may bé to a saying or proverb or to a game like 
checkers called poleis or cities, in which the set of pieces on each side, or perhaps any 
subset of them, were called cities, while the individual members of the sets were called 
dogs. 


BOOK IV 4224-4244 99 


is to be directed to what he is naturally suited for, so that, doing the one 
work that is his own, he will become not many but one, and the whole city 
will itself be naturally one not many. 

That 5 easier than the other. 

These orders we give them, Adeimantus, are neither as numerous nor 
as important as one might think. Indeed, they are all insignificant, pro- 
vided, as the saying goes, that they guard the one great thing, though I’d 
rather call it sufficient than great. е 

What’s that? 

Their education and upbringing, for if by being well educated they 
become reasonable men, they will easily see these things for themselves, 
as well as all the other things we are omitting, for example, that marriage, 
the having of wives, and the procreation of children must be governed as 
far as possible by the old proverb: Friends possess everything in common. 424 

That would be best. 

And surely, once our city gets a good start, it will go on growing in a 
cycle. Good education and upbringing, when they are preserved, produce 
good natures, and useful natures, who are in turn well educated, grow up 
even better than their predecessors, both in their offspring and in other 
respects, just like other animals. b 

That’s likely. 

To put it briefly, those in charge must cling to education and see that 
it isn’t corrupted without their noticing it, guarding it against everything. 
Above all, they must guard as carefully as they can against any innovation 
in music and poetry or in physical training that is counter to the established 
order.” And they should dread to hear anyone say: 


People care most for the song 
That is newest from the singer’s lips.’ 


Someone might praise such a saying, thinking that the poet meant not 
new songs but new ways of singing. Such a thing shouldn’t be praised, с 
and the poet shouldn’t be taken to have meant it, for the guardians must 
beware of changing to a new form of music, since it threatens the whole 
system. As Damon says, and I am convinced, the musical modes are never 
changed without change in the most important of a city’s laws. 

You can count me among the convinced as well, Adeimantus said. 

Then it seems, І said, that it is in music and poetry that our guardians 
must build their bulwark. d 

At any rate, lawlessness easily creeps in there unnoticed. 


3. See Book II n. 1. 
4. Odyssey 1.351-2. Plato’s text of Homer is slightly different from ours. 


100 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


Yes, as if music and poetry were only play and did no harm at all. 

It is harmless—except, of course, that when lawlessness has established 
itself there, it flows over little by little into characters and ways of life. 
Then, greatly increased, it steps out into private contracts, and from private 
contracts, Socrates, it makes its insolent way into the laws and government, 

e until in the end it overthrows everything, public and private. 

Well, is that the way it goes? 

I think so. 

Then, as we said at first, our children’s games must from the very 
beginning be more law-abiding, for if their games become lawless, and 
the children follow suit, isn’t it impossible for them to grow up into good 

425 and law-abiding men? 

It certainly is. 

But when children play the right games from the beginning and absorb 
lawfulness from music and poetry, it follows them in everything and fosters 
their growth, correcting anything in the city that may have gone wrong 
before—in other words, the very opposite of what happens where the 
games are lawless. 

That’s true. 

These people will also discover the seemingly insignificant conventions 
their predecessors have destroyed. 

Which ones? 

Things like this: When it is proper for the young to be silent in front 

b oftheir elders, when they should make way for them or stand up in their 
presence, the care of parents, hair styles, the clothes and shoes to wear, 
deportment, and everything else of that sort. Don’t you agree? 

I do. 

I think it’s foolish to legislate about such things. Verbal or written 
decrees will never make them come about or last. 

How could they? 

At any rate, Adeimantus, it looks as though the start of someone’s 

c education determines what follows. Doesn’t like always encourage like? 

It does. 

And the final outcome of education, I suppose we’d Say, is a single 
newly finished person, who is either good or the opposite. 

Of course. 

That’s why I wouldn’t go on to try to legislate about such things. 

And with good reason. 

Then, by the gods, what about market business, such as the private 
contracts people make with one another in the marketplace, for example, 

d ог contracts with manual laborers, cases of insult or injury, the bringing 
of lawsuits, the establishing of juries, the payment and assessment of 
whatever dues are necessary in markets and harbors, the regulation of 


BOOK IV 4244-426е 101 


market, city, harbor, and the rest—should we bring ourselves to legislate 
about any of these? 

It isn’t appropriate to dictate to men who are fine and good. They'll 
easily find out for themselves whatever needs to be legislated about such 
things. 

Yes, provided that a god grants that the laws we have already described 
are preserved. 

If not, they’ll spend their lives enacting a lot of other laws and then 
amending them, believing that in this way they’ll attain the best. 

You mean they'll live like those sick people who, through licentiousness, 
aren’t willing to abandon their harmful way of life? 

That’s right. 

And such people carry on in an altogether amusing fashion, don’t 
they? Their medical treatment achieves nothing, except that their illness 
becomes worse and more complicated, and they’re always hoping that 
someone will recommend some new medicine to cure them. 

That’s exactly what happens to people like that. 

And isn’t it also amusing that they consider their worst enemy to be the 
person who tells them the truth, namely, that until they give up drunken- 
ness, overeating, lechery, and idleness, no medicine, cautery, or surgery, 
no charms, amulets, or anything else of that kind will do them any good? 

It isn’t amusing at all, for it isn’t amusing to treat someone harshly when 
he’s telling the truth. 

You don’t seem to approve of such men. 

I certainly don’t, by god. 

Then, you won’t approve either if a whole city behaves in that way, as 
we said. Don’t you think that cities that are badly governed behave exactly 
like this when they warn their citizens not to disturb the city’s whole 
political establishment on pain of death? The person who is honored and 
considered clever and wise in important matters by such badly governed 
cities is the one who serves them most pleasantly, indulges them, flatters 
them, anticipates their wishes, and is clever at fulfilling them. 

Cities certainly do seem to behave in that way, and I don’t approve of 
it at all. 

What about those who are willing and eager to serve such cities? Don’t 
you admire their courage and readiness? 

I do, except for those who are deceived by majority approval into 
believing that they are true statesmen. 

What do you mean? Have you no sympathy for such men? Or do you 
think it’s possible for someone who is ignorant of measurement not to 
believe it himself when many others who are similarly ignorant tell him 
that he is six feet tall? 

No, I don’t think that. 


426 


102 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS/ GLAUCON 


Then don’t be too hard on them, for such people are surely the most 
amusing of all. They pass laws on the subjects we’ve just been enumerating 
and then amend them, and they always think they’ll find a way to put a 
stop to cheating on contracts and the other things І mentioned, not 
realizing that they’re really just cutting off a Hydra’s head.” 

427 Yet that’s all they’re doing. 

Га have thought, then, that the true lawgiver oughtn’t to bother with 
that form of law or constitution, either in a badly governed city or in a 
well-governed one—in the former, because it’s useless and accomplishes 
nothing; in the latter, because anyone could discover some of these things, 
while the others follow automatically from the ways of life we established. 

b What is now left for us to deal with under the heading of legislation? 

For us nothing, but for the Delphic Apollo it remains to enact the 
greatest, finest, and first of laws. 

What laws are those? 

Those having to do with the establishing of temples, sacrifices, and 
other forms of service to gods, daimons, and heroes, the burial of the 
dead, and the services that ensure their favor. We have no knowledge of 
these things, and in establishing our city, if we have any understanding, 

с ме уоп” be persuaded to trust them to anyone other than the ancestral 
guide. And this god, sitting upon the rock at the center of the earth,‘ is 
without a doubt the ancestral guide on these matters for all people. 

Nicely put. And that’s what we must do. 

а Well, son of Ariston, your city might now Бе said to be established. The 
next step is to get an adequate light somewhere and to call upon your 
brother as well as Polemarchus and the others, so as to look inside it and 
see where the justice and the injustice might be in it, what the difference 
between them is, and which of the two the person who is to be happy 
should possess, whether its possession is unnoticed by all the gods and 
human beings or not. 

You're talking nonsense, Glaucon said. You promised to look for them 
yourself because you said it was impious for you not to come to the rescue 

e of justice in every way you could. 

That’s true, and I must do what I promised, but you’ll have to help. 

We will. 

I hope to find it in this way. I think our city, if indeed it has been 
correctly founded, is completely good. 


5. The Hydra was a mythical monster. When one of its heads was cut off, two or 
three new heads grew in its place. Heracles had to slay the Hydra as one of his labors. 


6. Т.е. on the rock in the sanctuary at Delphi, which was believed to be the navel or 
center of the earth. 


BOOK IV 426e-428d 103 


Necessarily so. 

Clearly, then, it is wise, courageous, moderate, and just. 

Clearly. 

Then, if we find any of these in it, what’s left over will be the ones we 
haven’t found? 

Of course. 428 

Therefore, as with any other four things, if we were looking for any one 
of them in something and recognized it first, that would be enough for us, 
but if we recognized the other three first, this itself would be sufficient to 
enable us to recognize what we are looking for. Clearly it couldn’t be 
anything other than what’s left over. 

That’s right. 

Therefore, since there are four virtues, mustn’t we look for them in the 
same way? 

Clearly. 

Now, the first thing I think I can see clearly in the city is wisdom, and 
there seems to be something odd about it. b 

What’s that? 

I think that the city we described is really wise. And that’s because it 
has good judgment, isn’t it? 

Yes. 

Now, this very thing, good judgment, is clearly some kind of knowledge, 
for it’s through knowledge, not ignorance, that people judge well. 

Clearly. 

But there are many kinds of knowledge in the city. 

Of course. 

Is it because of the knowledge possessed by its carpenters, then, that 
the city is to be called wise and sound in judgment? 

Not at all. It’s called skilled in carpentry because of that. с 

Then it isn’t (о be called wise because of the knowledge by which it 
arranges to have the best wooden implements. 

No, indeed. 

What about the knowledge of bronze items or the like? 

It isn’t because of any knowledge of that sort. 

Nor because of the knowledge of how to raise a harvest from the earth, 
for it’s called skilled in farming because of that. 

I should think so. 

Then, is there some knowledge possessed by some of the citizens in 
the city we just founded that doesn’t judge about any particular matter but 
about the city as a whole and the maintenance of good relations, both 
internally and with other cities? d 

There is indeed. 


104 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


What is this knowledge, and who has it? 

It is guardianship, and it is possessed by those rulers we just now called 
complete guardians. 

Then, what does this knowledge entitle you to say about the city? 

That it has good judgment and is really wise. 

Who do you think that there will be more of in our city, metal-workers 

e ог these true guardians? 

There will be far more metal-workers. 

Indeed, of all those who are called by a certain name because they have 
some kind of knowledge, aren’t the guardians the least numerous? 

By far. 

Then, a whole city established according to nature would be wise 
because of the smallest class and part in it, namely, the governing or ruling 
one. And to this class, which seems to be by nature the smallest, belongs 

429 a share of the knowledge that alone among all the other kinds of knowledge 
is to be called wisdom. 

That’s completely true. 

Then we’ve found one of the four virtues, as well as its place in the city, 
though I don’t know how we found it. 

Our way of finding it seems good enough to me. 

And surely courage and the part of the city it’s in, the part on account 
of which the city is called courageous, aren’t difficult to see. 

How is that? 

b Who, in calling the city cowardly or courageous, would look anywhere 
other than to the part of it that fights and does battle on its behalf? 

No one would look anywhere else. 

At any rate, I don’t think that the courage or cowardice of its other 
citizens would cause the city itself to be called either courageous or 
cowardly. 

No, it wouldn’t. 

The city is courageous, then, because of a part of itself that has the 
power to preserve through everything its belief about what things are to 

с бе feared, namely, that they are the things and kinds of things that the 
lawgiver declared to be such in the course of educating it. Or don’t you 
call that courage? 

I don’t completely understand what you mean. Please, say it again. 

I mean that courage is a kind of preservation. 

What sort of preservation? 

That preservation of the belief that has been inculcated by the law 
through education about what things and sorts of things are to be feared. 
And by preserving this belief “through everything,” I mean preserving it 

d and not abandoning it because of pains, pleasures, desires, or fears. If you 
like, ГІ compare it to something I think it resembles. 


BOOK Iv 428d-430d 105 


Га like that. 

You know that dyers, who want to dye wool purple, first pick out from 
the many colors of wool the one that is naturally white, then they carefully 
prepare this in various ways, so that it will absorb the color as well as 
possible, and only at that point do they apply the purple dye. When 
something is dyed in this way, the color is fast—no amount of washing, 
whether with soap or without it, can remove it. But you also know what 
happens to material if it hasn’t been dyed in this way, but instead is dyed 
purple or some other color without careful preparation. 

I know that it looks washed out and ridiculous. 

Then, you should understand that, as far as we could, we were doing 
something similar when we selected our soldiers and educated them in 
music and physical training. What we were contriving was nothing other 
than this: That because they had the proper nature and upbringing, they 
would absorb the laws in the finest possible way, just like a dye, so that 
their belief about what they should fear and all the rest would become 
so fast that even such extremely effective detergents as pleasure, pain, 
fear, and desire wouldn’t wash it out—and pleasure is much more potent 
than any powder, washing soda, or soap. This power to preserve through 
everything the correct and law-inculcated belief about what is to be 
feared and what isn’t is what І call courage, unless, of course, you say 
otherwise. 

І have nothing different to say, for I assume that you don’t consider the 
correct belief about these same things, which you find in animals and 
slaves, and which is not the result of education, to be inculcated by law, 
and that you don’t call it courage but something else. 

That’s absolutely true. 

Then І accept your account of courage. 

Accept it instead as my account of civic courage, and you will be right. 
We’ll discuss courage more fully some other time, if you like. At present, 
our inquiry concerns not it but justice. And what we’ve said is sufficient 
for that purpose. 

You're quite right. 

There are now two things left for us to find in the city, namely, modera- 
tion’ and—the goal of our entire inquiry—justice. 

That’s right. 

Is there a way we could find justice so as not to have to bother with 
moderation any further? 

I don’t know any, and I wouldn’t want justice to appear first if that 


7. The Greek term is séphrosune. It has a very wide meaning: self-control, good sense, 
reasonableness, temperence, and (in some contexts) chastity. Someone who keeps his 
head under pressure or temptation possesses séphrosune. 


430 


431 


106 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


means that we won’t investigate moderation. So if you want to please me, 
look for the latter first. 

Pm certainly willing. It would be wrong not to be. 

Look, then. 

We will. Seen from here, it is more like a kind of consonance and 
harmony than the previous ones. 

In what way? 

Moderation is surely a kind of order, the mastery of certain kinds of 
pleasures and desires. People indicate as much when they use the phrase 
“self-control” and other similar phrases. I don’t know just what they mean 
by them, but they are, so to speak, like tracks or clues that moderation has 
left behind in language. Isn’t that so? 

Absolutely. 

Yet isn’t the expression “self-control” ridiculous? The stronger self that 
does the controlling is the same as the weaker self that gets controlled, so 
that only one person is referred to in all such expressions. 

Of course. 

Nonetheless, the expression is apparently trying to indicate that, in the 
soul of that very person, there is a better part and a worse one and that, 
whenever the naturally better part is in control of the worse, this is 
expressed by saying that the person is self-controlled or master of himself. 
At any rate, one praises someone by calling him self-controlled. But when, 
on the other hand, the smaller and better part is overpowered by the 
larger, because of bad upbringing or bad company, this is called being 
self-defeated or licentious and is a reproach. 

Appropriately so. 

Take a look at our new city, and you'll find one of these in it. You'll say 
that it is rightly called self-controlled, if indeed something in which the 
better rules the worse is properly called moderate and self-controlled. 

I am looking, and what you say is true. 

Now, one finds all kinds of diverse desires, pleasures, and pains, mostly 
in children, women, household slaves, and in those of the inferior majority 
who are called free. 

That’s right. 

But you meet with the desires that are simple, measured, and directed 
by calculation in accordance with understanding and correct belief only 
in the few people who are born with the best natures and receive the best 
education. 

That’s true. 4 

Then, don’t you see that in your city, too, the desires of the inferior 
many are controlled by the wisdom and desires of the superior few? 

I do. 


BOOK IV 4304-4324 107 


Therefore, if any city is said to be in control of itself and of its pleasures 
and desires, it is this one. 

Absolutely. 

And isn’t it, therefore, also moderate because of all this? 

It is. 

And, further, if indeed the ruler and the ruled in any city share the 
same belief about who should rule, it is in this one. Or don’t you agree? 

I agree entirely. 

And when the citizens agree in this way, in which of them do you say 
moderation is located? In the ruler or the ruled? 

I suppose in both. 

Then, you see how right we were to divine that moderation resembles 
a kind of harmony? 

How so? 

Because, unlike courage and wisdom, each of which resides in one 
part, making the city brave and wise respectively, moderation spreads 
throughout the whole. It makes the weakest, the strongest, and those in 
between—whether in regard to reason, physical strength, numbers, 
wealth, or anything else—all sing the same song together. And this una- 
nimity, this agreement between the naturally worse and the naturally better 
as to which of the two is to rule both in the city and in each one, is rightly 
called moderation. 

I agree completely. 

All right. We’ve now found, at least from the point of view of our present 
beliefs, three out of the four virtues in our city. So what kind of virtue is 
left, then, that makes the city share even further in virtue? Surely, it’s clear 
that it is justice. 

That is clear. 

Then, Glaucon, we must station ourselves like hunters surrounding a 
wood and focus our understanding, so that justice doesn’t escape us and 
vanish into obscurity, for obviously it’s around here somewhere. So look 
and try eagerly to catch sight of it, and if you happen to see it before I do, 
you can tell me about it. 

I wish I could, but you'll make better use of me if you take me to be a 
follower who can see things when you point them out to him. 

Follow, then, and join me in a prayer. 

РІ do that, just so long as you lead. 

I certainly will, though the place seems to be impenetrable and full of 
shadows. It is certainly dark and hard to search though. But all the same, 
we must go on. 

Indeed we must. , 

And then I caught sight of something. Ah ha! Glaucon, it looks as 


2124 


108 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


though there’s a track here, so it seems that our quarry won’t altogether 
escape us. 

That’s good news. 

Either that, or we’ve just been stupid. 

In what way? 

Because what we are looking for seems to have been rolling around at 
our feet from the very beginning, and we didn’t see it, which was ridiculous 
of us. Just as people sometimes search for the very thing they are holding 

е іп their hands, so we didn’t look in the right direction but gazed off into 
the distance, and that’s probably why we didn’t notice it. 

What do you mean? 

I mean that, though we’ve been talking and hearing about it for a long 
time, I think we didn’t understand what we were saying or that, іп a way, 
we were talking about justice. 

That’s a long prelude for someone who wants to hear the answer. 

433 Then listen and see whether there’s anything in what I say. Justice, I 
think, is exactly what we said must be established throughout the city when 
we were founding it—either that or some form of it. We stated, and 
often repeated, if you remember, that everyone must practice one of the 
occupations in the city for which he is naturally best suited. 

Yes, we did keep saying that. 

Moreover, we’ve heard many people say and have often said ourselves 
that justice is doing one’s own work and not meddling with what isn’t 

b one’s own. 

Yes, we have. 

Then, it turns out that this doing one’s own work—provided that it 
comes to be in a certain way—is justice. And do you know what I take as 
evidence of this? 

No, tell me. 

I think that this is what was left over in the city when moderation, 
courage, and wisdom have been found. It is the power that makes it 
possible for them to grow in the city and that preserves them when they’ve 

с grown for as long as it remains there itself. And of course we said that 
justice would be what was left over when we had found the other three. 

Yes, that must be so. 

And surely, if we had to decide which of the four will make the city good 
by its presence, it would be a hard decision. Is it the agreement in belief 
between the rulers and the ruled? Or the preservation among the soldiers 
of the law-inspired belief about what is to be feared and what isn’t? Or the 

d wisdom and guardianship of the rulers? Or is it, above all, the fact that 
every child, woman, slave, freeman, craftsman, ruler, and ruled each does 
his own work and doesn’t meddle with what is other people’s? 


BOOK IV 4324-434с 109 


How could this fail to be a hard decision? 

It seems, then, that the power that consists in everyone’s doing his own 
work rivals wisdom, moderation, and courage in its contribution to the 
virtue of the city. е 

It certainly does. 

And wouldn’t you call this rival to the others in its contribution to the 
city’s virtue justice? 

Absolutely. 

Look at it this way if you want to be convinced. Won’t you order your 
rulers to act as judges in the city’s courts? 

Of course. 

And won't their sole aim in delivering judgments be that no citizen 
should have what belongs to another or be deprived of what is his own? 

They'll have no aim but that. 

Because that is just? 

Yes. 

Therefore, from this point of view also, the having and doing of one’s 
own would be accepted as justice. 434 

That’s right. 

Consider, then, and see whether you agree with me about this. If a 
carpenter attempts to do the work of a cobbler, or a cobbler that of a 
carpenter, or they exchange their tools or honors with one another, or if 
the same person tries to do both jobs, and all other such exchanges are 
made, do you think that does any great harm to the city? 

Not much. 

But I suppose that when someone, who is by nature a craftsman or 
some other kind of money-maker, is puffed up by wealth, or by having a 
majority of votes, or by his own strength, or by some other such thing, and 2 
attempts to enter the class of soldiers, or one of the unworthy soldiers 
tries to enter that of the judges and guardians, and these exchange their 
tools and honors, or when the same person tries to do all these things at 
once, then I think you’ll agree that these exchanges and this sort of 
meddling bring the city to ruin. 

Absolutely. 

Meddling and exchange between these three classes, then, is the great- 
est harm that can happen to the city and would rightly be called the worst 
thing someone could do to it. 2 

Exactly. 

And wouldn’t you say that the worst thing that someone could do to his 
city is injustice? 

Of course. , 

Then, that exchange and meddling is injustice. Or to put it the other 


110 SocrRATES/GLAUCON 


way around: For the money-making, auxiliary, and guardian classes each 
to do its own work in the city, is the opposite. That’s justice, isn’t it, and 
makes the city just? 

d I agree. Justice is that and nothing else. 

Let’s not take that as secure just yet, but if we find that the same form, 
when it comes to be in each individual person, is accepted as justice there 
as well, we can assent to it. What else can we say? But if that isn’t what 
we find, we must look for something else to be justice. For the moment, 
however, let’s complete the present inquiry. We thought that, if we first 
tried to observe justice in some larger thing that possessed it, this would 
make it easier to observe іп a single individual.* We agreed that this larger 
thing is a city, and so we established the best city we could, knowing well 

e that justice would be іп one that was good. So, let’s apply what has come 
to light in the city to an individual, and if it is accepted there, all will be 
well. But if something different is found in the individual, then we must 
go back and test that on the city. And if we do this, and compare them 

435 side by side, we might well make justice light up as if we were rubbing 
fire-sticks together. And, when it has come to light, we can get a secure 
grip on it for ourselves. 

You’re following the road we set, and we must do as you say. 

Well, then, are things called by the same name, whether they are bigger 
or smaller than one another, like or unlike with respect to that to which 
that name applies? 

Alike. 

Then a just man won’t differ at all from a just city in respect to the form 

b of justice; rather he’ll be like the city. 

He will. 

But a city was thought to be just when each of the three natural classes 
within it did its own work, and it was thought to be moderate, courageous, 
and wise because of certain other conditions and states of theirs. 

That’s true. 

Then, if an individual has these same three parts in his soul, we will 
expect him to be correctly called by the same names as the city if he has 

с е same conditions in them. 

Necessarily so. 

Then once again we’ve come upon an easy question, namely, does the 
soul have these three parts in it or not? 

It doesn’t look easy to me. Perhaps, Socrates, there’s some truth in the 
old saying that everything fine is difficult. 

Apparently so. But you should know, Glaucon, that, in my opinion, we 


8. See 368с-а. 


BOOK IV 434с-436с ШІ 


will never get a precise answer using our present methods of argument— 
although there is another longer and fuller road that does lead tosuchan 4 
answer. But perhaps we can get an answer that’s up to the standard of our 
previous statements and inquiries. 

Isn’t that satisfactory? It would be enough for me at present. 

In that case, it will be fully enough for me too. 

Then don’t weary, but go on with the inquiry. 

Well, then, we are surely compelled to agree that each of us has within 
himself the same parts and characteristics as the city? Where else would е 
they come from? It would be ridiculous for anyone to think that spiritedness 
didn’t come to be in cities from such individuals as the Thracians, Scythi- 
ans, and others who live to the north of us who are held to possess spirit, 
or that the same isn’t true of the love of learning, which is mostly associated 
with our part of the world, or of the love of money, which one might say 436 
is conspicuously displayed by the Phoenicians and Egyptians. 

It would. 

That’s the way it is, anyway, and it isn’t hard to understand. 

Certainly not. 

But this 5 hard. Do we do these things with the same part of ourselves, 
or do we do them with three different parts? Do we learn with one part, 
get angry with another, and with some third part desire the pleasures of 
food, drink, sex, and the others that are closely akin to them? Or, when 
we set out after something, do we act with the whole of our soul, in each 
case? This is what’s hard to determine іп a way that’s up to the standards % 
of our argument. 

I think so too. 

Well, then, let’s try to determine in that way whether these parts are 
the same or different. 

How? 

It is obvious that the same thing will not be willing to do or undergo 
opposites in the same part of itself, in relation to the same thing, at the 
same time. So, if we ever find this happening in the soul, we’ll know that 
we aren’t dealing with one thing but many. С 

АП right. 

Then consider what Pm about to say. 

Say on. 

Is it possible for the same thing to stand still and move at the same time 
in the same part of itself? 

Not at all. 

Let’s make our agreement more precise in order to avoid disputes later 
on. If someone said that a-person who is standing still but moving his 
hands and head is moving and standing still at the same time, we wouldn’t 


HOE 


d 


112 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


consider, I think, that he ought to put it like that. What he ought to say 
is that one part of the person is standing still and another part is moving. 
Isn’t that so? 

It is. 

And if our interlocutor became even more amusing and was sophisti- 
cated enough to say that whole spinning tops stand still and move at the 
same time when the peg is fixed in the same place and they revolve, and 
that the same is true of anything else moving in a circular motion on the 
same spot, we wouldn’t agree, because it isn’t with respect to the same 
parts of themselves that such things both stand still and move. We’d say 
that they have an axis and a circumference and that with respect to the 
axis they stand still, since they don’t wobble to either side, while with 
respect to the circumference they move in a circle. But if they do wobble 
to the left or right, front or back, while they are spinning, we’d say that 
they aren’t standing still in any way. 

And we’d be right. 

No such statement will disturb us, then, or make us believe that the 
same thing can be, do, or undergo opposites, at the same time, in the same 
respect, and in relation to the same thing. 

They won’t make me believe it, at least. 

Nevertheless, in order to avoid going through all these objections one 
by one and taking a long time to prove them all untrue, let’s hypothesize 
that this is correct and carry on. But we agree that if it should ever be 
shown to be incorrect, all the consequences we’ve drawn from it will also 
be lost. 

We should agree to that. 

Then wouldn’t you consider all the following, whether they are doings 
or undergoings, as pairs of opposites: Assent and dissent, wanting to have 
something and rejecting it, taking something and pushing it away? 

Yes, they are opposites. 

What about these? Wouldn’t you include thirst, hunger, the appetites 
as a whole, and wishing and willing somewhere in the class we mentioned? 
Wouldn’t you say that the soul of someone who has an appetite for a thing 
wants what he has an appetite for and takes to himself what it is his will 
to have, and that insofar as he wishes something to be given to him, his 
soul, since it desires this to come about, nods assent to it as if in answer 
to a question? 

I would. 

What about not willing, not wishing, and not having an appetite? Aren’t 
these among the very opposites—cases in which the soul pushes and drives 
things away? 

Of course. 


BOOK IV 436c-438b 113 


Then won’t we say that there is a class of things called appetites and 
that the clearest examples are hunger and thirst? 

We will. 

One of these is for food and the other for drink? 

Yes. 

Now, insofar as it is thirst, is it an appetite in the soul for more than 
that for which we say that it is the appetite? For example, is thirst thirst 
for hot drink or cold, or much drink or little, or, in a word, for drink of 
a certain sort? Or isn’t it rather that, where heat is present as well as thirst, 
it causes the appetite to be for something cold as well, and where cold for 
something hot, and where there is much thirst because of the presence of 
muchness, it will cause the desire to be for much, and where little for 
little? But thirst itself will never be for anything other than what it is in its 
nature to be for, namely, drink itself, and hunger for food. 

That’s the way it is, each appetite itself is only for its natural object, 
while the appetite for something of a certain sort depends on additions. 


Therefore, let no one catch us unprepared or disturb us by claiming 438 


that no one has an appetite for drink but rather good drink, nor food but 
good food, on the grounds that everyone after all has appetite for good 
things, so that if thirst is an appetite, it will be an appetite for good drink 
or whatever, and similarly with the others.’ 

All the same, the person who says that has a point. 

But it seems to me that, in the case of all things that are related to 
something, those that are of a particular sort are related to a particular 
sort of thing, while those that are merely themselves are related to a thing 
that is merely itself. 

I don’t understand. 

Don’t you understand that the greater is such as to be greater than 
something? 

Of course. 

Than the less? 

Yes. 

And the much greater than the much less, isn’t that so? 

Yes. 

And the once greater to the once less? And the going-to-be greater than 
the going-to-be less? 

Certainly. 

And isn’t the same true of the more and the fewer, the double and the 


9. Plato is here laying the foundations for his rejection of the principle, espoused by 
Socrates in many earlier dialogues, that weakness of will is impossible. See Introduction 


pa 


b 


114 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


с Ма! heavier and lighter, faster and slower, the hot and the cold, and all 
other such things? 

Of course. 

And what about the various kinds of knowledge? Doesn’t the same 
apply? Knowledge itself is knowledge of what can be learned itself (or 
whatever it is that knowledge is of), while a particular sort of knowledge 
is of a particular sort of thing. For example, when knowledge of building 

d houses came to be, didn’t it differ from the other kinds of knowledge, and 
so was called knowledge of building? 

Of course. 

And wasn’t that because it was a different sort of knowledge from all 
the others? 

Yes. 

And wasn’t it because it was of a particular sort of thing that it itself 
became a particular sort of knowledge? And isn’t this true of all crafts and 
kinds of knowledge? 

It is. 

Well, then, this is what I was trying to say—if you understand it now— 
when I said that of all things that are related to something, those that are 
merely themselves are related to things that are merely themselves, while 
those that are of a particular sort are related to things of a particular sort. 

e However, I don’t mean that the sorts in question have to be the same for 
them both. For example, knowledge of health or disease isn’t healthy or 
diseased, and knowledge of good and bad doesn’t itself become good or 
bad. I mean that, when knowledge became, not knowledge of the thing 
itself that knowledge is of, but knowledge of something of a particular 
sort, the result was that it itself became a particular sort of knowledge, 
and this caused it to be no longer called knowledge without qualification, 
but—with the addition of the relevant sort—medical knowledge or 
whatever. 

I understand, and I think that that’s the way it is. 

Then as for thirst, wouldn’t you include it among things that are related 

439 to something? Surely thirst is related о... 

I know it’s related to drink. 

Therefore a particular sort of thirst is for a particular sort of drink. But 
thirst itself isn’t for much or little, good or bad, or, in a word, for drink 
of a particular sort. Rather, thirst itself is in its nature only for drink itself. 

Absolutely. 

Hence the soul of the thirsty person, insofar as he’s thirsty, doesn’t wish 

6 anything else but to drink, and it wants this and is impelled towards it. 

Clearly. 

Therefore, if something draws it back when it is thirsting, wouldn’t that 


BOOK IV 438с-440а ІШЕ 


be something different in it from whatever thirsts and drives it like a beast 
to drink? It can’t be, we say, that the same thing, with the same part of 
itself, in relation to the same, at the same time, does opposite things. 

No, it can’t. 

In the same way, I suppose, it’s wrong to say of the archer that his hands 
at the same time push the bow away and draw it towards him. We ought 
to say that one hand pushes it away and the other draws it towards him. 

Absolutely. 

Now, would we assert that sometimes there are thirsty people who don’t 
wish to drink? 

Certainly, it happens often to many different people. 

What, then, should one say about them? Isn’t it that there is something 
in their soul, bidding them to drink, and something different, forbidding 
them to do so, that overrules the thing that bids? 

I think so. 

Doesn’t that which forbids in such cases come into play—if it comes 
into play at all—as a result of rational calculation, while what drives and 
drags them to drink is a result of feelings and diseases? 

Apparently. 

Hence it isn’t unreasonable for us to claim that they are two, and 
different from one another. We’ll call the part of the soul with which it 
calculates the rational part and the part with which it lusts, hungers, thirsts, 
and gets excited by other appetites the irrational appetitive part, companion 
of certain indulgences and pleasures. 

Yes. Indeed, that’s a reasonable thing to think. 

Then, let these two parts be distinguished in the soul. Now, is the 
spirited part by which we get angry a third part or is it of the same nature 
as either of the other two? 

Perhaps it’s like the appetitive part. 

But I’ve heard something relevant to this, and I believe it. Leontius, the 
son of Aglaion, was going up from the Piraeus along the outside of the 
North Wall when he saw some corpses lying at the executioner’s feet. He 
had an appetite to look at them but at the same time he was disgusted and 
turned away. For a time he struggled with himself and covered his face, 
but, finally, overpowered by the appetite, he pushed his eyes wide open 
and rushed towards the corpses, saying, “Look for yourselves, you evil 
wretches, take your fill of the beautiful sight!”"® 

Гуе heard that story myself. 


10. Leontius’ desire to look at the corpses is sexual in nature, for a fragment of 
contemporary comedy tells us that Leontius was known for his love of boys as pale as 


corpses. 


440 


441 


116 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


It certainly proves that anger sometimes makes war against the appetites, 
as one thing against another. 

Besides, don’t we often notice in other cases that when appetite forces 
someone contrary to rational calculation, he reproaches himself and gets 
angry with that in him that’s doing the forcing, so that of the two factions 
that are fighting a civil war, so to speak, spirit allies itself with reason? But 
І don’t think you can say that you’ve ever seen spirit, either in yourself or 
anyone else, ally itself with an appetite to do what reason has decided must 
not be done. 

No, by god, I haven’t. 

What happens when a person thinks that he has done something unjust? 
Isn’t it true that the nobler he is, the less he resents it if he suffers hunger, 
cold, or the like at the hands of someone whom he believes to be inflicting 
this on him justly, and won’t his spirit, as I say, refuse to be aroused? 

That’s true. 

But what happens if, instead, he believes that someone has been unjust 
to him? Isn’t the spirit within him boiling and angry, fighting for what he 
believes to be just? Won’t it endure hunger, cold, and the like and keep 
on till it is victorious, not ceasing from noble actions until it either wins, 
dies, or calms down, called to heel by the reason within him, like a dog 
by a shepherd? 

Spirit is certainly like that. And, of course, we made the auxiliaries in 
our city like dogs obedient to the rulers, who are themselves like shepherds 
of a city. 

You well understand what I’m trying to say. But also reflect on this 
further point. 

What? 

The position of the spirited part seems to be the opposite of what we 
thought before. Then we thought of it as something appetitive, but now 
we say that it is far from being that, for in the civil war in the soul it aligns 
itself far more with the rational part. 

Absolutely. 

Then is it also different from the rational part, or is it some form of it, 
so that there are two parts in the soul—the rational and the appetitive— 
instead of three? Or rather, just as there were three classes in the city that 
held it together, the money-making, the auxiliary, and the deliberative, is 
the spirited part a third thing in the soul that is by nature the helper 
of the rational part, provided that it hasn’t been corrupted by a bad 
upbringing? 

It must be a third. 

Yes, provided that we can show it is different from the rational part, as 
we saw earlier it was from the appetitive one. 


ta 


BOOK Iv 440а-441е 117 


It isn’t difficult to show that it is different. Even in small children, one 
can see that they are full of spirit right from birth, while as far as rational 
calculation is concerned, some never seem to get a share of it, while the 
majority do so quite late. 

That’s really well put. And in animals too one can see that what you say 
is true. Besides, our earlier quotation from Homer bears it out, where he 
says, 


He struck his chest and spoke to his heart." 


For here Homer clearly represents the part that has calculated about better 
and worse as different from the part that is angry without calculation. 

That’s exactly right. 

Well, then, we’ve now made our difficult way through a sea of argument. 
We are pretty much agreed that the same number and the same kinds of 
classes as are in the city are also in the soul of each individual. 

That’s true. 

Therefore, it necessarily follows that the individual is wise in the same 
way and in the same part of himself as the city. 

That’s right. 

And isn’t the individual courageous in the same way and in the same 
part of himself as the city? And isn’t everything else that has to do with 
virtue the same in both? 

Necessarily. 

Moreover, Glaucon, I suppose we’ll say that a man is just in the same 
way as a City. 

That too is entirely necessary. 

And we surely haven’t forgotten that the city was just because each of 
the three classes in it was doing its own work. 

I don’t think we could forget that. 

Then we must also remember that each one of us in whom each part 
is doing its own work will himself be just and do his own. 

Of course, we must. 

Therefore, isn’t it appropriate for the rational part to rule, since it is 
really wise and exercises foresight on behalf of the whole soul, and for the 
spirited part to obey it and be its ally? 

It certainly is. 

And isn’t it, as we were saying, a mixture of music and poetry, on the 
one hand, and physical training, on the other, that makes the two parts 
harmonious, stretching and nurturing the rational part with fine words 


11. See 390d. 


442 


118 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


and learning, relaxing the other part through soothing stories, and making 
it gentle by means of harmony and rhythm? 

That’s precisely it. 

And these two, having been nurtured in this way, and having truly 
learned their own roles and been educated in them, will govern the 
appetitive part, which is the largest part in each person’s soul and is by 
nature most insatiable for money. They’ll watch over it to see that it isn’t 
filled with the so-called pleasures of the body and that it doesn’t become 
so big and strong that it no longer does its own work but attempts to 
enslave and rule over the classes it isn’t fitted to rule, thereby overturning 
everyone’s whole life. 

That’s right. 

Then, wouldn’t these two parts also do the finest job of guarding the 
whole soul and body against external enemies—reason by planning, spirit 
by fighting, following its leader, and carrying out the leader’s decisions 
through its courage? 

Yes, that’s true. 

And it is because of the spirited part, I suppose, that we call a single 
individual courageous, namely, when it preserves through pains and plea- 
sures the declarations of reason about what is to be feared and what isn’t. 

That’s right. 

And we’ll call him wise because of that small part of himself that rules 
in him and makes those declarations and has within it the knowledge of 
what is advantageous for each part and for the whole soul, which is the 
community of all three parts. 

Absolutely. 

And isn’t he moderate because of the friendly and harmonious relations 
between these same parts, namely, when the ruler and the ruled believe 
in common that the rational part should rule and don’t engage in civil war 
against it? 

Moderation is surely nothing other than that, both in the city and in the 
individual. 

And, of course, a person will be just because of what we’ve so often 
mentioned, and in that way. 

Necessarily. 

Well, then, is the justice in us at all indistinct? Does it seem to be 
something different from what we found in the city? 

It doesn’t seem so to me. 

If there are still any doubts in our soul about this, we could dispel them 
altogether by appealing to ordinary cases. 

Which ones? 

For example, if we had to come to an agreement about whether someone 


BOOK Iv 441е-443е 119 


similar in nature and training to our city had embezzled a deposit of gold 
or silver that he had accepted, who do you think would consider him to 
have done it rather than someone who isn’t like him? 

No one. 

And would he have anything to do with temple robberies, thefts, betray- 
als of friends in private life or of cities in public life? 

No, nothing. 

And he’d be in no way untrustworthy in keeping an oath or other 
agreement. 

How could he be? 

And adultery, disrespect for parents, and neglect of the gods would be 
more in keeping with every other kind of character than his. 

With every one. 

And isn’t the cause of all this that every part within him does its own 
work, whether it’s ruling or being ruled? 

Yes, that and nothing else. 

Then, are you still looking for justice to be something other than this 
power, the one that produces men and cities of the sort we’ve described? 

No, I certainly am not. 

Then the dream we had has been completely fulfilled—our suspicion 
that, with the help of some god, we had hit upon the origin and pattern 
of justice right at the beginning in founding our city.” 

Absolutely. 

Indeed, Glaucon, the principle that it is right for someone who is by 
nature a cobbler to practice cobblery and nothing else, for the carpenter 
to practice carpentry, and the same for the others is a sort of image of 
justice—that’s why it’s beneficial. 

Apparently. 

And in truth justice is, it seems, something of this sort. However, it isn’t 
concerned with someone’s doing his own externally, but with what is inside 
him, with what is truly himself and his own. One who is just does not 
allow any part of himself to do the work of another part or allow the various 
classes within him to meddle with each other. He regulates well what is 
really his own and rules himself. He puts himself in order, is his own 
friend, and harmonizes the three parts of himself like three limiting notes 
in a musical scale—high, low, and middle. He binds together those parts 
and any others there may be in between, and from having been many 
things he becomes entirely one, moderate and harmonious. Only then 
does he act. And when he does anything, whether acquiring wealth, taking 
care of his body, engaging in politics, or in private contracts—in all of 


12. See 432c—433b. 


443 


120 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


these, he believes that the action is just and fine that preserves this inner 
harmony and helps achieve it, and calls it so, and regards as wisdom the 
knowledge that oversees such actions. And he believes that the action that 

444 destroys this harmony is unjust, and calls it so, and regards the belief that 
oversees it as ignorance. 

That’s absolutely true, Socrates. 

Well, then, if we claim to have found the just man, the just city, and 
what the justice is that is in them, I don’t suppose that we’ll seem to be 
telling a complete falsehood. 

No, we certainly won’t. 

Shall we claim it, then? 

We shall. 

So be it. Now, I suppose we must look for injustice. 

Clearly. 

b Surely, it must be a kind of civil war between the three parts, a meddling 
and doing of another’s work, a rebellion by some part against the whole 
soul in order to rule it inappropriately. The rebellious part is by nature 
suited to be a slave, while the other part is not a slave but belongs to the 
ruling class. We’ll say something like that, I suppose, and that the turmoil 
and straying of these parts are injustice, licentiousness, cowardice, igno- 
rance, and, in a word, the whole of vice. 

That’s what they are. 

So, if justice and injustice are really clear enough to us, then acting 

c justly, acting unjustly, and doing injustice are also clear. 

How so? 

Because just and unjust actions are no different for the soul than healthy 
and unhealthy things are for the body. 

In what way? 

Healthy things produce health, unhealthy ones disease. 

Yes. 

And don’t just actions produce justice in the soul and unjust ones 

d injustice? 

Necessarily. 

To produce health is to establish the components of the body in a 
natural relation of control and being controlled, one by another, while to 
produce disease is to establish a relation of ruling and being ruled contrary 
to nature. 

That’s right. 

Then, isn’t to produce justice to establish the parts of the soul in a 
natural relation of control, one by another, while to produce injustice is 
to establish a relation of ruling and being ruled contrary to nature? 

Precisely. 


BOOK IV 443е-445е ІІ 


Virtue seems, then, to be a kind of health, fine condition, and well- 
being of the soul, while vice is disease, shameful condition, and weakness. 

That’s true. 

And don’t fine ways of living lead one to the possession of virtue, 
shameful ones to vice? 

Necessarily. 

So it now remains, it seems, to enquire whether it is more profitable to 
act justly, live in a fine way, and be just, whether one is known to be so 
or not, or to act unjustly and be unjust, provided that one doesn’t pay the 
penalty and become better as a result of punishment. 

But, Socrates, this inquiry looks ridiculous to me now that justice and 
injustice have been shown to be as we have described. Even if one has 
every kind of food and drink, lots of money, and every sort of power to 
rule, life is thought to be not worth living when the body’s nature is ruined. 
So even if someone can do whatever he wishes, except what will free him 
from vice and injustice and make him acquire justice and virtue, how can 
it be worth living when his soul—the very thing by which he lives—is 
ruined and in turmoil? 

Yes, it is ridiculous. Nevertheless, now that we’ve come far enough to 
be able to see most clearly that this is so, we mustn’t give up. 

That’s absolutely the last thing we must do. 

Then come here, so that you can see how many forms of vice there are, 
anyhow that I consider worthy of examination. 

Pm following you, just tell me. 

Well, from the vantage point we’ve reached in our argument, it seems 
to me that there is one form of virtue and an unlimited number of forms 
of vice, four of which are worth mentioning. 

How do you mean? 

It seems likely that there are as many types of soul as there are specific 
types of political constitution. 

How many is that? 

Five forms of constitution and five of souls. 

What are they? 

One is the constitution we’ve been describing. And it has two names. 
If one outstanding man emerges among the rulers, it’s called a kingship; 
if more than one, it’s called an aristocracy. 

That’s true. 

Therefore, І say that this is one form of constitution. Whether one man 
emerges or many, none of the significant laws of the city would be changed, 
if they followed the upbringing and education we described. 

Probably not. 2 


ОЛ 


Воок У 


Book V continues the discussion of virtue and vice in souls and cities that was 
begun at the end of Book IV. But it is immediately interrupted by Polemarchus 
and the other interlocutors, all of whom want Socrates to explain the remark he 
made in passing at 423e-424a about the guardians possessing their wives and 
children in common. Socrates’ lengthy response to their request occupies the 
majority of the book (451-4710. In it he makes the revolutionary proposal that 
children should be brought up by the city rather than by their biological parents, 
and that men and women with the same natural ability should receive the same 
education and training and do the same kind of work. Hence there will be female 
guardians and rulers in the kallipolis, as well as male ones. Many of Socrates’ 
remarks suggest that these proposals apply to everyone in the kallipolis, not just 
to the guardians (e.g. 455e), but there are other indications (e. 6. 4500) that they 
apply only to the guardians alone. It must be admitted that Plato has not been 
as explicit and clear on this matter as we might wish. 

Glaucon agrees that a city of the sort Socrates has described would be the best 
one, but he wonders whether or not it could ever really come about (471с-е). 
After some important clarification of the nature of the task (472a—473 с), Socrates 
undertakes to show that it could. The smallest change that would transform an 
already existing city into the kallipolis is if its kings or rulers become philosophers 
or if philosophers become its kings or rulers (473c-e). This proposal, Socrates 
thinks, 15 likely to produce even more outrage than those about women and 
children (4732), but he thinks that outrage will subside when he explains what 
true philosophers are really like (474b-0). 

The remainder of Book V is occupied by the beginning of Socrates’ portrait of 
these philosophers, which consists of a complex argument intended to show that 
only they can have access to forms and that without such access knowledge is 
impossible (474с-480а). 


This is the kind of city and constitution, then, that I call good and correct, 

449 and so too is this kind of man. And_if indeed this is the correct kind, 

all the others—whether as city governments or as organizations of the 

individual soul—are bad and mistaken. Their badness is of four kinds. 
What are they? he said. 


122 


BOOK V 449a-450b 123 


I was going to enumerate them and explain how I thought they developed 
out of one another,' but Polemarchus, who was sitting a little further away 
than Adeimantus, extended his hand and took hold of the latter’s cloak by 
the shoulder from above. He drew Adeimantus towards him, while he 
himself leaned forward and said something to him. We overheard nothing 
of what he said except the words “Shall we let it go, or what?” 

We certainly won’t let it go, Adeimantus said, now speaking aloud. 

And I asked: What is it that you won’t let go? 

You, he said. 

For what reason in particular? 

We think that you’re slacking off and that you’ve cheated us out of a 
whole important section of the discussion in order to avoid having to deal 
with it. You thought we wouldn’t notice when you said—as though it were 
something trivial—that, as regards wives and children, anyone could see 
that the possessions of friends should be held in common.’ 

But isn’t that right, Adeimantus? 

Yes it is. But this “right,” like the other things we’ve discussed, requires 
an explanation—in this case, an explanation of the manner in which they 
are to be held in common, for there may be many ways of doing this. So 
don’t omit telling us about the particular one you mean. We’ve been 
waiting for some time, indeed, for you to tell us about the production of 
children—how they’ll be produced and, once born, how they’ll be brought 
up—and about the whole subject of having wives and children in common. 
We think that this makes a considerable difference—indeed all the differ- 
ence—to whether a constitution is correct or not. So now, since you 
are beginning to describe another constitution before having adequately 
discussed these things, we are resolved, as you overheard, not to let you 
off until you explain all this as fully as the rest. 

Include me, Glaucon said, as a partner in this resolution. 

In fact, Socrates, Thrasymachus added, you can take this as the resolu- 
tion of all of us. 

What a thing you’ve done, I said, in stopping me! What an argument 
you’ve started up again from the very beginning, as it were, about the 
constitution! I was delighted to think that it had already been described 
and was content to have these things accepted as they were stated before. 
You don’t realize what a swarm of arguments you’ve stirred up by calling 
me to account now. І saw the swarm and passed the topic by in order to 
save us a lot of trouble. 


1. This task is taken up in Book VIII. 
2. See 423е—424а. 


450 


451 


124 "THRASYMACHUS/SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


Well, said Thrasymachus, аге we here to search for gold’ or to listen 
to an argument? 

The latter, I said, but within reason. 

It’s within reason, Socrates, Glaucon said, for people with any under- 
standing to listen to an argument of this kind their whole life long. So 
don’t mind about us, and don’t get tired yourself. Rather, tell us at length 
what your thoughts are on the topic we inquired about, namely, what the 
common possession of wives and children will amount to for the guardians 
and how the children will be brought up while they’re still small, for the 
time between birth and the beginning of education seems to be the most 
difficult period of all. So try to tell us what the manner of this upbringing 
must be. 

It isn’t an easy subject to explain, for it raises even more incredulity 
than the topics we’ve discussed so far. People may not believe that what 
we say is possible or that, even if it could be brought about, it would be 
for the best. It’s for this reason that I hesitated to bring it up, namely, that 
our argument might seem to be no more than wishful thinking. 

Then don’t hesitate, for your audience isn’t inconsiderate, incredulous, 
or hostile. 

Are you trying to encourage me by saying that? 

I am. 

Well, you’re doing the opposite. Your encouragement would be fine, if 
1 could be sure I was speaking with knowledge, for one can feel both 
secure and confident when one knows the truth about the dearest and 
most important things and speaks about them among those who are 
themselves wise and dear friends. But to speak, as Pm doing, at a time 
when one is unsure of oneself and searching for the truth, is a frightening 
and insecure thing to do. I’m not afraid of being laughed at—that would 
be childish indeed. But I am afraid that, if I slip from the truth, just where 
it’s most important not to, PII not only fall myself but drag my friends 
down as well. So I bow to Adrasteia* for what Рт going to say, for I 
suspect that it’s a lesser crime to kill someone involuntarily than to mislead 
people about fine, good, and just institutions. Since it’s better to run this 
risk among enemies than among friends, you’ve well and truly encouraged 
me! 


3. Literally: to refine gold. A proverbial expression applied to those who neglect the 
task at hand for some more fascinating but less profitable pursuit. Thrasymachus seems 
to be reminding Socrates of his own words-at 336e. 


4. Adrasteia was a kind of Nemesis, a punisher of pride and proud words. The “bow 


to Adrasteia” is therefore a kind of apology for the kind of act or statement that might 
otherwise spur her to take action. 


BOOK V 450b-452a 125 


Glaucon laughed and said: Well, Socrates, if we suffer from any false 
note you strike in the argument, we’ll release you and absolve you of any 
guilt as in a homicide case: your hands are clean, and you have not deceived 
us. So take courage and speak. 

I will, for the law says that someone who kills involuntarily is free of 
guilt when he’s absolved by the injured party.’ So it’s surely reasonable to 
think the same is true in my case as well. 

With that as your defense, speak. 

Then ГІП have to go back to what should perhaps have been said in c 
sequence, although it may be that this way of doing things is in fact right 
and that after the completion of the male drama, so to speak, we should 
then go through the female опе -евресізі as you insist on it so urgently. 

For men born and educated as we’ve described there is, in my opinion, 
no right way to acquire and use women and children other than by 
following the road on which we started them. We attempted, in the 
argument, to set up the men as guardians of the herd.’ 

Yes. 

Then let’s give them a birth and rearing consistent with that and see 4 
whether it suits us or not. 

How? 

As follows: Do we think that the wives of our guardian watchdogs should 
guard what the males guard, hunt with them, and do everything else in 
common with them? Or should we keep the women at home, as incapable 
of doing this, since they must bear and rear the puppies, while the males 
work and have the entire care of the flock? 

Everything should be in common, except that the females are weaker е 
and the males stronger. 

And is it possible to use any animals for the same things if you don’t 
give them the same upbringing and education? 

No, it isn’t. 

Therefore, if we use the women for the same things as the men, they 
must also be taught the same things. 

Yes. 22 


5. See Plato, Laws 869е. 

6. This may be an allusion to the mimes of Sophron of Syracuse (с. 470-400 
в.С.), which were classified as male mimes and female mimes, because males were 
represented in the former, females in the latter. 

7. Itis useful to contrast Plato’s views on women with those of his contemporaries in 
Athens. The most reliable brief discussion of the latter is John Gould, “Law, Custom 
and Myth: Aspects of the Social Position of Women in Classical Athens,” Journal of 
Hellenic Studies 100 (1980): 38-59. 


126 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


Now, we gave the men music and poetry and physical training. 

Yes. 

Then we must give these two crafts, as well as those having to do with 
warfare, to the women also to use in the same way as the men use them. 

That seems to follow from what you say. 

But perhaps much of what we are saying, since it is contrary to custom, 
would incite ridicule if it were carried out in practice as we’ve described. 

It certainly would. 

What is the most ridiculous thing that you see in it? Isn’t it obviously 
the women exercising naked in the palestras? with the men? And not just 
the young women, but the older ones too—like old men in gymnasiums 

b who, even though their bodies are wrinkled and not pleasant to look at, 
still love to do physical training. 

Yes, that would look really ridiculous as things stand at present. 

But surely, now that we’ve started to speak about this, we mustn’t fear 
the various jokes that wits will make about this kind of change in music 
and poetry, physical training, and—last but not least—in bearing arms 

с and riding horses. 

You're right. 

And now that we’ve begun to speak about this, we must move on to the 
tougher part of the law, begging these péople not to be silly (though that 
is their own work!) but to take the matter seriously. They should remember 
that it wasn’t very long ago that the Greeks themselves thought it shameful 
and ridiculous (as the majority of the barbarians still do) for even men to 
be seen naked and that when the Cretans and then the Lacedaemonians 
began the gymnasiums, the wits of those times could also have ridiculed 

а it all. Or don’t you think so? 

I do. 

But I think that, after it was found in practice to be better to strip than 
to cover up all those parts, then what was ridiculous to the eyes faded 
away in the face of what argument showed to be the best. This makes it 
clear that it’s foolish to think that anything besides the bad is ridiculous 
or to try to raise a laugh at the sight of anything besides what’s stupid or 

е бай or (putting it the other way around) it’s foolish to take seriously any 
standard of what is fine and beautiful other than the good. 

That’s absolutely certain. 

However, mustn’t we first agree about whether our proposals are possi- 
ble or not? And mustn’t we give to anyone who wishes the opportunity to 
question us—whether in jest or in earnest—about whether female human 

453 nature can share all the tasks of that of the male, or none of them, or some 


8. A palestra is a wrestling school and training ground. 


BOOK V 452a-453e 127 


but not others, and to ask in which class the waging of war belongs? 
Wouldn’t this, as the best beginning, also be likely to result in the best 
conclusion? 

Of course. 

Shall we give the argument against ourselves, then, on behalf of those 
who share these reservations, so that their side of the question doesn’t fall 
by default? 

There’s no reason not to. 

Then let’s say this on their behalf: “Socrates and Glaucon, there’s no 
need for others to argue with you, for you yourselves, when you began to 
found your city, agreed that each must do his own work in accordance 
with his nature.” 

And I think we certainly did agree to that. 

“Can you deny that a woman is by nature very different from a man?” 

Of course not. 

“And isn’t it appropriate to assign different work to each in accordance 
with its nature?” 

Certainly. 

“How is it, then, that you aren’t mistaken and contradicting yourselves 
when you say that men and women must do the same things, when their 
natures are so completely separate and distinct?” 

Do you have any defense against that attack? 

It isn’t easy to think of one on the spur of the moment, so ГІ ask you 
to explain the argument on our side as well, whatever it is. 

This and many other such things, Glaucon, which I foresaw earlier, 
were what I was afraid of, so that I hesitated to tackle the law concerning 
the possession and upbringing of women and children. 

By god, it doesn’t seem to be an easy topic. 

It isn’t. But the fact is that whether someone falls into a small diving 
pool or into the middle of the biggest ocean, he must swim all the same. 

He certainly must. 

Then we must swim too, and try to save ourselves from the sea of 
argument, hoping that a dolphin will pick us up or that we’ll be rescued 
by some other desperate means.’ 

It seems so. 

Come, then. Let’s see if we can find a way out. We’ve agreed that 
different natures must follow different ways of life and that the natures of 
men and women are different. But now we say that those different natures 
must follow the same way of life. Isn’t that the accusation brought against 


us? 


9. See Herodotus, Histories 1.23-24 for the story of Arion’s rescue by the dolphin. 


454 


128 GLAUCON/ SOCRATES 


That’s it exactly. 

Ah! Glaucon, great is the power of the craft of disputation. 

Why is that? 

Because many fall into it against their wills. They think they are having 
not a quarrel but a conversation, because they are unable to examine what 
has been said by dividing it up according to forms. Hence, they pursue 
mere verbal contradictions of what has been said and have a quarrel rather 
than a conversation. 

That does happen to lots of people, but it isn’t happening to us at the 
moment, is it? 

It most certainly is, for it looks to me, at any rate, as though we are 
falling into disputation against our will. 

How? 

Were bravely, but in a quarrelsome and merely verbal fashion, pursuing 
the principle that natures that aren’t the same must follow different ways 
of life. But when we assigned different ways of life to different natures 
and the same ones to the same, we didn’t at all examine the form of natural 
difference and sameness we had in mind or in what regard we were 
distinguishing them. 

No, we didn’t look into that. 

Therefore, we might just as well, it seems, ask ourselves whether the 
natures of bald and long-haired men are the same or opposite. And, when 
we agree that they are opposite, then, if the bald ones are cobblers, we 
ought to forbid the long-haired ones to be cobblers, and if the long-haired 
ones are cobblers, we ought to forbid this to the bald ones. 

That would indeed be ridiculous. 

And aren’t we in this ridiculous position because at that time we did 
not introduce every form of difference and sameness in nature, but focused 
on the one form of sameness and difference that was relevant to the 
particular ways of life themselves? We meant, for example, that a male 
and female doctor have souls of the same nature. Or don’t you think so? 

I do. 

But a doctor and a carpenter have different ones? 

Completely different, surely. 

Therefore, if the male sex is seen to be different from the female with 
regard to a particular craft or way of life, we'll say that the relevant one 
must be assigned to it. But if it’s apparent that they differ only in this 
respect, that the females bear children while the males beget them, we’ll 
say that there has been no kind of proof that women are different from 
men with respect to what we’re talking about, and we’ll continue to believe 
that our guardians and their wives must have the same way of life. 

And rightly so. 

Next, we’ll tell anyone who holds the opposite view to instruct us in 


BOOK у 453e-456a 129 


this: With regard to what craft or way of life involved in the constitution 
of the city are the natures of men and women not the same but different? 

That’s a fair question, at any rate. 

And perhaps he’d say, just as you did a moment ago, that it isn’t easy 
to give an immediate answer, but with enough consideration it should not 
be difficult. 

Yes, he might say that. 

Shall we ask the one who raises this objection to follow us and see 
whether we can show him that no way of life concerned with the manage- 
ment of the city is peculiar to women? 

Of course. 

“Come, now,” we’ll say to him, “give us an answer: Is this what you 
meant by one person being naturally well suited for something and another 
being naturally unsuited? That the one learned it easily, the other with 
difficulty; that the one, after only a brief period of instruction, was able to 
find out things for himself, while the other, after much instruction, couldn’t 
even remember what he’d learned; that the body of the one adequately 
served his thought, while the body of the other opposed his. Are there any 
other things besides these by which you distinguished those who are 
naturally well suited for anything from those who are not?” 

No one will claim that there are any others. 

Do you know of anything practiced by human beings in which the male 
sex isn’t superior to the female in all these ways? Or must we make a long 
story of it by mentioning weaving, baking cakes, and cooking vegetables, 
in which the female sex is believed to excel and in which it is most 
ridiculous of all for it to be inferior? 

It’s true that one sex is much superior to the other in pretty well 
everything, although many women are better than many men in many 
things. But on the whole it is as you say. 

Then there is no way of life concerned with the management of the city 
that belongs to a woman because she’s a woman or to a man because he’s 
a man, but the various natures are distributed in the same way in both 
creatures. Women share by nature in every way of life just as men do, but 
in all of them women are weaker than men. 

Certainly. 

Then shall we assign all of them to men and none to women? 

How can we? 

We’ll say, I suppose, that one woman is a doctor, another not, and that 
one is musical by nature, another not. 

Of course. 

And, therefore, won’t one be athletic or warlike, while another is unwar- 
like and no lover of physical training? 

I suppose so. 


GID 


456 


130 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


Further, isn’t one woman philosophical or a lover of wisdom, while 
another hates wisdom? And isn’t one spirited and another spiritless? 

That too. 

So one woman may have a guardian nature and another not, for wasn’t 
it qualities of this sort that we looked for in the natures of the men we 
selected as guardians? 

Certainly. 

Therefore, men and women are by nature the same with respect to 
guarding the city, except to the extent that one is weaker and the other 
stronger. 

Apparently. 

Then women of this sort must be chosen along with men of the same 
sort to live with them and share their guardianship, seeing that they are 
adequate for the task and akin to the men in nature. 

Certainly. 

And mustn’t we assign the same way of life to the same natures? 

We must. 

We’ve come round, then, to what we said before and have agreed that 
it isn’t against nature to assign an education in music, poetry, and physical 
training to the wives of the guardians. 

Absolutely. 

Then we’re not legislating impossibilities or indulging in mere wishful 
thinking, since the law we established is in accord with nature. It’s rather 
the way things are at present that seems to be against nature. 

So it seems. 

Now, weren’t we trying to determine whether our proposals were both 
possible and optimal? 

Yes, we were. 

And haven’t we now agreed that they’re possible? 

Yes. 

Then mustn’t we next reach agreement about whether or not they’re 
optimal? 

Clearly. 

Should we have one kind of education to produce women guardians, 
then, and another to produce men, especially as they have the same natures 
to begin with? 

No. 

Then, what do you think about this? 

What? зж 

About опе man being better and another worse. Or do you think they’re 
all alike? 

Certainly not. 


BOOK V 45ба-457с 131 


In the city we’re establishing, who do you think will prove to be better 
men, the guardians, who receive the education we’ve described, or the 
cobblers, who are educated in cobblery? 

Your question is ridiculous. 

I understand. Indeed, aren’t the guardians the best of the citizens? 

By far. 

And what about the female guardians? Aren’t they the best of the 
women? 

They’re by far the best. 

Is there anything better for a city than having the best possible men and 
women as its citizens? 

There isn’t. 

And isn’t it music and poetry and physical training, lending their support 
in the way we described, that bring this about? 

Of course. 

Then the law we’ve established isn’t only possible; it is also optimal for 
a city? 

Yes. 

Then the guardian women must strip for physical training, since they’! 
wear virtue or excellence instead of clothes. They must share in war and 
the other guardians’ duties in the city and do nothing else. But the lighter 
parts must be assigned to them because of the weakness of their sex. And 
the man who laughs at naked women doing physical training for the sake 
of what is best is “plucking the unripe fruit” of laughter and doesn’t 
know, it seems, what he’s laughing at or what he’s doing, for it is and 
always will be the finest saying that the beneficial is beautiful, while the 
harmful is ugly. 

Absolutely. 

Can we say, then, that we’ve escaped one wave of criticism in our 
discussion of the law about women, that we haven’t been altogether swept 
away by laying it down that male and female guardians must share their 
entire way of life, and that our argument is consistent when it states that 
this is both possible and beneficial? 

And it’s certainly no small wave that you’ve escaped. 

You won’t think that it’s so big when you get a look at the next one. 

Tell me about it, and Pll decide. 

I suppose that the following law goes along with the last one and the 
others that preceded it. 

Which one? 

That all these women are to belong in common to all the men, that 


10. Plato is here adapting a phrase of Pindar, “plucking the unripe fruit of wisdom.” 


277 


b 


(А 


458 


12% SocCRATES/GLAUCON 


none are to live privatély with any man, and that the children, too, are to 
be possessed in common, so that no parent will know his own offspring 
or any child his parent. 

This wave is far bigger than the other, for there’s doubt both about its 
possibility and about whether or not it’s beneficial. 

I don’t think that its being beneficial would be disputed or that it would 
be denied that the common possession of women and children would be 
the greatest good, if indeed it is possible. But I think that there would be 
a lot of disagreement about whether or not it is possible. 

There could very well be dispute about both. 

You mean that Pll have to face a coalition of arguments. I thought Ра 
escape one of them, if you believed that the proposal was beneficial, and 
that Га have only the one about whether or not it’s possible left to deal 
with. 

But you didn’t escape unobserved, so you have to give an argument for 
both. 

Well, then, РІ have to accept my punishment. But do me this favor. 
Let me, as if on a holiday, do what lazy people do who feast on their own 
thoughts when out for a solitary walk. Instead of finding out how some- 
thing they desire might actually come about, these people pass that over, 
so as to avoid tiring deliberations about whats possible and what isn’t. 
They assume that what they desire is available and proceed to arrange 
the rest, taking pleasure in thinking through everything they'll do when 
they have what they want, thereby making their lazy souls even lazier. Pm 
getting soft myself at the moment, so I want to delay consideration of the 
feasibility of our proposal until later. With your permission, ГІЇ assume 
that it’s feasible and examine how the rulers will arrange these matters 
when they come to pass. And ГІЇ try to show that nothing could be more 
beneficial to the city and its guardians than those arrangements. These 
are the things Pll examine with you first, and ГІ deal with the other 
question later, but only if you’ll permit me to do it this way. 

You have my permission, so carry on with your examination. 

I suppose that our rulers and auxiliaries—if indeed they’re worthy of 
the names—will be willing to command and to obey respectively. In some 
cases, the rulers will themselves be obeying our laws, and in others, 
namely, the ones we leave to their discretion, they’ll give directions that 
are in the spirit of our laws. 

Probably so. 

Then you, as their lawgiver, will select women just as you did men, with 
natures as similar to theirs as possible, and hand them over to the men. 
And since they have common dwellings and meals, rather than private 
ones, and live together and mix together both in physical training and in 
the rest of their upbringing, they will, I suppose, be driven by innate 


BOOK V 457c-459d 133 


necessity to have sex with one another. Or don’t you think we’re talking 
about necessities here? 

The necessities aren’t geometrical but erotic, and they’re probably 
better than the others at persuading and compelling the majority of people. 

That’s right. But the next point, Glaucon, is that promiscuity is impious 
in a city of happy people, and the rulers won’t allow it. 

No, for it isn’t right. 

Then it’s clear that our next task must be to make marriage as sacred 
as possible. And the sacred marriages will be those that are most beneficial. 

Absolutely. 

How, then, will they be most beneficial? Tell me this, Glaucon: I see 
that you have hunting dogs and quite a flock of noble fighting birds at 
home. Have you noticed anything about their mating and breeding? 

Like what? 

In the first place, although they’re all noble, aren’t there some that are 
the best and prove themselves to be so? 

There are. 

Do you breed them all alike, or do you try to breed from the best as 
much as possible? 

I try to breed from the best. 

And do you breed from the youngest or the oldest or from those in their 
prime? 

From those in their prime. 

And do you think that if they weren’t bred in this way, your stock of 
birds and dogs would get much worse? 

I do. 

What about horses and other animals? Are things any different with 
them? 

It would be strange if they were. 

Dear me! If this also holds true of human beings, our need for excellent 
rulers is indeed extreme. 

It does hold of them. But what of it? 

Because our rulers will then have to use a lot of drugs. And while an 
inferior doctor is adequate for people who are willing to follow a regimen 
and don’t need drugs, when drugs are needed, we know that a bolder 
doctor is required. 

That’s true. But what exactly do you have in mind? 

I mean that it looks as though our rulers will have to make considerable 
use of falsehood and deception for the benefit of those they rule. And we 
said that all such falsehoods are useful as a form of drug." 

And we were right. 


11. See 382c ff. апа 414b ff. 


459 


134 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


Well, it seems we were right, especially where marriages and the produc- 
ing of children are concerned. 

How so? 

It follows from our previous agreements, first, that the best men must 
have sex with the best women as frequently as possible, while the opposite 
is true of the most inferior men and women, and, second, that if our herd 
is to be of the highest possible quality, the former’s offspring must be 

е reared but not the latter’s. And this must all be brought about without 
being noticed by anyone except the rulers, so that our herd of guardians 
remains as free from dissension as possible. 

That’s absolutely right. 

Therefore certain festivals and sacrifices will be established by law at 
which we’ll bring the brides and grooms together, and we’ll direct our 
poets to compose appropriate hymns for the marriages that take place. 

460 We'll leave the number of marriages for the rulers to decide, but their aim 
will be to keep the number of males as stable as they can, taking into 
account war, disease, and similar factors, so that the city will, as far as 
possible, become neither too big nor too small. 

That’s right. 

Then there’ll have to be some sophisticated lotteries introduced, so that 
at each marriage the inferior people we mentioned will blame luck rather 
than the rulers when they aren’t chosen. 

There will. 

And among other prizes and rewards the young men who are good in 

b war or other things must be given permission to have sex with the women 
more often, since this will also be a good pretext for having them father 
as many of the children as possible. 

That’s right. 

And then, as the children are born, they’ll be taken over by the officials 
appointed for the purpose, who may be either men or women or both, 
since our offices are open to both sexes. 

Yes. 

I think they'll take the children of good parents їо the nurses in charge 

c ofthe rearing pen situated in a separate part of the city, but the children 
of inferior parents, or any child of the others that is born defective, they’ll 
hide in a secret and unknown place, as is appropriate.’ 

It is, if indeed the guardian breed is to remain pure. 

And won’t the nurses also see to it that the mothers are brought to the 


12. There can be no doubt that Plato is recommending infanticide by exposure for 
these babies, a practice which was quite common in ancient Greece as a method of 
birth control. 


вооку 4594-4614 135 


rearing pen when their breasts have milk, taking every precaution to insure 

that no mother knows her own child and providing wet nurses if the 
mother’s milk is insufficient? And won’t they take care that the mothers 
suckle the children for only a reasonable amount of time and that the care 

of sleepless children and all other such troublesome duties are taken over 

by the wet nurses and other attendants? 

You're making it very easy for the wives of the guardians to have 
children. 

And that’s only proper. So let’s take up the next thing we proposed. We 
said that the children’s parents should be in their prime. 

True. 

Do you share the view that a woman’s prime lasts about twenty years 
and a man’s about thirty? е 

Which years аге those? 

A woman is to bear children for the city from the age of twenty to the 
age of forty, a man from the time that he passes his peak as a runner until 
he reaches fifty-five. 

At any rate, that’s the physical and mental prime for both. 461 

Then, if a man who is younger or older than that engages in reproduction 
for the community, we’ll say that his offense is neither pious nor just, for 
the child he begets for the city, if it remains hidden, will be born in 
darkness, through a dangerous weakness of will, and without the benefit 
of the sacrifices and prayers offered at every marriage festival, in which 
the priests and priestesses, together with the entire city, ask that the 
children of good and beneficial parents may always prove themselves still 
better and more beneficial. b 

That’s right. 

The same law will apply if a man still of begetting years has a child with 
a woman of child-bearing age without the sanction of the rulers. We’ll say 
that he brings to the city an illegitimate, unauthorized, and unhallowed 
child. 

That’s absolutely right. 

However, I think that when women and men have passed the age of 
having children, we’ll leave them free to have sex with whomever they 
wish, with these exceptions: For a man—his daughter, his mother, his 
daughter’s children, and his mother’s ancestors; for а woman—her son ¢ 
and his descendants, her father and his ancestors. Having received these 
instructions, they should be very careful not to let a single fetus see the 
light of day, but if one is conceived and forces its way to the light, they 
must deal with it in the knowledge that no nurture is available for it. 

That’s certainly sensible. But how will they recognize their fathers and 
daughters and the others you mentioned? d 


136 SOCRATES/ GLAUCON 


They have no way of knowing. But a man will call all the children born 
in the tenth or seventh month after he became a bridegroom his sons, if 
they're male, and his daughters, if they're female, and they'll call him 
father. He’ll call their children his grandchildren, and they'll call the group 
to which he belongs grandfathers and grandmothers. And those who were 
born at the same time as their mothers and fathers were having children 

е еу! call their brothers and sisters. Thus, as we were saying, the relevant 
groups will avoid sexual relations with each other. But the law will allow 
brothers and sisters to have sex with one another if the lottery works out 
that way and the Pythia” approves. 

That’s absolutely right. 

This, then, Glaucon, is how the guardians of your city have their wives 
and children in common. We must now confirm that this arrangement is 
both consistent with the rest of the constitution and by far the best. Or 
how else are we to proceed? 

462 In just that way. 

Then isn’t the first step towards agreement to ask ourselves what we 
say is the greatest good in designing the city—the good at which the 
legislator aims in making the laws—and what is the greatest evil? And isn’t 
the next step to examine whether the system we’ve just described fits into 
the tracks of the good and not into those of the bad? 

Absolutely. 

Is there any greater evil we can mention for a city than that which tears 
it apart and makes it many instead of one? Or any greater good than that 

5 which binds it together and makes it one? 

There isn’t. 

And when, as far as possible, all the citizens rejoice and are pained by 
the same successes and failures, doesn’t this sharing of pleasures and 
pains bind the city together? 

It most certainly does. 

But when some suffer greatly, while others rejoice greatly, at the same 
things happening to the city or its people, doesn’t this privatization of 

c pleasures and pains dissolve the city? 

Of course. 

And isn’t that what happens whenever such words as “mine” and “not 
mine” aren’t used in unison? And similarly with “someone else’s”? 

Precisely. 

Then, is the best-governed city the one in which most people say “mine” 
and “not mine” about the same things in the same way? 

It is indeed. 


13. The priestess of Apollo at Delphi. 


BOOK V 4614-4636 137 


What about the city that is most like a single person? For example, when 
one of us hurts his finger, the entire organism that binds body and soul 
together into a single system under the ruling part within it is aware of 
this, and the whole feels the pain together with the part that suffers. That’s 
why we say that the man has a pain in his finger. And the same canbe d 
said about any part of a man, with regard either to the pain it suffers or 
to the pleasure it experiences when it finds relief. 

Certainly. And, as for your question, the city with the best government 
is most like such a person. 

Then, whenever anything good or bad happens to a single one of its 
citizens, such a city above all others will say that the affected part is its 
own and will share in the pleasure or pain as a whole. е 

If it has good laws, that must be so. 

It’s time now to return to our own city, to look there for the features 
we've agreed on, and to determine whether it or some other city possesses 
them to the greatest degree. 

Then that’s what we must do. 

What about those other cities? Aren’t there rulers and people in them, 
as well as in ours? 463 

There are. 

Besides fellow citizens, what do the people call the rulers in those other 
cities? 

In many they call them despots, but in democracies they are called just 
this—rulers.'* 

What about the people in our city? Besides fellow citizens, what do they 
call their rulers? 

Preservers” and auxiliaries. b 

And what do they in turn call the people? 

Providers of upkeep and wages. 

What do the rulers call the people in other cities? 

Slaves. 

And what do the rulers call each other? 

Co-rulers. 

And ours? 

Co-guardians. 

Can you tell me whether a ruler in those other cities could address 
some of his co-rulers as his kinsmen and others as outsiders? 


14. The Athenian democracy had nine archontes, or rulers, in Plato’s time. These 
included the chief magistrates, the chief military leader, and an important authority in 
religious matters. ; 


15. See 429с. 


138 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


Yes, many could. 
And doesn’t he consider his kinsman to be his own, and doesn’t he 
c address him as such, while he considers the outsider not to be his own? 

He does. 

What about your guardians? Could any of them consider a co-guardian 
as an outsider or address him as such? 

There’s no way he could, for when he meets any one of them, he’ll hold 
that he’s meeting a brother or sister, a father or mother, a son or daughter, 
or some ancestor or descendant of theirs. 

You put that very well. But tell me this: Will your laws require them 
simply to use these kinship names or also to do all the things that go along 

а with the names? Must they show to their “fathers” the respect, solicitude, 
and obedience we show to our parents by law? Won’t they fare worse at 
the hands of gods and humans, as people whose actions are neither pious 
nor just, if they do otherwise? Will these be the oracular sayings they hear 
from all the citizens from their childhood on, or will they hear something 
else about their fathers—or the ones they’re told are their fathers—and 
other relatives? 

The former. It would be absurd if they only mouthed kinship names 

e without doing the things that go along with them. 

Therefore, in our city more than in any other, they'll speak in unison 
the words we mentioned a moment ago. When any one of them is doing 
well or badly, they’ll say that “mine” is doing well or that “mine” is doing 
badly. 

That’s absolutely true. 

464 Мож, didn’t we say that the having and expressing of this conviction is 
closely followed by the having of pleasures and pains in common? 

Yes, and we were right. 

Then won’t our citizens, more than any others, have the same thing in 
common, the one they call “mine”? And, having that in common, won’t 
they, more than any others, have common pleasures and pains? 

Of course. 

And, in addition to the other institutions, the cause of this is the having 
of wives and children in common by the guardians? 

That more than anything else is the cause. 

But we agreed that the having of pains and pleasures in common is the 
greatest good for a city, and we characterized a well-governed city in terms 

b of the body’s reaction to pain or pleasure in any one of its parts. 

And we were right to agree. , 

Then, the cause of the greatest good for our city has been shown to be 
the having of wives and children in common by the auxiliaries. 

It has. 


BOOK V 463b-465a 139 


And, of course, this is consistent with what we said before, for we said 
somewhere that, if they're going to be guardians, they mustn’t have private 
houses, property, or possessions, but must receive their upkeep from the 
other citizens as а wage for their guardianship and enjoy it in common.'® 

That’s right. 

Then isn’t it true, just as I claimed, that what we are saying now, taken 
together with what we said before, makes even better guardians out of 
them and prevents them from tearing the city apart by not calling the same 
thing “mine”? If different people apply the term to different things, one 
would drag into his own house whatever he could separate from the others, 
and another would drag things into a different house to a different wife 
and children, and this would make for private pleasures and pains at 
private things. But our people, on the other hand, will think of the same 
things as their own, aim at the same goal, and, as far as possible, feel 
pleasure and pain in unison. 

Precisely. 

And what about lawsuits and mutual accusations? Won’t they pretty 
well disappear from among them, because they have everything in common 
except their own bodies? Hence they’ll be spared all the dissension that 
arises between people because of the possession of money, children, and 
families. 

They'll necessarily be spared it. 

Nor could any lawsuits for insult or injury justly occur among them, for 
жел declare that it’s a fine and just thing for people to defend themselves 
against others of the same age, since this will compel them to stay in good 
physical shape. 

That’s right. 

This law is also correct for another reason: If a spirited person vents 
his anger in this way, it will be less likely to lead him into more serious 
disputes. 

Certainly. 

But an older person will be authorized to rule and punish all the younger 
ones. 

Clearly. 

And surely it’s also obvious that a younger person won't strike or do 
any sort of violence to an older one or fail to show him respect in other 
ways, unless the rulers command it, for there are two guardians sufficient 
to prevent him from doing such things—shame and fear. Shame will 
prevent him from laying a hand on his parents, and so will the fear that 


16. See 416d ff. 


465 


140 SoOcRATES/GLAUCON 


b е others would come to the aid of the victim, some as his sons, some as 
his brothers, and some as his fathers. 

That’s the effect they'll have. 

Then, in all cases, won’t the laws induce men to live at peace with one 
another? 

Very much so. 

And if there’s no discord among the guardians, there’s no danger that 
the rest of the city will break into civil war, either with them or among 
themselves. 

Certainly not. 

I hesitate to mention, since they’re so unseemly, the pettiest of the evils 
the guardians would therefore escape: The poor man’s flattery of the rich, 

с the perplexities and sufferings involved in bringing up children and in 
making the money necessary to feed the household, getting into debt, 
paying it off, and in some way or other providing enough money to hand 
over to their wives and household slaves to manage. All of the various 
troubles men endure in these matters are obvious, ignoble, and not worth 
discussing. 

d They’re obvious even to the blind. 

They’ll be free of all these, and they'll live а Ше more blessedly happy 
than that of the victors in the Olympian games. 

How? 

The Olympian victors are considered happy on account of only a small 
part of what is available to our guardians, for the guardians’ victory is even 
greater, and their upkeep from public funds more complete. The victory 
they gain is the preservation of the whole city, and the crown of victory 
that they and their children receive is their upkeep and all the necessities 
of life. They receive rewards from their own city while they live, and at 

е their death they’re given a worthy burial. 

Those are very good things. 

Do you remember that, earlier in our discussion, someone—I forget 
who—shocked us by saying that we hadn’t made our guardians happy, 
that it was possible for them to have everything that belongs to the citizens, 

466 yet they had nothing? We said, I think, that if this happened to come up 
at some point, we’d look into it then, but that our concern at the time was 
to make our guardians true guardians and the city the happiest we could, 
rather than looking to any one group within it and moulding it for hap- 
piness.”’ 

I remember. Р 

Well, then, if the life of our auxiliaries is apparently much finer and 


17. See 419a ff. 


BOOK у 465b-467b 141 


better than that of Olympian victors, is there апу need to compare it to 
the lives of cobblers, farmers, or other craftsmen? 

Not in my opinion. 

Then it’s surely right to repeat here what I said then: If a guardian 
seeks happiness in such a way that he’s no longer a guardian and isn’t 
satisfied with a life that’s moderate, stable, and—as we say—best, but a 
silly, adolescent idea of happiness seizes him and incites him to use his 
power to take everything in the city for himself, he’ll come to know the 
true wisdom of Hesiod’s saying that somehow “the half is worth more 
than the whole.”® 

If he takes my advice, he’ll keep to his own life-style. 

You agree, then, that the women and men should associate with one 
another in education, in things having to do with children, and in guarding 
the other citizens in the way we’ve described; that both when they remain 
in the city and when they go to war, they must guard together and hunt 
together like dogs and share in everything as far as possible; and that by 
doing so they’ll be doing what’s best and not something contrary either to 
woman’s nature as compared with man’s or to the natural association of 
men and women with one another. 

I agree. 

Then doesn’t it remain for us to determine whether it’s possible to 
bring about this association among human beings, as it is among animals, 
and to say just how it might be done? 

You took the words right out of my mouth. 

As far as war is concerned, І think it’s clear how they will wage it. 

How so? 

Men and women will campaign together. They'll take the sturdy chil- 
dren with them, so that, like the children of other craftsmen, they can see 
what they'll have to do when they grow up. But in addition to observing, 
they can serve and assist in everything to do with the war and help their 
mothers and fathers. Haven’t you noticed in the other crafts how the 
children of potters, for example, assist and observe for a long time before 
actually making any pots? 

I have indeed. 

And should these craftsmen take more care in training their children 
by appropriate experience and observation than the guardians? 

Of course not; that would be completely ridiculous. 

Besides, every animal fights better in the presence of its young. 

That’s so. But, Socrates, there’s a considerable danger that in a defeat— 
and such things are likely to happen іп a war—they’ll lose their children’s 


18. Works and Days 40. 


467 


142 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


lives as well as their own, making it impossible for the rest of the city to 
recover. 

What you say is true. But do you think that the first thing we should 
provide for is the avoidance of all danger? 

Not at all. 

Well, then, if people will probably have to face some danger, shouldn’t 
it be the sort that will make them better if they come through it successfully? 

Obviously. 

And do you think that whether or not men who are going to be warriors 
observe warfare when they’re still boys makes such a small difference that 
it isn’t worth the danger of having them do it? 

No, it does make a difference to what you’re talking about. 

On the assumption, then, that the children are to be observers of war, 
if we can contrive some way to keep them secure, everything will be fine, 
won’t it? 

Yes. 

Well, then, in the first place, their fathers won’t be ignorant, will they, 
about which campaigns are dangerous and which are not, but rather as 
knowledgeable about this as any human beings can be? 

Probably so. 

Then they'll take the children to some campaigns and not to others? 

Correct. 

And they'll put officers in charge of them whose age and experience 
qualifies them to be leaders and tutors? 

Appropriately so. 

But, as we say, the unexpected often occurs. 

Indeed. 

With this in mind, we must provide the children with wings when they’re 
small, so that they can fly away and escape. 

What do you mean? 

We must mount them on horses as early as possible—not on spirited 
or aggressive horses, but on very fast and manageable ones—and when 
they’ve learned to ride, they must be taken to observe a war. In this way, 
they'll get the best look at their own work and, if the need arises, make 
the securest possible escape to safety, following their older guides. 

I think you’re right. 


468 What about warfare itself? What attitude should your soldiers have to 


each other and to the enemy? Are my views about this right or not? 

First, tell me what they are. l 

If one of them leaves his post or throws away his shield or does anything 
else of that sort through cowardice, shouldn’t he be reduced to being a 
craftsman or farmer? 

Certainly. 


BOOK V 467b-468e 143 


And shouldn’t anyone who is captured alive be left to his captors as a 
gift to do with as they wish? 

Absolutely. 

But don’t you think that anyone who distinguishes himself and earns 
high esteem should, while still on the campaign, first be crowned with 
wreaths by each of the adolescents and children who accompany the 
expedition? 

I do. 

And what about shaken by the right hand? 

That too. 

But I suppose that you wouldn’t go this far? 

Namely? 

That he should kiss and be kissed by each of them. 

That most of all. And Га add this to the law: As long as the campaign 
lasts, no one he wants to kiss shall be allowed to refuse, for then, if one 
of them happens to be in love with another, whether male or female, he’ll 
be all the more eager to win the rewards of valor. 

Excellent. And we’ve already stated that, since he’s a good person, more 
marriages will be available to him, and he’ll be selected for such things 
more frequently than the others, so that he’!l beget as many children as 
possible. 

Yes, we did say that. 

Indeed, according to Homer too, it is just to honor in such ways those 
young people who are good, for he says that Ajax, when he distinguished 
himself in battle, “was rewarded with the long cut off the backbone.” ”? 
And that’s an appropriate honor for a courageous young man, since it will 
both honor him and increase his strength. 

That’s absolutely right. 

Then we’ll follow Homer in these matters at least. And insofar as good 
people have shown themselves to be good, we’ll honor them at sacrifices 
and all such occasions with hymns, “seats of honor, meats, and well-filled 
cups of wine,”” and in all the other ways we mentioned, so that, in addition 
to honoring good men and women, we’ll continue to train them. 

That’s excellent. 

All right. And as for those who died on the campaign, won’t we say, 
first of all, that, if their deaths were distinguished, they belong to the 
golden race? 

That above all. 

And won’t we believe with Hesiod that, whenever any of that race die, 
they become 


19. Iliad 7.321. 
20. Iliad 8.162. 


469 


144 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


Sacred daimons living upon the earth, 


Noble spirits, protectors against evil, guardians of articulate mortals?” 


We'll certainly believe that. 

Then we’ll inquire from the god” what kind of distinguished funeral 
we should give to daimonic and godlike people, and we’ll follow his 
instructions. 

Of course. 

And for the remainder of time, we’ll care for their graves and worship 
at them as we would at those of daimons. And we’ll follow the same rites 
for anyone whom we judge to have lived an outstandingly good life, 
whether he died of old age or in some other way. 

That is only just. 

Now, what about enemies? How will our soldiers deal with them? 

In what respect? 

First, enslavement. Do you think it is just for Greeks to enslave Greek 
cities, or, as far as they can, should they not even allow other cities to do 
so, and make a habit of sparing the Greek race, as a precaution against 
being enslaved by the barbarians? 

It’s altogether and in every way best to spare the Greek race. 

Then isn’t it also best for the guardians not to acquire a Greek slave 
and to advise the other Greeks not to do so either? 

Absolutely. In that way they’d be more likely to turn against the barbar- 
ians and keep their hands off one another. 

What about despoiling the dead? Is it a good thing to strip the dead of 
anything besides their armor after a victory? Or don’t cowards make this 
an excuse for not facing the enemy—as if they were doing something of 
vital importance in bending over a corpse? And haven’t many armies been 
lost because of such plundering? 

Indeed, they have. 

Don’t you think it’s slavish and money-loving to strip a corpse? Isn’t it 
small-minded and womanish to regard the body as your enemy, when the 
enemy himself has flitted away, leaving behind only the instrument with 
which he fought? Or do you think such behavior any different from that 
of dogs who get angry with the stone that hits them and leave the thrower 
alone? 

It’s no different at all. 

Then may our soldiers strip corpses or refuse the enemy permission to 
pick up their dead? 


E 


21. Works and Days 122. On daimons, see 382e n.23. 
22. Apollo. See 427b. 


BOOK V 469a-470e 145 


No, by god, they certainly may not. 

Moreover, we won’t take enemy arms to the temples as offerings, and 
if we care about the goodwill of other Greeks, we especially won’t do this 
with their arms. Rather we’d be afraid of polluting” the temples if we 
brought them such things from our own people, unless, of course, the god 
tells us otherwise. 

That’s absolutely right. 

What about ravaging the land of the Greeks and burning their houses? 
Will your soldiers do things of this sort to their enemies? 

Ра like to hear your opinion about that. 

Well, I think they should do neither of these things but destroy the 
year’s harvest only. Do you want me to tell you why? 

Of course. 

It seems to me that as we have two names, “war” and “civil war,” so 
there are two things and the names apply to two kinds of disagreements 
arising in them. The two things I’m referring to are what is one’s own and 
akin, on the one hand, and what’s foreign and strange, on the other. The 
name “civil war” applies to hostilities with one’s own, while “war” applies 
to hostilities with strangers. 

That’s certainly to the point. 

Then see whether this is also to the point: I say that the Greek race is its 
own and akin, but is strange and foreign to barbarians. 

That’s right. 

Then when Greeks do battle with barbarians or barbarians with Greeks, 
we'll say that they’re natural enemies and that such hostilities are to be 
called war. But when Greeks fight with Greeks, we’ll say that they are 
natural friends and that in such circumstances Greece is sick and divided 
into factions and that such hostilities are to be called civil war. 

I, at any rate, agree to think of it that way. 

Now, notice that, wherever something of the sort that’s currently called 
civil war occurs and a city is divided, if either party ravages the land of the 
others and burns their houses, it’s thought that this is abominable and that 
neither party loves their city, since otherwise they’d never have ravaged 
their very nurse and mother.” However, it is thought appropriate for the 
victors to carry off the harvest of the vanquished. Nonetheless, their 
attitude of mind should be that of people who'll one day be reconciled 
and who won’t always be at war. 

This way of thinking is far more civilized than the other. 


23. Greek views on pollution, which is now a foreign concept to us, are discussed in 
R. Parker, Miasma (Oxford: Clarendon Press, 1983). 


24. See 414е. 


470 


aid. 


146 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


What about the city you’re founding? It is Greek, isn’t it? 

It has to be. 

Then, won’t your citizens be good and civilized? 

Indeed they will. 

Then, won’t they love Greece? Won’t they consider Greece as their 
own and share the religion of the other Greeks? 

Yes, indeed. 

Then won’t they consider their differences with Greeks—people who 
are their own—not as war but as civil war? 

Of course. 

And won’t they quarrel like people who know that one day they’ll be 
reconciled? 

Certainly. 

Then they'll moderate their foes in a friendly spirit, not punish them 
with enslavement and destruction, for they’re moderators, not enemies. 

That’s right. 

And being Greeks, they won’t ravage Greece or burn her houses, nor 
will they agree that in any of her cities all the inhabitants—men, women, 
and children—are their enemies, but that whatever differences arise are 
caused by the few enemies that any city inevitably contains. Because of 
this, because the majority are friendly, they won’t ravage the country or 
destroy the houses, and they’ll continue their quarrel only to the point at 
which those who caused it are forced to pay the penalty by those who were 
its innocent victims. 

I agree that this is the way our citizens must treat their enemies, and 
they must treat barbarians the way Greeks currently treat each other. 

Then shall we also impose this law on the guardians: Neither ravage 
the country nor burn the houses? 

Consider it imposed. And let’s also assume that this law and its prede- 
cessors are all fine. But I think, Socrates, that if we let you go on speaking 
about this subject, you’ll never remember the опе you set aside in order 
to say all this, namely, whether it’s possible for this constitution to come 
into being and in what way it could be brought about. I agree that, if it 
existed, all the things we’ve mentioned would be good for the city in which 
they occurred. And Г] add some that you’ve left out. The guardians would 
be excellent fighters against an enemy because they'd be least likely to 
desert each other, since they know each other as brothers, fathers, and 
sons, and call each other by those names. Moreover, if their women joined 
their campaigns, either in the same ranks or positioned in the rear to 
frighten the enemy and in case their help should ever be needed, I know 
that this would make them quite unbeatable. And I also see all the good 
things that they’d have at home that you’ve omitted. Take it that I agree 


BOOK у 470е-472е 147 


that all these things would happen, as well as innumerable others, if this 
kind of constitution came into being, and say no more on that subject. But 
rather let’s now try to convince ourselves that it is possible and how it is 
possible, and let the rest go. 

This is a sudden attack that you’ve made on my argument, and you 
show no sympathy for my delay. Perhaps you don’t realize that, just as I’ve 
barely escaped from the first two waves of objections, you’re bringing the 
third—the biggest and most difficult one—down upon me. When you see 
and hear it, you’ll surely be completely sympathetic, and recognize that it 
was, after all, appropriate for me to hesitate and be afraid to state and look 
into so paradoxical a view. 

The more you speak like that, the less we’ll let you off from telling us 
how it’s possible for this constitution to come into being. So speak instead 
of wasting time. 

Well, then, we must first remember that we got to this point while trying 
to discover what justice and injustice are like. 

We must. But what of it? 

Nothing. But if we discover what justice is like, will we also maintain 
that the just man is in no way different from the just itself, so that he is 
like justice in every respect? Or will we be satisfied if he comes as close 
to it as possible and participates in it far more than anyone else? 

We'll be satisfied with that. 

Then it was in order to have a model that we were trying to discover 
what justice itself is like and what the completely just man would be like, 
if he came into being, and what kind of man he’d be if he did, and likewise 
with regard to injustice and the most unjust man. We thought that, by 
looking at how their relationship to happiness and its opposite seemed to 
us, we'd also be compelled to agree about ourselves as well, that the опе 
who was most like them would have a portion of happiness most like theirs. 
But we weren’t trying to discover these things in order to prove that it’s 
possible for them to come into being. 

That’s true. 

Do you think that someone is a worse painter if, having painted a model 
of what the finest and most beautiful human being would be like and 
having rendered every detail of his picture adequately, he could not prove 
that such a man could come into being? 

No, by god, I don’t. 

Then what about our own case? Didn’t we say that we were making a 
theoretical model of a good city?” 

Certainly. 


25. See 369a—c. 


22 


473 


148 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


So do you think that our discussion will be any less reasonable if we 
can’t prove that it’s possible to found a city that’s the same as the one in 
our theory? 

Not at all. 

Then that’s the truth of the matter. But if, in order to please you, I 
must also be willing to show how and under what conditions it would most 
be possible to found such a city, then you should agree to make the same 
concessions to me, in turn, for the purposes of this demonstration. 

Which ones? 

Is it possible to do anything in practice the same as in theory? Or is it 
in the nature of practice to grasp truth less well than theory does, even if 
some people don’t think so? Will you first agree to this or not? 

I agree. 

Then don’t compel me to show that what we’ve described in theory сап 
come into being exactly as we’ve described it. Rather, if we’re able to 
discover how a city could come to be governed in a way that most closely 
approximates our description, let’s say that we’ve shown what you ordered 
us to show, namely, that it’s possible for our city to come to be. Or wouldn’t 
you be satisfied with that? J would be satisfied with it. 

So would I. 

Then next, it seems, we should try to discover and point out what’s now 
badly done in cities that keeps them from being governed in that way and 
what’s the smallest change that would enable our city to reach our sort of 
constitution—one change, if possible, or if not one, two, and if not two, 
then the fewest in number and the least extensive. 

That’s absolutely right. 

There is one change we could point to that, in my opinion, would 
accomplish this. It’s certainly neither small nor easy, but it is possible. 

What is it? 

Well, Гуе now come to what we likened to the greatest wave. But I shall 
say what I have to say, even if the wave is a wave of laughter that will 
simply drown me in ridicule and contempt. So listen to what I’m going to 
say. 

Say on. 

Until philosophers rule as kings in cities or those who are now called 
kings and leading men genuinely and adequately philosophize, that is, 
until political power and philosophy entirely coincide, while the many 
natures who at present pursue either one exclusively are forcibly prevent- 
ed from doing so, cities will have no rest from evils, Glaucon, nor, I think, 
will the human race. And, until this happens, the constitution we’ve been 
describing in theory will never be born to the fullest extent possible or see 
the light of the sun. It’s because I saw how very paradoxical this statement 


BOOK V 472е-474е 149 


would be that I hesitated to make it for so long, for it’s hard to face up to 
the fact that there can be no happiness, either public or private, in any 
other city. 

Socrates, after hurling a speech and statement like that at us, you must 
expect that a great many people (and not undistinguished ones either) will 
cast off their cloaks and, stripped for action, snatch any available weapon, 
and make a determined rush at you, ready to do terrible things. So, unless 
you can hold them off by argument and escape, you really will pay the 
penalty of general derision. 

Well, you are the one that brought this on me. 

And I was right to do it. However, I won’t betray you, but rather defend 
you in any way І can—by goodwill, by urging you on, and perhaps by being 
able to give you more appropriate answers than someone else. So, with 
the promise of this assistance, try to show the unbelievers that things are 
as you say they are. 

I must try it, then, especially since you agree to be so great an ally. If 
we're to escape from the people you mention, І think we need to define 
for them who the philosophers are that we dare to say must rule. And 
once that’s clear, we should be able to defend ourselves by showing that 
the people we mean are fitted by nature both to engage in philosophy and 
to rule in a city, while the rest are naturally fitted to leave philosophy alone 
and follow their leader. 

This would be a good time to give that definition. 

Come, then, follow me, and we’ll see whether or not there’s some way 
to set it out adequately. 

Lead on. 

Do you need to be reminded or do you remember that, if it’s rightly 
said that someone loves something, then he mustn’t love one part of it and 
not another, but he must love all of it?”° 

I think you’ll have to remind me, for I don’t understand it at all. 

That would be an appropriate response, Glaucon, for somebody else to 
make. But it isn’t appropriate for an erotically inclined man to forget that 
all boys in the bloom of youth pique the interest of a lover of boys and 
arouse him and that all seem worthy of his care and pleasure. Or isn’t that 
the way you people behave to fine and beautiful boys? You praise a snub- 
nosed one as cute, a hook-nosed one you say is regal, one in between is 
well proportioned, dark ones look manly, and pale ones are children of 
the gods. And as for a honey-colored boy, do you think that this very term 
is anything but the euphemistic coinage of a lover who found it easy to 


26. Socrates here seems to be applying the principle he introduced at 438a—b. See 
475c. 


474 


150 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


tolerate sallowness, provided it was accompanied by the bloom of youth? 

475 In a word, you find all kinds of terms and excuses so as not to reject 
anyone whose flower is in bloom. 

If you insist on taking me as your example of what erotically inclined 
men do, then, for the sake of the argument, I agree. 

Further, don’t you see wine-lovers behave in the same way? Don’t they 
love every kind of wine and find any excuse to enjoy it? 

Certainly. 

And I think you see honor-lovers, if they can’t be generals, be captains, 
and, if they can’t be honored by people of importance and dignity, they 
put up with being honored by insignificant and inferior ones, for they 

b desire the whole of honor. 

Exactly. 

Then do you agree to this or not? When we say that someone desires 
something, do we mean that he desires everything of that kind or that he 
desires one part of it but not another? 

We mean he desires everything. 

Then won’t we also say that the philosopher doesn’t desire one part of 
wisdom rather than another, but desires the whole thing? 

Yes, that’s true. 

And as for the one who’s choosy about what he learns, especially if he’s 
young and can’t yet give an account of what is useful and what isn’t, we 

с  won’t say that he is a lover of learning or a philosopher, for we wouldn’t 
say that someone who’s choosy about his food is hungry or has an appetite 
for food or is a lover of food—instead, we'd say that he is a bad eater. 

And меа be right to say it. 

But the one who readily and willingly tries all kinds of learning, who 
turns gladly to learning and is insatiable for it, is rightly called a philoso- 
pher, isn’t he? 

d Then many strange people will be philosophers, for the lovers of sights 
seem to be included, since they take pleasure in learning things. And the 
lovers of sounds are very strange people to include as philosophers, for 
they would never willingly attend a serious discussion or spend their time 
that way, yet they run around to all the Dionysiac festivals, omitting none, 
whether in cities or villages, as if their ears were under contract to listen 
to every chorus. Are we to say that these people—and those who learn 

e similar things or petty crafts—are philosophers? 

No, but they are /ike philosophers. 

And who are the true philosophers? 

Those who love the sight of truth. 

That’s right, but what exactly do you mean by it? 

It would not be easy to explain to someone else, but I think that you 
will agree to this. 


вооку 474e-476d 151 


То what? 

Since the beautiful is the opposite of the ugly, they are two. 

Of course. 

And since they are two, each is one? 

I grant that also. 

And the same account is true of the just and the unjust, the good and 
the bad, and all the forms.” Each of them is itself one, but because they 
manifest themselves everywhere in association with actions, bodies, and 
one another, each of them appears to be many. 

That’s right. 

So, I draw this distinction: On one side are those you just now called 
lovers of sights, lovers of crafts, and practical people; on the other side are 
those we are arguing about and whom one would alone call philosophers. 

How do you mean? 

The lovers of sights and sounds like beautiful sounds, colors, shapes, 
and everything fashioned out of them,” but their thought is unable to see 
and embrace the nature of the beautiful itself. 

That’s for sure. 

In fact, there are very few people who would be able to reach the 
beautiful itself and see it by itself. Isn’t that so? 

Certainly. 

What about someone who believes in beautiful things,” but doesn’t 
believe in the beautiful itself and isn’t able to follow anyone who could 
lead him to the knowledge of it? Don’t you think he is living in a dream 
rather than a wakened state? Isn’t this dreaming: whether asleep or awake, 
to think that a likeness is not a likeness but rather the thing itself that it 
is like? 

I certainly think that someone who does that is dreaming. 

But someone who, to take the opposite case, believes in the beautiful 
itself, can see both it and the things that participate in it and doesn’t 
believe that the participants are it or that it itself is the participants—is he 
living in a dream or is he awake? 

He’s very much awake. 

So we’d be right to call his thought knowledge, since he knows, but we 
should call the other person’s thought opinion, since he opines? 

Right. 


27. See 596a ff. 

28. A poem is fashioned out of sounds and a painting out of colors and shapes. See 
600e-601b. 

29. Socrates may be referring here either to particular things that are beautiful or to 
the various beauties in them, which are properties or universals. The same is true later 
when Socrates speaks of “the many just things,” “the many doubles,” and the rest. 


476 


152 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


What if the person who has opinion but not knowledge is angry with us 

and disputes the truth of what we are saying? Is there some way to console 
e him and persuade him gently, while hiding from him that he isn’t in his 
right mind?” 

There must be. 

Consider, then, what we’ll say to him. Won’t we question him like this? 
First, we’ll tell him that nobody begrudges him any knowledge he may 
have and that we’d be delighted to discover that he knows something. 
Then we'll say: “Tell us, does the person who knows know something or 
nothing?” You answer for him. 

He knows something. 

Something that is or something that is not 

477 Something that is, for how could something that is not be known? 

Then we have an adequate grasp of this: No matter how many ways we 
examine it, what is completely is completely knowable and what is in no 
way is in every way unknowable? 

A most adequate one. 

Good. Now, if anything is such as to be and also not to be, won’t it be 
intermediate between what purely is and what in no way is? 

Yes, it’s intermediate. 

Then, as knowledge is set over what is, while ignorance is of necessity 
set over what is not, mustn’t we find an intermediate between knowledge 
and ignorance to be set over what is intermediate between what is and 

b what is not, if there is such a thing? 

Certainly. 

Do we say that opinion is something? 

Of course. 

A different power from knowledge or the same? 

A different one. 

Opinion, then, is set over one thing, and knowledge over another, 
according to the power of each. 


231 


30. It is important to note that the argument that follows is intended to convince the 
lovers of sights and crafts that they have opinion rather than knowledge. Since these 
people are defined as being unable to countenance forms, the argument cannot achieve 
its purpose if it simply presupposes that there are forms or draws on the theory of 
forms, for the lovers of sight and crafts will not be convinced by an argument which 
appeals to something they are unable to accept. 


31. Because of the ambiguity of the verb einai (“to be”), Socrates could be asking any 
or all of the following questions: (1) “Something that exists or something that does not 
exist?” (existential “is”); (2) “Something that is beautiful (say) or something that is not 
beautiful?” (predicative “is”); (3) “Something that is true or something that is not true?” 
(veridical “is”). 


BOOK V 4764-4786 153 


Right. 

Now, isn’t knowledge by its nature set over what is, to know it as it is? 
But first maybe we’d better be a bit more explicit. 

How so? 

Powers are a class of the things that are that enable us—or anything 
else for that matter—to do whatever we are capable of doing. Sight, for 
example, and hearing are among the powers, if you understand the kind 
of thing I’m referring to. 

I do. 

Here’s what I think about them. A power has neither color nor shape 
nor any feature of the sort that many other things have and that I use in 
my own case to distinguish those things from one another. In the case of a 
power, I use only what it is set over and what it does, and by reference 
to these I call each the power it is: What is set over the same things and 
does the same I call the same power; what is set over something different and 
does something different I call a different one. Do you agree? 

I do. 

Then let’s back up. Is knowledge a power, or what class would you put 
it in? 

It’s a power, the strongest of them all. 

And what about opinion, is it a power or some other kind of thing? 

It’s a power as well, for it is what enables us to opine. 

A moment ago you agreed that knowledge and opinion aren’t the same. 

How could a person with any understanding think that a fallible power 
is the same as an infallible one? 

Right. Then we agree that opinion is clearly different from knowledge. 

It is different. 

Hence each of them is by nature set over something different and does 
something different? 

Necessarily. 

Knowledge is set over what is, to know it as it is? 

Yes. 

And opinion opines? 

Yes. 

Does it opine the very thing that knowledge knows, so that the knowable 
and the opinable are the same, or is this impossible? 

It’s impossible, given what we agreed, for if a different power is set over 
something different, and opinion and knowledge are different powers, 
then the knowable and the opinable cannot be the same. 

Then, if what is is knowable, the opinable must be something other 
than what is? , 

It must. 


с 


а 


478 


154 SoOcrATES/GLAUCON 


Do we, then, opine what is not? Or is it impossible to opine what is not? 
Think about this. Doesn’t someone who opines set his opinion over 
something? Or is it possible to opine, yet to opine nothing? 

It’s impossible. 

But someone who opines opines some one thing? 

Yes. 

Surely the most accurate word for that which is not isn’t ‘one thing’ but 

c ‘nothing’? 

Certainly. 

But we had to set ignorance over what is not and knowledge over what 
is? 

That’s right. 

So someone opines neither what is nor what is not? 

How could it be otherwise? 

Then opinion is neither ignorance nor knowledge? 

So it seems. 

Then does it go beyond either of these? Is it clearer than knowledge or 
darker than ignorance? 

No, neither. 

Is opinion, then, darker than knowledge but clearer than ignorance? 

It is. 

d Then it lies between them? 

Yes. 

So opinion is intermediate between those two? 

Absolutely. 

Now, we said that, if something could be shown, as it were, to be and 
not to be at the same time, it would be intermediate between what purely 
is and what in every way is not, and that neither knowledge nor ignorance 
would be set over it, but something intermediate between ignorance and 
knowledge? 

Correct. 

And now the thing we call opinion has emerged as being intermediate 
between them? 

It has. 

Apparently, then, it only remains for us to find what participates in both 

e being and not being and cannot correctly be called purely one or the other, 
in order that, if there is such a thing, we can rightly call it the opinable, 
thereby setting the extremes over the extremes and the intermediate over 
the intermediate. Isn’t that so? 

It is. 

Now that these points have been established, I want to address a 

479 question to our friend who doesn’t believe in the beautiful itself or any 


вооку 478р-479а 155 


form of the beautiful itself that remains always the same in all respects 
but who does believe in the many beautiful things—the lover of sights 
who wouldn’t allow anyone to say that the beautiful itself is one or that 
the just is one or any of the rest: “My dear fellow,” we’ll say, “of all the 
many beautiful things, is there one that will not also appear ugly? Or is 
there one of those just things that will not also appear unjust? Or one of 
those pious things that will not also appear impious?” 

There isn’t one, for it is necessary that they appear to be beautiful in a 
way and also to be ugly in a way, and the same with the other things you 
asked about. 

What about the many doubles? Do they appear any the less halves than 
doubles? 

Not one. 

So, with the many bigs and smalls and lights and heavies, is any one of 
them any more the thing someone says it is than its opposite? 

No, each of them always participates in both opposites. 

Is any one of the manys what someone says it is, then, any more than 
it is not what he says it is? 

No, they are like the ambiguities one is entertained with at dinner 
parties or like the children’s riddle about the eunuch who threw something 
at a bat—the one about what he threw at it and what it was in,” for they 
are ambiguous, and one cannot understand them as fixedly being or fixedly 
not being or as both or as neither. 

Then do you know how to deal with them? Or can you find a more 
appropriate place to put them than intermediate between being and not 
being? For they can’t be darker than what is not, in the sense of having 
less being than that, nor clearer than what is, in the sense of having more 
being. 

Very true. 

We’ve now discovered, it seems, that according to the many conventions 
of the majority of people about beauty and the others, they” are rolling 
around as intermediates between what is not and what purely is.™* 

We have. 


32. The riddle seems to have been: A man who is not a man saw and did not see a 
bird that was not a bird in a tree (xulon) that was not a tree; һе hit (24/0) and did not 
hit it with a stone that was not a stone. The answer is that a eunuch with bad eyesight 
saw a bat on a rafter, threw a pumice stone at it and missed. “He saw a bird” is 
ambiguous between “he saw what was actually a bird” and “he saw what he took to be 
a bird,” xulon means both “tree” and “rafter” or “roof tree,” and dallé means both “to 
throw” and “to hit.” The rest is obvious. 


33. Ie. the many beautiful things, ete. 
34. See 484с-а, 493a ff. 


156 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


And we agreed earlier that anything of that kind would have to be called 
the opinable, not the knowable—the wandering intermediate grasped by 
the intermediate power. 

We did. 

As for those who study the many beautiful things but do not see the 

e beautiful itself and are incapable of following another who leads them to 
it, who see many just things but not the just itself, and so with everything— 
these people, we shall say, opine everything but have no knowledge of 
anything they opine. 

Necessarily. 

What about the ones who in each case study the things themselves that 
are always the same in every respect? Won’t we say that they know and 
don’t opine? 

That’s necessary too. 

Shall we say, then, that these people love and embrace the things that 

480 knowledge is set over, as the others do the things that opinion is set over? 
Remember we said that the latter saw and loved beautiful sounds and 
colors and the like but wouldn’t allow the beautiful itself to be anything? 

We remember, all right. 

We won’t be in error, then, if we call such people lovers of opinion 
rather than philosophers or lovers of wisdom and knowledge? Will they 
be angry with us if we call them that? 

Not if they take my advice, for it isn’t right to be angry with those who 
speak the truth. 

As for those who in each case embrace the thing itself, we must call 
them philosophers, not lovers of opinion? 

Most definitely. 


Воок VI 


Only the philosophers have knowledge, and that alone is sufficient to qualify them 
to be the rulers, provided that they aren’t inferior to the nonphilosophers in virtue 
(484d). So Socrates tries to show that they are in fact supremely virtuous (485а- 
487a). Adeimantus accepts his arguments, but points out that the majority of 
people will simply go on believing that philosophers are unsuited to rule, because 
they know from experience that most philosophers are vicious, while the few decent 
ones are useless (487а-а). Socrates surprisingly agrees with the majority about 
this. The people the majority take to be philosophers are either vicious or useless 
(4874-496е), but that is because the few decent ones, who possess a true philosoph- 
ical nature, are not raised under the right sort of constitution (497a-—b). If the 
majority ever saw a philosopher who had been raised in that way, they too would 
agree that he should rule their city (500е—501а). 

The guardians, in the most exact sense of the term, must be philosophers (5030), 
then, and they must have all the traits already mentioned, but they must also be 
tested to see whether or not they can master the most important subjects (503¢). 
These are the subjects that enable someone to come to know the good itself, i.e. 
the form of the good (504e-505b). Socrates cannot explain directly what the good 
itself is, but he describes “what is apparently an offspring of the good and most 
like it” (SO6b—e). This description is the famous Sun analogy (507a—-509¢). It 
is completed by the Line analogy, which occupies the remainder of the book (509d- 
5116). These analogies dramatically portray Plato’s views on knowledge and 
reality, which, together with his earlier description of the state of philosophy in 
the actual world, are expressed in some of the most brilliant and passionate writing 
in all of philosophy. 


And so, Glaucon, I said, after a somewhat lengthy and difficult discussion, 
both the philosophers and the nonphilosophers have revealed who they are. 484 

It probably wouldn’t have been easy, he said, to have them do it in a 
shorter one. 

Apparently not. But for my part, I think that the matter would have 
been better illuminated if we had only it to discuss and not all the other 
things that remain to be treated in order to discover the difference between 
the just life and the unjust one. b 


157 


158 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


What’s our next topic? 

What else but the one that’s next in order? Since those who are able to 
grasp what is always the same in all respects are philosophers, while those 
who are not able to do so and who wander among the many things that 
vary in every sort of way are not philosophers, which of the two should be 
the leaders in a city? 

What would be a sensible answer to that? 

We should establish as guardians those who are clearly capable of 

с guarding the laws and the ways of life of the city. 

That’s right. 

And isn’t it clear that the guardian who is to keep watch over everything 
should be keen-sighted rather than blind? 

Of course it’s clear. 

Do you think, then, that there’s any difference between the blind and 
those who are really deprived of the knowledge of each thing that is? The 
latter have no clear model in their souls, and so they cannot—in the 
manner of painters—look to what is most true, make constant reference 

d to it, and study it as exactly as possible. Hence they cannot establish here 
on earth conventions about what is fine or just or good, when they need 
to be established, or guard and preserve them, once they have been 
established. 

No, by god, there isn’t much difference between them. 

Should we, then, make these blind people our guardians or rather those 
who know each thing that is and who are not inferior to the others, either 
in experience or in any other part of virtue? 

It would be absurd to choose anyone but philosophers, if indeed they’re 
not inferior in these ways, for the respect in which they are superior is 
pretty well the most important one. 

Then shouldn’t we explain how it is possible for someone to have both 

485 these sorts of qualities? 

Certainly. 

Then, as we said at the beginning of this discussion, it is necessary to 
understand the nature of philosophers first,’ for I think that, if we can 
reach adequate agreement about that, we’ll also agree that the same people 
can have both qualities and that no one but they should be leaders in cities. 

How so? 

Let’s agree that philosophic natures always love the sort of learning that 
makes clear to them some feature of the being that always is and does not 

b wander around between coming to be and decaying. 

And further, let’s agree that, like the honor-lovers and erotically inclined 


1. See 4745-с. 


BOOK V1 4845-486а 159 


men we described before,” they love all such learning and are not willing 
to give up any part of it, whether large or small, more valuable or less so. 

That’s right. 

Consider next whether the people we’re describing must also have this 
in their nature. 

What? 

They must be without falsehood—they must refuse to accept what is 
false, hate it, and have a love for the truth. 

That’s a reasonable addition, at any rate. 

It’s not only reasonable, it’s entirely necessary, for it’s necessary for a 
man who is erotically inclined by nature to love everything akin to or 
belonging to the boy he loves. 

That’s right. 

And could you find anything that belongs more to wisdom than truth 
does? 

Of course not. 

Then is it possible for the same nature to be a philosopher—a lover of 
wisdom—and a lover of falsehood? 

Not at all. 

Then someone who loves learning must above all strive for every kind 
of truth from childhood on. 

Absolutely. 

Now, we surely know that, when someone’s desires incline strongly for 
one thing, they are thereby weakened for others, just like a stream that 
has been partly diverted into another channel. 

Of course. 

Then, when someone’s desires flow towards learning and everything of 
that sort, he’d be concerned, I suppose, with the pleasures of the soul 
itself by itself, and he’d abandon those pleasures that come through the 
body—if indeed he is a true philosopher and not merely a counterfeit one. 

That’s completely necessary. 

Then surely such a person is moderate and not at all a money-lover. 
It’s appropriate for others to take seriously the things for which money 
and large expenditures are needed, but not for him. 

That’s right. 

And of course there’s also this to consider when you are judging whether 
a nature is philosophic or not. 

What’s that? 

If it is at all slavish, you should not overlook that fact, for pettiness is 
altogether incompatible with a soul that is always reaching out to grasp 
everything both divine and human as a whole. 


2. See 474с-475с. 


486 


160 GLAUCON/SOCRATES/ADEIMANTUS 


That’s completely true. 

And will a thinker high-minded enough to study all time and all being 
consider human life to be something important? 

He couldn’t possibly. 

Then will he consider death to be a terrible thing? 

He least of all. 

Then it seems a cowardly and slavish nature will take no part in true 
philosophy. 

Not in my opinion. 

And is there any way that an orderly person, who isn’t money-loving, 
slavish, a boaster, or a coward, could become unreliable or unjust? 

There isn’t. 

Moreover, when you are looking to see whether a soul is philosophic 
or not, you'll look to see whether it is just and gentle, from youth on, or 
savage and hard to associate with. 

Certainly. 

And here’s something I think you won't leave out. 

What? 

Whether he’s a slow learner or a fast one. Or do you ever expect anyone 
to love something when it pains him to do it and when much effort brings 
only small return? 

No, it couldn’t happen. 

And what if he could retain nothing of what he learned, because he was 
full of forgetfulness? Could he fail to be empty of knowledge? 

How could he? 

Then don’t you think that, if he’s laboring in vain, he’d inevitably come 
to hate both himself and that activity in the end? 

Of course. 

Then let’s never include a forgetful soul among those who are suffi- 
ciently philosophical for our purposes, but look for one with a good 
memory. 

Absolutely. 

Now, we’d certainly say that the unmusical and graceless element in a 
person’s nature draws him to lack of due measure. 

Of course. 

And do you think that truth is akin to what lacks due measure or to 
what is measured? 

To what is measured. 

Then, in addition to those other things, let’s look for someone whose 
thought is by nature measured and graceful and is easily led to the form 
of each thing that is. 

Of course. 

Well, then, don’t you think the properties we’ve enumerated are compat- 


BOOK ҮІ 486a-488a 161 


ible with one another and that each is necessary to а soul that is to have 
an adequate and complete grasp of that which is? е 

They’re all completely necessary. 487 

Is there any objection you can find, then, to a way of life that no one 
can adequately follow unless he’s by nature good at remembering, quick 
to learn, high-minded, graceful, and a friend and relative of truth, justice, 
courage, and moderation? 

Not even Momus’ could find one. 

When such people have reached maturity in age and education, wouldn’t 
you entrust the city to them and to them alone? 

And Adeimantus replied: No one would be able to contradict the things 
you've said, Socrates, but on each occasion that you say them, your hearers 
are affected in some such way as this. They think that, because they're % 
inexperienced in asking and answering questions, they’re led astray a little 
bit by the argument at every question and that, when these little bits are 
added together at the end of the discussion, great is their fall, as the opposite 
of what they said at the outset comes to light. Just as inexperienced 
checkers players are trapped by the experts in the end and can’t make a 
move, so they too are trapped in the end and have nothing to say in this с 
different kind of checkers, which is played not with disks but with words. 

Yet the truth isn’t affected by this outcome. I say this with a view to the 
present case, for someone might well say now that he’s unable to oppose 

you as you ask each of your questions, yet he sees that of all those who 
take up philosophy—not those who merely dabble in it while still young 

in order to complete their upbringing and then drop it, but those who 
continue in it for a longer time—the greatest number become cranks, пої 4 
to say completely vicious, while those who seem completely decent are 
rendered useless to the city because of the studies you recommend. 

When I’d heard him out, I said: Do you think that what these people 
say is false? 

I don’t know, but Га be glad to hear what you think. 

You’d hear that they seem to me to speak the truth. 

How, then, can it be true to say that there will be no end to evilsinour е 
cities until philosophers—people we agree to be useless—rule in them? 

The question you ask needs to be answered by means of an image or 
simile. 

And you, of course, aren’t used to speaking in similes! 

So! Are you making fun of me now that you’ve landed me with a claim 
that’s so hard to establish? In any case, listen to my simile, and you'll 
appreciate all the more how greedy for images I am. What the most decent 488 
people experience in relation to their city is so hard to bear that there’s 


3. Momus is a personification of blame or censure. 


162 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


no other single experience like it. Hence to find an image of it and a 
defense for them, I must construct it from many sources, just as painters 
paint goat-stags by combining the features of different things. Imagine, 
then, that something like the following happens on a ship or on many 
ships. The shipowner is bigger and stronger than everyone else on board, 
b  buthe’s hard of hearing, а bit short-sighted, and his knowledge of seafaring 
is equally deficient. The sailors are quarreling with one another about 
steering the ship, each of them thinking that he should be the captain, 
even though he’s never learned the art of navigation, cannot point to 
anyone who taught it to him, or to a time when he learned it. Indeed, they 
claim that it isn’t teachable and are ready to cut to pieces anyone who says 
that it is. They’re always crowding around the shipowner, begging him 
с and doing everything possible to get him to turn the rudder over to them. 
And sometimes, if they don’t succeed in persuading him, they execute the 
ones who do succeed or throw them overboard, and then, having stupefied 
their noble shipowner with drugs, wine, or in some other way, they rule 
the ship, using up what’s in it and sailing in the way that people like that 
are prone to do. Moreover, they call the person who is clever at persuading 
d ог forcing the shipowner to let them rule a “navigator,” a “captain,” and 
“one who knows ships,” and dismiss anyone else as useless. They don’t 
understand that a true captain must pay attention to the seasons of the 
year, the sky, the stars, the winds, and all that pertains to his craft, if he’s 
really to be the ruler of a ship. And they don’t believe there is any craft 
that would enable him to determine how he should steer the ship, whether 
e һе others want him to or not, or any possibility of mastering this alleged 
craft or of practicing it at the same time as the craft of navigation. Don’t 
you think that the true captain will be called a real stargazer, a babbler, and 
a good-for-nothing by those who sail in ships governed in that way, in 
489 which such things happen? 

І certainly do. 

I don’t think that you need to examine the simile in detail to see that 
the ships resemble cities and their attitude to the true philosophers, but 
you already understand what І mean. 

Indeed, I do. 

Then first tell this simile to anyone who wonders why philosophers 
aren’t honored in the cities, and try to persuade him that there would be 

р far more cause for wonder if they were honored. 

J will tell him. 

Next tell him that what he says is true, that the best among the philoso- 
phers are useless to the majority. Tell him not to blame those decent 
people for this but the ones who don’t make use of them. It isn’t natural 
for the captain to beg the sailors to be ruled by him nor for the wise to 
knock at the doors of the rich—the man who came up with that wisecrack 


BOOK vı 488a-490b 163 


made a mistake.’ The natural thing is for the sick person, rich or poor, to 
knock at the doctor’s door, and for anyone who needs to be ruled to knock 
at the door of the one who can rule him. It isn’t for the ruler, if he’s truly 
any use, to beg the others to accept his rule. Tell him that he’ll make no 
mistake in likening those who rule in our cities at present to the sailors 
we mentioned just now, and those who are called useless stargazers to the 
true captains. 

That’s absolutely right. 

Therefore, it isn’t easy for the best ways of life to be highly esteemed 
by people who, as in these circumstances, follow the opposite ways. By far 
the greatest and most serious slander on philosophy, however, results from 
those who profess to follow the philosophic way of life. І mean those of 
whom the prosecutor of philosophy declared that the greatest number are 
completely vicious and the most decent useless. And I admitted that what 
he said was true, didn’t I? 

Yes. 

And haven’t we explained why the decent ones are useless? 

Yes, indeed. 

Then, do you next want us to discuss why it’s inevitable that the greater 
number are vicious and to try to show, if we can, that philosophy isn’t 
responsible for this either? 

Certainly. 

Then, let’s begin our dialogue by reminding ourselves of the point at 
which we began to discuss the nature that someone must have if he is to 
become a fine and good person. First of all, if you remember, he had to 


а 


be guided by the truth and always pursue it in every way, ог else he’d 490 


really be a boaster, with no share at all in true philosophy. 

That’s what was said. 

And isn’t this view completely contrary to the opinions currently held 
about him? 

It certainly is. 

Then, won’t it be reasonable for us to plead in his defense that it is the 
nature of the real lover of learning to struggle toward what is, not to remain 
with any of the many things that are believed to be, that, as he moves on, 
he neither loses nor lessens his erotic love until he grasps the being’ of 
each nature itself with the part of his soul that is fitted to grasp it, because 
of its kinship with it,° and that, once getting near what really is and having 


4. Aristotle, Rhetoric 1391г7-12, says that it was Simonides who, when asked whether 
it was better to be rich or wise, replied: “Rich—because the wise spend their time at 
the doors of the rich.” 

5. See 507b for an explanation of what “the being” (ho estin) of something is. 


6. See 61le-612a, Phaedo 79d, Timaeus 9да—с. 


b 


491 


164 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


intercourse with it and having begotten understanding and truth, he knows, 
truly lives, is nourished, and—at that point, but not before—is relieved 
from the pains of giving birth? 

That is the most reasonable defense possible. 

Well, then, will such a person have any part in the love of falsehood, or 
will he entirely hate it? 

He’ll hate it. 

And if truth led the way, we’d never say, I suppose, that a chorus of 
evils could ever follow in its train. 

How could it? 

But rather a healthy and just character, with moderation following it. 

That’s right. 

What need is there, then, to marshal all over again from the beginning 
the members of the philosophic nature’s chorus in their inevitable array? 
Remember that courage, high-mindedness, ease in learning, and a good 
memory all belong to it. Then you objected, saying that anyone would be 
compelled to agree with what we said, but that, if he abandoned the 
argument and looked at the very people the argument is about, he’d say 
that some of them were useless, while the majority had every kind of vice. 
So we examined the reason for this slander and have now arrived at the 
point of explaining why the majority of them are bad. And it’s for this 
reason that we’ve again taken up the nature of the true philosophers and 
defined what it necessarily has to be. 

That’s true. 

We must now look at the ways in which this nature is corrupted, how it’s 
destroyed in many people, while a small number (the ones that are called 
useless rather than bad) escape. After that, we must look in turn at the na- 
tures of the souls that imitate the philosophic nature and establish them- 
selves in its way of life, so as to see what the people are like who thereby arrive 
ata way of life they are unworthy ofand that is beyond them and who, because 
they often strike false notes, bring upon philosophy the reputation that you 
said it has with everyone everywhere. 

In what ways are they corrupted? 

Pll try to enumerate them for you if I can. I suppose that everyone would 
agree that only a few natures possess all the qualities that we just now said 
were essential to becoming a complete philosopher and that seidom occur 
naturally among human beings. Or don’t you think so? 

І certainly do. 

Consider, then, the many important ways in which these few can be 
corrupted. 

What are they? 

What will surprise you most, when you hear it, is that each of the things 
we praised in that nature tends to corrupt the soul that has it and to drag 


BOOK уі 490b-492c 165 


it away from philosophy. I mean courage, moderation, and the other things 
we mentioned. 

That does sound strange. 

Furthermore, all the things that are said to be good also corrupt it and ; 
drag it away—beauty, wealth, physical strength, relatives who are powerful 
in the city, and all that goes with these. You understand what I have in 
mind? 

I do, and Га be glad to learn even more about it. 

If you correctly grasp the general point I’m after, it will be clear to you, 
and what I’ve said before won’t seem so strange. 

What do you want me to do? 

We know that the more vigorous any seed, developing plant, or animal 4 
is, the more it is deficient in the things that are appropriate for it to have 
when it is deprived of suitable food, season, or location. 

For the bad is more opposed to the good than is the merely not good. 

Of course. 

Then it’s reasonable to say that the best nature fares worse, when 
unsuitably nurtured, than an ordinary one. 

It is. 

Then won’t we say the same thing about souls too, Adeimantus, that 
those with the best natures become outstandingly bad when they гесеіуеа е 
bad upbringing? Or do you think that great injustices and pure wickedness 
originate in an ordinary nature rather than in a vigorous one that has been 
corrupted by its upbringing? Or that a weak nature is ever the cause of 
either great good or great evil? 

No, youre right. 

Now, I think that the philosophic nature as we defined it will inevitably 
grow to possess every virtue if it happens to receive appropriate instruction, 492 
but if it is sown, planted, and grown in an inappropriate environment, it 
will develop in quite the opposite way, unless some god happens to come 
to its rescue. Or do you agree with the general opinion that certain young 
people are actually corrupted by sophists—that there are certain sophists 
with significant influence on the young who corrupt them through private 
teaching? Isn’t it rather the very people who say this who are the greatest 
sophists of all, since they educate most completely, turning young and old, 
men and women, into precisely the kind of people they want them to Бе? % 

When do they do that? 

When many of them are sitting together in assemblies, courts, theaters, 
army camps, or in some other public gathering of the crowd, they object 
very loudly and excessively to some of the things that are said or done and 
approve others in the samé way, shouting and clapping, so that the very 
rocks and surroundings echo the din of their praise or blame and double г 
it. In circumstances like that, what is the effect, as they say, on a young 


493 


166 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


person’s heart? What private training can hold out and not be swept away 
by that kind of praise or blame and be carried by the flood wherever it 
goes, so that he’ll say that the same things are beautiful or ugly as the 
crowd does, follow the same way of life as they do, and be the same sort 
of person as they are? 

He will be under great compulsion to do so, Socrates. 

And yet we haven’t mentioned the greatest compulsion of all. 

What’s that? 

It’s what these educators and sophists impose by their actions if their 
words fail to persuade. Or don’t you know that they punish anyone who 
isn’t persuaded, with disenfranchisement, fines, or death? 

They most certainly do. 

What other sophist, then, or what private conversations do you think 
will prevail in opposition to these? 

I don’t suppose that any will. 

No, indeed, it would be very foolish even to try to oppose them, for 
there isn’t now, hasn’t been in the past, nor ever will be in the future 
anyone with a character so unusual that he has been educated to virtue in 
spite of the contrary education he received from the mob—I mean, a 
human character; the divine, as the saying goes, is an exception to the 
rule. You should realize that if anyone is saved and becomes what he 
ought to be under our present constitutions, he has been saved—you 


might rightly say—by a divine dispensation. 
I agree. 
Well, then, you should also agree to this. 
What? 


Not one of those paid private teachers, whom the people call sophists 
and consider to be their rivals in craft,’ teaches anything other than the 
convictions that the majority express when they are gathered together. 
Indeed, these are precisely what the sophists call wisdom. It’s as if someone 
were learning the moods and appetites of a huge, strong beast that he’s 
rearing—how to approach and handle it, when it is most difficult to deal 
with or most gentle and what makes it so, what sounds it utters in either 
condition, and what sounds soothe or anger it. Having learned all this 
through tending the beast over a period of time, he calls this knack wisdom, 
gathers his information together as if it were a craft,” and starts to teach 
it. In truth, he knows nothing about which of these convictions is fine or 
shameful, good or bad, just or unjust, but he applies all these names in 
accordance with how the beast reacts—calling what it enjoys good and 


7. The craft in question is presumably that of teaching virtue. 


8. See 232сп. 10. The distinction between a craft (techné) and a knack (tribé, empeiria) 
is explained in the Gorgias 462b ff. 


BOOK VI 492c-494b 167 


what angers it bad. He has no other account to give of these terms. And 
he calls what he is compelled to do just and fine, for he hasn’t seen and 
cannot show anyone else how much compulsion and goodness really differ. 
Don’t you think, by god, that someone like that is a strange educator? 

I do indeed. 

Then does this person seem any different from the one who believes 
that it is wisdom to understand the moods and pleasures of a majority 
gathered from all quarters, whether they concern painting, music, or, for 4 
that matter, politics? If anyone approaches the majority to exhibit his poetry 
or some other piece of craftsmanship or his service to the city and gives 
them mastery over him to any degree beyond what’s unavoidable, he’ll be 
under Diomedean compulsion,’ as it’s called, to do the sort of thing of 
which they approve. But have you ever heard anyone presenting an argu- 
ment that such things are truly good and beautiful that wasn’t absolutely 
ridiculous? 

No, and I don’t expect ever to hear one. е 

Keeping all this in mind, recall the following question: Сап the majority 
in any way tolerate or accept the reality of the beautiful itself, as opposed 
to the many beautiful things, or the reality of each thing itself, as opposed 
to the corresponding many? 494 

Not in any way. 

Then the majority cannot be philosophic. 

They cannot. 

Hence they inevitably disapprove of those who practice philosophy? 

Inevitably. 

And so do all those private individuals who associate with the majority 
and try to please them. 

Clearly. 

Then, because of all that, do you see any salvation for someone who is 
by nature a philosopher, to insure that he’ll practice philosophy correctly 
to the end? Think about what we’ve said before. We agreed that ease in 
learning, а good memory, courage, and high-mindedness belong to the / 
philosophic nature. 

Yes. 

And won’t someone with a nature like that be first among the children 
in everything, especially if his body has a nature that matches that of his 
soul? 


9. The origin of the phrase is uncertain but a likely source is in the following story. 
Odysseus attempted to kill Diomedes when the two were returning from Troy to the 
Greek camp, but failed. Diomedes punished him by tying his arms together and driving 
him home with blows from the flat of his sword. But, whatever the source, the phrase 
refers to inescapable compulsion. 


168 ADEIMANTUS/SOCRATES 


How could he not be? 

Then I suppose that, as he gets older, his family and fellow citizens will 
want to make use of him in connection with their own affairs. 

Of course. 

Therefore they’ll pay court to him with their requests and honors, trying 

с Бу their flattery to secure for themselves ahead of time the power that is 
going to be his. 

That’s what usually happens, at any rate. 

What do you think someone like that will do in such circumstances, 
especially if he happens to be from a great city, in which he’s rich, 
well-born, good-looking, and tall? Won’t he be filled with impractical 
expectations and think himself capable of managing the affairs, not only 
of the Greeks, but of the barbarians as well? And as a result, won’t he 
exalt himself to great heights and be brimming with pretension and pride 

d that is empty and lacks understanding?" 

He certainly will. 

And if someone approaches a young man in that condition and gently 
tells him the truth, namely, that that there’s no understanding in him, that 
he needs it, and that it can’t be acquired unless he works like a slave to 
attain it, do you think that it will be easy for him to listen when he’s in the 
midst of so many evils? 

Far from it. 

And even if a young man of that sort somehow sees the point and is 
guided and drawn to philosophy because of his noble nature and his 

с kinship with reason, what do you think those people will do, if they believe 
that they’re losing their use of him and his companionship? Is there 
anything they won’t do or say to him to prevent him from being persuaded? 
Or anything they won’t do or say about his persuader—whether plotting 
against him in private or publicly bringing him into court—to prevent him 
from such persuasion? 

495 There certainly isn’t. 

Then, is there any chance that such a person will practice philosophy? 

None at all. 

Do you see, then, that we weren’t wrong to say that, when someone 
with a philosophic nature is badly brought up, the very components of his 
nature—together with the other so-called goods, such as wealth and other 
similar advantages—are themselves in a way the cause of his falling away 
from the philosophic way of life? 

I do, and what we said was right- 


10. It is widely believed that Plato has Alcibiades in mind here and in what follows. 
See Plato, Symposium 2154-2164. Alcibiades’ extraordinary career is described in 
Thucydides, Books 6-8. 


BOOK уі 494р-49ба 169 


These, then, аге the many ways іп which the best nature—which is 
already rare enough, as we said—is destroyed and corrupted, so that it 
cannot follow the best way of life. And it is among these men that we find > 
the ones who do the greatest evils to cities and individuals and also—if 
they happen to be swept that way by the current''—the greatest good, for 
a petty nature will never do anything great, either to an individual or a 
city. 

That’s very true. 

When these men, for whom philosophy is most appropriate, fall away 
from her, they leave her desolate and unwed, and they themselves lead с 
lives that are inappropriate and untrue. Then others, who are unworthy 
of her, come to her as to an orphan deprived of the protection of kinsmen 
and disgrace her. These are the ones who are responsible for the re- 
proaches that you say are cast upon philosophy by those who revile her, 
namely, that some of those who consort with her are useless, while the 
majority deserve to suffer many bad things. 

Yes, that is indeed what is said. 

And it’s a reasonable thing to say, for other little men—the ones who 
are most sophisticated at their own little crafts—seeing that this position, 
which is full of fine names and adornments, is vacated, leap gladly from 
those little crafts to philosophy, like prisoners escaping from jail who take 4 
refuge in a temple. Despite her present poor state, philosophy is still more 
high-minded than these other crafts, so that many people with defective 
natures desire to possess her, even though their souls are cramped and 
spoiled by the mechanical nature of their work, in just the way that their 
bodies are mutilated by their crafts and labors. Isn’t that inevitable? е 

It certainly is. 

Don’t you think that a man of this sort looks exactly like a little bald- 
headed tinker who has come into some money and, having been just 
released from jail, has taken a bath, put on a new cloak, got himself up as 
a bridegroom, and is about to marry the boss’s daughter because she is 
poor and abandoned? 

They’re exactly the same. 496 

And what kind of children will that marriage produce? Won’t they be 
illegitimate and inferior? 

They have to be. 

What about when men who are unworthy of education approach philos- 
ophy and consort with her unworthily? What kinds of thoughts and opin- 
ions are we to say they beget? Won’t they truly be what are properly called 
sophisms, things that have nothing genuine about them or worthy of being 
called true wisdom? 


11. See 485d. 


170 ADEIMANTUS/SOCRATES 


That’s absolutely right. 

Then there remains, Adeimantus, only a very small group who consort 
with philosophy in a way that’s worthy of her: A noble and well brought-up 
character, for example, kept down by exile, who remains with philosophy 

b according to his nature because there is no one to corrupt him, or a great 
soul living in a small city, who disdains the city’s affairs and looks beyond 
them. A very few might be drawn to philosophy from other crafts that they 
rightly despise because they have good natures. And some might be held 
back by the bridle that restrains our friend Theages'’—for he’s in every 
way qualified to be tempted away from philosophy, but his physical illness 

с  restrains him by keeping him out of politics. Finally, my own case is hardly 
worth mentioning—my daimonic sign ™—because it has happened to no 
one before me, or to only a very few. Now, the members of this small 
group have tasted how sweet and blessed a possession philosophy is, and 
at the same time they’ve also seen the madness of the majority and realized, 
in a word, that hardly anyone acts sanely in public affairs and that there 
is no ally with whom they might go to the aid of justice and survive, that 

d instead they’d perish before they could profit either their city or their 
friends and be useless both to themselves and to others, just like a man 
who has fallen among wild animals and is neither willing to join them in 
doing injustice nor sufficiently strong to oppose the general savagery alone. 
Taking all this into account, they lead a quiet life and do their own work. 
Thus, like someone who takes refuge under a little wall from a storm of 
dust or hail driven by the wind, the philosopher—seeing others filled with 
lawlessness—is satisfied if he can somehow lead his present life free from 
injustice and impious acts and depart from it with good hope, blameless 

e апа content. 

497 Well, that’s no small thing for him to have accomplished before de- 
parting. 

But it isn’t the greatest either, since he didn’t chance upon a constitution 
that suits him. Under a suitable one, his own growth will be fuller, and 
he’ll save the community as well as himself. It seems to me that we’ve now 
sensibly discussed the reasons why philosophy is slandered and why the 
slanderer is unjust—unless, of course, you have something to add. 

I have nothing to add on that point. But which of our present constitu- 
tions do you think is suitable for philosophers? 

b None of them. That’s exactly my complaint: None of our present 


12. Theages figures in a Platonic dialogue named after him, which discusses the 
relationship between politics and philosophy. However, this dialogue is judged by many 
scholars to be of doubtful authenticity. 


13. See Plato, Apology 31с-32а, where Socrates explains that his daimonion has kept 
him out of politics. 


BOOK VI 496a-498a 171 


constitutions is worthy of the philosophic nature, and, as a result, this 
nature is perverted and altered, for, just as a foreign seed, sown in alien 
ground, is likely to be overcome by the native species and to fade away 
among them, so the philosophic nature fails to develop its full power and 
declines into a different character. But if it were to find the best constitu- 
tion, as it is itself the best, it would be clear that it is really divine and that 
other natures and ways of life are merely human. Obviously you’re going 
to ask next what the best constitution is. 

You’re wrong there; I wasn’t going to ask that, but whether it was the 
constitution we described when we were founding our city or some other 
one. 

In the other respects, it is that one. But we said even then” that 
there must always be some people in the city who have a theory of the 
constitution, the same one that guided you, the lawgiver, when you made 
the laws. 

We did say that. 

Yes, but we didn’t emphasize it sufficiently, for fear of what your 
objections have made plain, namely, that its proof would be long and 
difficult. And indeed what remains is by no means easy to go through. 

What’s that? 

How a city can engage in philosophy without being destroyed, for all 
great things are prone to fall, and, as the saying goes, fine things are really 
hard to achieve." 

Nevertheless, to complete our discussion, we’ll have to get clear about 
this. 

If anything prevents us from doing it, it won’t be lack of willingness but 
lack of ability. At least you’ll see how willing / am, for notice again how 
enthusiastically and recklessly I say that the manner in which a city ought 
to take up the philosophic way of life is the opposite of what it does at 
present. 

How? 

At present, those who study philosophy do so as young men who have 
just left childhood behind and have yet to take up household management 
and money-making. But just when they reach the hardest part—I mean 
the part that has to do with giving a rational account—they abandon it and 
are regarded as fully trained in philosophy. In later life, they think they’re 
doing well if they are willing to be in an invited audience when others are 
doing philosophy, for they think they should do this only as a sideline. 
And, with a few exceptions, by the time they reach old age, their eagerness 


14. See 412a—b, which gives a hint of this need. 
15. See Plato, Hippias Major 304b ff. 


498 


499 


172 SOCRATES/ADEIMANTUS 


for philosophy is quenched more thoroughly than the sun of Heraclitus, 
which is never rekindled." 

What should they do? 

Entirely the opposite. As youths and children, they should put their 
minds to youthful education and philosophy and take care of their bodies 
at a time when they are growing into manhood, so as to acquire a helper 
for philosophy. As they grow older and their souls begin to reach maturity, 
they should increase their mental exercises. Then, when their strength 
begins to fail and they have retired from politics and military service, they 
should graze freely in the pastures of philosophy and do nothing else—I 
mean the ones who are to live happily and, in death, add a fitting destiny 
in that other place to the life they have lived. 

You seem to be speaking with true enthusiasm, Socrates. But I’m sure 
that most of your hearers, beginning with Thrasymachus, will oppose you 
with even greater enthusiasm and not be at all convinced. 

Don’t slander Thrasymachus and me just as we’ve become friends— 
not that we were enemies before. We won’t relax our efforts until we either 
convince him and the others or, at any rate, do something that may 
benefit them in a later incarnation, when, reborn, they happen upon these 
arguments again.” 

That’s a short time you're talking about! 

It’s nothing compared to the whole of time. All the same, it’s no wonder 
that the majority of people aren’t convinced by our arguments, for they’ve 
never seen a man that fits our plan (and the rhymes of this sort they have 
heard are usually intended and not, like this one, the product of mere 
сһапсе).' That is to say, they’ve never seen a man or a number of men 
who themselves rhymed with virtue, were assimilated to it as far as possible, 
and ruled in a city of the same type. Or do you think they have? 

I don’t think so at all. 

Nor have they listened sufficiently to fine and free arguments that search 
out the truth in every way for the sake of knowledge but that keep away 
from the sophistications and eristic quibbles that, both in public trials and 
in private gatherings, aim at nothing except reputation and disputation. 

No, they haven’t. 


16. Aristotle (Meteorologica 355а14) reports Heraclitus as believing that “the sun is new 
every day.” Hence the sun not only sets or is quenched at night, it actually ceases to 
exist, being replaced by a totally new sun the next morning. 

17. See 614b ff. = 


18. Plato is mocking the rhetoricians, who were overfond of rhyme. Hence his own 
words, ou gar popote eidon genomenon to nun legomenon, which mean “they’ve never seen 
anything come into being which matches our account,” exhibit the phenomenon he is 
mocking. 


BOOK vI 498a-500b 173 


It was because of this, because we foresaw these difficulties, that we 
were afraid. Nonetheless, we were compelled by the truth to say that no 
city, constitution, or individual man will ever become perfect until either 
some chance event compels those few philosophers who aren’t vicious 
(the ones who are now called useless) to take charge of a city, whether 
they want to or not, and compels the city to obey them, or until a god 
inspires the present rulers and kings or their offspring with a true erotic 
love for true philosophy. Now, it cannot be reasonably maintained, in my 
view, that either of these things is impossible, but if it could, we’d be justly 
ridiculed for indulging in wishful thinking. Isn’t that so? 

It is. 

Then, if in the limitless past, those who were foremost in philosophy 
were forced to take charge of a city or if this is happening now in some 
foreign place far beyond our ken or if it will happen in the future, we are 
prepared to maintain our argument that, at whatever time the muse of 
philosophy controls a city, the constitution we’ve described will also exist 
at that time, whether it is past, present, or future. Since it is not impossible 
for this to happen, we are not speaking of impossibilities. That it is difficult 
for it to happen, however, we agree ourselves. 

Thats my opinion, anyway. 

But the majority don’t share your opinion—is that what you are going 
to say? 

They probably don’t. 

You should not make such wholesale charges against the majority, for 
they'll no doubt come to а different opinion, if instead of indulging your 
love of victory at their expense, you soothe them and try to remove their 
slanderous prejudice against the love of learning, by pointing out what you 
mean by a philosopher and by defining the philosophic nature and way of 
life, as we did just now, so that they’ll realize that you don’t mean the 
same people as they do. And if they once see it your way, even you will 
say that they'll have a different opinion from the one you just attributed 
to them and will answer differently. Or do you think that anyone who is 
gentle and without malice is harsh with someone who is neither irritable 
nor malicious? РІ anticipate your answer and say that a few people may 
have such a harsh character, but not the majority. 

And, of course, I agree. 

Then don’t you also agree that the harshness the majority exhibit 
towards philosophy is caused by those outsiders who don’t belong and 
who’ve burst in like a band of revellers, always abusing one another, 
indulging their love of quarrels, and arguing about human beings in a way 
that is wholly inappropriate-to philosophy? 

I do indeed. 

No one whose thoughts are truly directed towards the things that are, 


d 


500 


174 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


Adeimantus, has the leisure to look down at human affairs or to be filled 
with envy and hatred by competing with people. Instead, as he looks at 

с апа studies things that are organized and always the same, that neither do 
injustice to one another nor suffer it, being all in a rational order, he 
imitates them and tries to become as like them as he can. Or do you think 
that someone can consort with things he admires without imitating them? 

I do not. It’s impossible. 

Then the philosopher, by consorting with what is ordered and divine 
and despite all the slanders around that say otherwise, himself becomes 

d ав divine and ordered as a human being can. 

That’s absolutely true. 

And if he should come to be compelled to put what he sees there into 
people’s characters, whether into a single person or into a populace, 
instead of shaping only his own, do you think that he will be a poor 
craftsman of moderation, justice, and the whole of popular virtue? 

He least of all. 

And when the majority realize that what we are saying about the philoso- 
pher is true, will they be harsh with him or mistrust us when we say that 

e the city will never find happiness until its outline is sketched by painters 
who use the divine model? 

They won’t be harsh, if indeed they realize this. But what sort of sketch 

501 do you mean? 

They'd take the city and the characters of human beings as their sketch- 
ing slate, but first they'd wipe it clean—which isn’t at all an easy thing to 
do. And you should know that this is the plain difference between them 
and others, namely, that they refuse to take either an individual or a city 
in hand or to write laws, unless they receive a clean slate or are allowed 
to clean it themselves. 

And they’d be right to refuse. 

Then don’t you think they’d next sketch the outline of the constitution? 

Of course. 

b And I suppose that, as they work, they’d look often in each direction, 
towards the natures of justice, beauty, moderation,” and the like, on the 
one hand, and towards those they’re trying to put into human beings, on 
the other. And in this way they’d mix and blend the various ways of life 
in the city until they produced a human image based on what Homer too 
called “the divine form and image” when it occurred among human 
beings.” 

That’s right. 


БИ 


19. Ге. the forms of justice, beauty, and moderation. See 476b, Phaedo 103b, Parme- 
nides 132d, Cratylus 389а-390а. 


20. See, for example, Лай 1.131. 


BOOK vı 500b-502b 175 


They'd erase one thing, I suppose, and draw in another until they’d 
made characters for human beings that the gods would love as much as 
possible. с 

At any rate, that would certainly result in the finest sketch. 

Then is this at all persuasive to those you said were straining to attack 
us—that the person we were praising is really a painter of constitutions? 
They were angry because we entrusted the city to him: Are they any 
calmer, now that they've heard what we had to say? 

They'll be much calmer, if they have any moderation. 

Indeed, how could they possibly dispute it? Will they deny that philoso- 
phers are lovers of what is or of the truth? d 

That would be absurd. 

Or that their nature as we’ve described it is close to the best? 

They can’t deny that either. 

Or that such a nature, if it follows its own way of life, isn’t as completely 
good and philosophic as any other? Or that the people we excluded are 
more so? 

Certainly not. е 

Then will they still be angry when we say that, until philosophers take 
control of a city, there'll be no respite from evil for either city or citizens, 
and the constitution we’ve been describing in theory will never be com- 
pleted in practice? 

They'll probably be less angry. 

Then if it’s all right with you, let’s not say that they'll simply be less 
angry but that they'll become altogether gentle and persuaded, so that 
they'll be shamed into agreeing with us, if nothing else. 502 

It’s all right with me. 

Let’s assume, therefore, that they've been convinced on this point. Will 
anyone dispute our view that the offspring of kings or rulers could be born 
with philosophic natures? 

No one would do that. 

Could anyone claim that, if such offspring are born, they'll inevitably 
be corrupted? We agree ourselves that it’s hard for them to be saved from 
corruption, but could anyone claim that in the whole of time not one of 
them could be saved? b 

How could he? 

But surely one such individual would be sufficient to bring to completion 
all the things that now seem so incredible, provided that his city obeys 
him. 

One would be sufficient. 

If a ruler established the laws and ways of life we’ve described, it is 
surely not impossible that the citizens would be willing to carry them out. 

Not at all. 


503 


176 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


And would it be either astonishing or impossible that others should 
think as we do? 

I don’t suppose it would. 

But I think our earlier discussion was sufficient to show that these 
arrangements are best, if only they are possible. 

Indeed it was. 

Then we can now conclude that this legislation is best, if only it is 
possible, and that, while it is hard for it to come about, it is not impossible. 

We can. 

Now that this difficulty has been disposed of, we must deal with what 
remains, namely, how the saviors of our constitution will come to be in 
the city, what subjects and ways of life will cause them to come into being, 
and at what ages they’ll take each of them up. 

Indeed we must. 

It wasn’t very clever of me to omit from our earlier discussion the 
troublesome topics of acquiring wives, begetting children, and appointing 
rulers, just because I knew that the whole truth would provoke resentment 
and would be hard to bring about in practice, for as it turned out, I had 
to go through these matters anyway. The subject of women and children 
has been adequately dealt with, but that of the rulers has to be taken up 
again from the beginning. We said, if you remember, that they must show 
themselves to be lovers of their city when tested by pleasure and pain and 
that they must hold on to their resolve through labors, fears, and all other 
adversities. Anyone who was incapable of doing so was to be rejected, 
while anyone who came through unchanged—like gold tested in a fire— 
was to be made ruler and receive prizes both while he lived and after his 
death. These were the sort of things we were saying while our argument, 
afraid of stirring up the very problems that now confront us, veiled its face 
and slipped by. 

That’s very true; I do remember it. 

We hesitated to say the things we’ve now dared to say anyway. So let’s 
now also dare to say that those who are to be made our guardians in the 
most exact sense of the term must be philosophers. 

Let’s do it. 

Then you should understand that there will probably be only a few of 
them, for they have to have the nature we described, and its parts mostly 
grow in separation and are rarely found in the same person. 

What do you mean? 

You know that ease of learning, good memory, quick wits, smartness, 
youthful passion, high-mindedness, and all the other things that go along 
with these are rarely willing to grow together in a mind that will choose 
an orderly life that is quiet and completely stable, for the people who 


BOOK VI 502b-504c 177 


possess the former traits are carried by their quick wits wherever chance 
leads them and have no stability at all. 

That’s true. 

On the other hand, people with stable characters, who don’t change 
easily, who aren’t easily frightened in battle, and whom one would employ 
because of their greater reliability, exhibit similar traits when it comes to d 
learning: They are as hard to move and teach as people whose brains have 
become numb, and they are filled with sleep and yawning whenever they 
have to learn anything. 

That’s so. 

Yet we say that someone must have a fine and goodly share of both 
characters, or he won’t receive the truest education, honors, or rule. 

That’s right. 

Then, don’t you think that such people will be rare? 

Of course. 

Therefore they must be tested in the labors, fears, and pleasures we е 
mentioned previously. But they must also be exercised in many other 
subjects—which we didn’t mention but are adding now—to see whether 
they can tolerate the most important subjects or will shrink from them like 
the cowards who shrink from other tests. 504 

It’s appropriate to examine them like that. But what do you mean by 
the most important subjects? 

Do you remember when we distinguished three parts in the soul, in 
order to help bring out what justice, moderation, courage, and wisdom 
each is? 

If I didn’t remember that, it wouldn’t be just for me to hear the rest. 

What about what preceded it? 

What was that? 

We said, I believe, that, in order to get the finest possible view of these b 
matters, we would need to take a longer road that would make them plain 
to anyone who took it but that it was possible to give demonstrations of 
what they are that would be up to the standard of the previous argument.” 
And you said that that would be satisfactory. So it seems to me that our 
discussion at that time fell short of exactness, but whether or not it satisfied 
you is for you to say. 

I thought you gave us good measure and so, apparently, did the others. 

Any measure of such things that falls short in any way of that which is с 
is not good measure, for nothing incomplete is the measure of anything, 
although people are sometimes of the opinion that an incomplete treatment 
is nonetheless adequate and makes further investigation unnecessary. 


21. See 435d, 


178 ADEIMANTUS/SOCRATES 


Indeed, laziness causes many people to think that. 

It is a thought that a guardian of a city and its laws can well do without. 

Probably so. 

Well, then, he must take the longer road and put as much effort into 
learning as into physical training, for otherwise, as we were just saying, he 

d will never reach the goal of the most important subject and the most 
appropriate one for him to learn. 

Aren’t these virtues, then, the most important things? he asked. Is 
there anything even more important than justice and the other virtues we 
discussed? 

There is something more important. However, even for the virtues 
themselves, it isn’t enough to look at a mere sketch, as we did before, 
while neglecting the most complete account. It’s ridiculous, isn’t it, to 
strain every nerve to attain the utmost exactness and clarity about other 
things of little value and not to consider the most important things worthy 

e ofthe greatest exactness? 

It certainly is. But do you think that anyone is going to let you off without 
asking you what this most important subject is and what it concerns? 

No, indeed, and you can ask me too. You’ve certainly heard the answer 
often enough, but now either you aren’t thinking or you intend to make 
trouble for me again by interrupting. And I suspect the latter, for you've 

505 often heard it said that the form of the good is the most important thing 
to learn about and that it’s by their relation to it that just things and the 
others become useful and beneficial. You know very well now that I am 
going to say this, and, besides, that we have no adequate knowledge of it. And 
you also know that, if we don’t know it, even the fullest possible knowledge 
of other things is of no benefit to us, any more than if we acquire any 
possession without the good of it. Or do you think that it is any advantage 

b to have every kind of possession without the good of it? Or to know 
everything except the good, thereby knowing nothing fine or good? 

No, by god, I don’t. 

Furthermore, you certainly know that the majority believe that pleasure 
is the good, while the more sophisticated believe that it is knowledge. 

Indeed I do. 

And you know that those who believe this can’t tell us what sort of 
knowledge it is, however, but in the end are forced to say that it is 
knowledge of the good. 

And that’s ridiculous. 

с Of course it is. They blame us for пос knowing the good and then turn 
around and talk to us as if we did know it. They say that it is knowledge 
of the good—as if we understood what they’re speaking about when they 
utter the word “good.” 

That’s completely true. 


BOOK уі 504с-506с 179 


What about those who define the good as pleasure? Are they any less 
full of confusion than the others? Aren’t even they forced to admit that 
there are bad pleasures? 

Most definitely. 

So, I think, they have to agree that the same things are both good and 
bad. Isn’t that true? 

Of course. 

It’s clear, then, isn’t it, why there are many large controversies about 
this? 

How could it be otherwise? 

And isn’t this also clear? In the case of just and beautiful things, many 
people are content with what are believed to be so, even if they aren’t really 
so, and they act, acquire, and form their own beliefs on that basis. Nobody is 
satisfied to acquire things that are merely believed to be good, however, but 
everyone wants the things that really are good and disdains mere belief here. 

That’s right. 

Every soul pursues the good and does whatever it does for its sake. It 
divines that the good is something but it is perplexed and cannot adequately 
grasp what it is or acquire the sort of stable beliefs it has about other 
things, and so it misses the benefit, if any, that even those other things 
may give. Will we allow the best people in the city, to whom we entrust 
everything, to be so in the dark about something of this kind and of this 
importance? 

That’s the last thing we’d do. 

I don’t suppose, at least, that just and fine things will have acquired 
much of a guardian in someone who doesn’t even know in what way they 
are good. And I divine that no one will have adequate knowledge of them 
until he knows this. 

You’ve divined well. 

But won’t our constitution be perfectly ordered, if a guardian who knows 
these things is in charge of it? 

Necessarily. But, Socrates, you must also tell us whether you consider 
the good to be knowledge or pleasure or something else altogether. 

What a man! It’s been clear for some time that other people’s opinions 
about these matters wouldn’t satisfy you. 

Well, Socrates, it doesn’t seem right to me for you to be willing to state 
other people’s convictions but not your own, especially when you’ve spent 
so much time occupied with these matters. 

What? Do you think it’s right to talk about things one doesn’t know as 
if one does know them? 

Not as if one knows theni, he said, but one ought to be willing to state 
one’s opinions as such. 

What? Haven’t you noticed that opinions without knowledge are shame- 


506 


180 SOCRATES/ADEIMANTUS/GLAUCON 


ful and ugly things? The best of them are blind—or do you think that 
those who express a true opinion without understanding are any different 
from blind people who happen to travel the right road? 

They’re no different. 

Do you want to look at shameful, blind, and crooked things, then, when 

d you might hear illuminating and fine ones from other people? 

By god, Socrates, Glaucon said, don’t desert us with the end almost in 
sight. We’ll be satisfied if you discuss the good as you discussed justice, 
moderation, and the rest. 

That, my friend, I said, would satisfy me too, but I’m afraid that I won’t 
be up to it and that PII disgrace myself and look ridiculous by trying. So 
let’s abandon the quest for what the good itself is for the time being, for 

e even to arrive at my own view about it is too big a topic for the discussion 
we are now started on.” But I am willing to tell you about what is apparently 
an offspring of the good and most like it. Is that agreeable to you, or would 
you rather we let the whole matter drop? 

It is. The story about the father remains a debt you’ll pay another time. 

507 | wish that I could pay the debt in full, and you receive it instead of just 
the interest. So here, then, is this child and offspring of the good. But be 
careful that I don’t somehow deceive you unintentionally by giving you an 
illegitimate account of the child.” 

We'll be as careful as possible, so speak on. 

I will when we’ve come to an agreement and recalled some things that 
we’ve already said both here and inany other times. 

b Which ones? 

We say that there are many beautiful things and many good things, and 
so on for each kind, and in this way we distinguish them in words. 

We do. 

And what is the main thing, we speak of beauty itself and good itself, 
and so in the case of all the things that we then set down as many, we turn 
about and set down in accord with a single form of each, believing that 
there is but one, and call it “the being” of each. 

That’s true. 

And we say that the many beautiful things and the rest are visible but 
not intelligible, while the forms are intelligible but not visible. 

That’s completely true. 

С With what part of ourselves do we see visible things? 


22. See 53le ff. 2 

23. Throughout, Socrates is punning on the word tokos, which means either a child 
or the interest on capital. 

24. “Но estin”: literally “the it is”. This is what answers the question “what is 102”. 
It refers to what we call an essence. Socrates would then be saying that the essence 
of the fineness present in many things is the form of the fine. 


BOOK VI 506c-508b 181 


With our sight. 

And so audible things are heard by hearing, and with our other senses 
we perceive all the other perceptible things. 

That’s right. 

Have you considered how lavish the maker of our senses was in making 
the power to see and be seen? 

I can’t say I have. 

Well, consider it this way. Do hearing and sound need another kind of 
thing in order for the former to hear and the latter to be heard, a third 
thing in whose absence the one won’t hear or the other be heard? d 

No, they need nothing else. 

And if there are any others that need such a thing, there can’t be many 
of them. Can you think of one? 

I can’t. 

You don’t realize that sight and the visible have such a need? 

How so? 

Sight may be present in the eyes, and the one who has it may try to use 
it, and colors may be present in things, but unless a third kind of thing is 
present, which is naturally adapted for this very purpose, you know that 
sight will see nothing, and the colors will remain unseen. е 

What kind of thing do you mean? 

I mean what you call light. 

Yow’re right. 

Then it isn’t an insignificant kind of link that connects the sense of 
sight and the power to be seen—it is a more valuable link than any other 508 
linked things have got, if indeed light is something valuable. 

And, of course, it’s very valuable. 

Which of the gods in heaven would you name as the cause and controller 
of this, the one whose light causes our sight to see in the best way and the 
visible things to be seen? 

The same one you and others would name. Obviously, the answer to 
your question is the sun. 

And isn’t sight by nature related to that god in this way? 

Which way? 

Sight isn’t the sun, neither sight itself nor that in which it comes to be, 
namely, the eye. b 

No, it certainly isn’t. 

But I think that it is the most sunlike of the senses. 

Very much so. 

And it receives from the sun the power it has, just like an influx from 
an overflowing treasury. 

Certainly. 

The sun is not sight, but isn’t it the cause of sight itself and seen by it? 


182 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


That’s right. 

Let’s say, then, that this is what I called the offspring of the good, which 
the good begot as its analogue. What the good itself is in the intelligible 
realm, in relation to understanding and intelligible things, the sun is in 

с Ње visible realm, in relation to sight and visible things. 

How? Explain a bit more. 

You know that, when we turn our eyes to things whose colors are no 
longer in the light of day but in the gloom of night, the eyes are dimmed 
and seem nearly blind, as if clear vision were no longer in them. 

Of course. 

Yet whenever one turns them on things illuminated by the sun, they see 

d clearly, and vision appears in those very same eyes? 

Indeed. 

Well, understand the soul in the same way: When it focuses on some- 
thing illuminated by truth and what is, it understands, knows, and appar- 
ently possesses understanding, but when it focuses on what is mixed with 
obscurity, on what comes to be and passes away, it opines and is dimmed, 
changes its opinions this way and that, and seems bereft of understanding. 

It does seem that way. 

So that what gives truth to the things known and the power to know to 

e Ше knower is the form of the good. And though itis the cause of knowledge 
and truth, it is also an object of knowledge. Both knowledge and truth are 
beautiful things, but the good is other and more beautiful than they. In 
the visible realm, light and sight are rightly considered sunlike, but it is 

509 wrong to think that they are the sun, so here it is right to think of knowledge 
and truth as goodlike but wrong to think that either of them is the good— 
for the good is yet more prized. 

This is an inconceivably beautiful thing you’re talking about, if it pro- 
vides both knowledge and truth and is superior to them in beauty. You 
surely don’t think that a thing like that could be pleasure. 

Hush! Let’s examine its image in more detail as follows. 

b How? 

You'll be willing to say, I think, that the sun not only provides visible 
things with the power to be seen but also with coming to be, growth, and 
nourishment, although it is not itself coming to be. 

How could it be? 

Therefore, you should also say that not only do the objects of knowledge 
owe their being known to the good, but their being is also due to it, 
although the good is not being, but.superior to it in rank and power. 

с And Glaucon comically said: By Apollo, what a daimonic superiority! 

It’s your own fault; you forced me to tell you my opinion about it. 

And І don’t want you to stop either. So continue to explain its similarity 
to the sun, if you’ve omitted anything. 


BOOK vi 508b-510a 183 


I'm certainly omitting a lot. 

Well, don’t, not even the smallest thing. 

I think Г] have to omit a fair bit, but, as far as is possible at the moment, 

I won’t omit anything voluntarily. 

Don’t. 

Understand, then, that, as we said, there are these two things, one d 
sovereign of the intelligible kind and place, the other of the visible (I don’t 
say “of heaven” so as not to seem to you to be playing the sophist with the 
пате”). In any case, you have two kinds of thing, visible and intelligible. 

Right. 

It is like a line divided into two unequal sections.” Then divide each 
section—namely, that of the visible and that of the intelligible—in the 
same ratio as the line. In terms now of relative clarity and opacity, one 
subsection of the visible consists of images. And by images I mean, first, 
shadows, then reflections in water and in all close-packed, smooth, апа е 
shiny materials, and everything of that sort, if you understand. 510 

I do. 

In the other subsection of the visible, put the originals of these images, 
namely, the animals around us, all the plants, and the whole class of 
manufactured things. 

Consider them put. 


25. The play may be on the similarity of sound between ouranou (“of heaven”) and hor- 
atou (“of the visible”). But it is more likely that Socrates is referring to the fact that 
ouranou seems to contain the word nou, the genitive case of nous (“understanding”), 
and relative of noétou (“of the intelligible”). Hence if he said that the sun was sovereign 
of heaven, he might be taken to suggest in sophistical fashion that it was sovereign of 
the intelligible and that there was no real difference between the good and the sun. 


26. The line is illustrated below: 


Understanding (noésis) 


Thought (dianoia) 


Belief (pistis) 


Imagination (eikasia) 


511 


184 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


Would you be willing to say that, as regards truth and untruth, the 
division is in this proportion: As the opinable is to the knowable, so the 
likeness is to the thing that it is like? 

Certainly. 

Consider now how the section of the intelligible is to be divided. 

How? 

As follows: In one subsection, the soul, using as images the things that 
were imitated before, is forced to investigate from hypotheses, proceeding 
not to a first principle but to a conclusion. In the other subsection, however, 
it makes its way to a first principle that is not a hypothesis, proceeding 
from a hypothesis but without the images used in the previous subsection, 
using forms themselves and making its investigation through them. 

I don’t yet fully understand what you mean. 

Lets try again. You’ll understand it more easily after the following 
preamble. I think you know that students of geometry, calculation, and the 
like hypothesize the odd and the even, the various figures, the three kinds 
of angles, and other things akin to these in each of their investigations, as if 
they knew them. They make these their hypotheses and don’t think it 
necessary to give any account of them, either to themselves or to others, 
as if they were clear to everyone. And going from these first principles 
through the remaining steps, they arrive in full agreement.” 

I certainly know that much. 

Then you also know that, although they use visible figures and make 
claims about them, their thought isn’t directed to them but to those other 
things that they are like. They make their claims for the sake of the square 
itself and the diagonal itself, not the diagonal they draw, and similarly with 
the others. These figures that they make and draw, of which shadows and 
reflections in water are images, they now in turn use as images, in seeking 
to see those others themselves that one cannot see except by means of 
thought. 

That’s true. 

This, then, is the kind of thing that, on the one hand, I said is intelligible, 
and, on the other, is such that the soul is forced to use hypotheses in the 
investigation of it, not travelling up to a first principle, since it cannot reach 
beyond its hypotheses, but using as images those very things of which 
images were made in the section below, and which, by comparison to their 
images, were thought to be clear and valued as such. 

I understand that you mean what happens in geometry and related 
sciences. 


ж 


27. Le., either keeping the conclusion logically consistent with the hypothesis, or agree- 
ing with one another about the validity of the argument and its conclusion. See 533c. 


BOOK уі 510а-511е 185 


Then also understand that, by the other subsection of the intelligible, I 
mean that which reason itself grasps by the power of dialectic. It does not 
consider these hypotheses as first principles but truly as hypotheses?®=— 
stepping stones to take off from, enabling it to reach the unhypothetical 
first principle of everything. Having grasped this principle, it reverses 
itself and, keeping hold of what follows from it, comes down to a conclu- 
sion without making use of anything visible at all, but only of forms 
themselves, moving on from forms to forms, and ending in forms. 

I understand, if not yet adequately (for in my opinion you’re speaking 
of an enormous task), that you want to distinguish the intelligible part of 
that which is, the part studied by the science of dialectic, as clearer than 
the part studied by the so-called sciences, for which their hypotheses are 
first principles. And although those who study the objects of these sciences 
are forced to do so by means of thought rather than sense perception, still, 
because they do not go back to a genuine first principle, but proceed from 
hypotheses, you don’t think that they understand them, even though, given 
such a principle, they are intelligible. And you seem to me to call the 
state of the geometers thought but not understanding, thought being 
intermediate between opinion and understanding. 

Your exposition is most adequate. Thus there are four such conditions 
in the soul, corresponding to the four subsections of our line: Understand- 
ing for the highest, thought for the second, belief for the third, and imaging 
for the last. Arrange them in a ratio, and consider that each shares in 
clarity to the degree that the subsection it is set over shares in truth. 

I understand, agree, and arrange them as you say. 


28. Literally, things set down (in front of you). 


Book VII 


Book VII begins with another unforgettable image, the allegory of the Cave, which 
fits together with the Sun and Line (517b) and which illustrates the effects of 
education on the soul (514a). It leads to a brief but important discussion of 
education (518b—5 1 9b) in which Socrates makes it clear that the aim of education 
15 to turn the soul around by changing its desires. 

The next topic is the education of the philosopher-kings. (1) Their initial 
education is in music and poetry, physical training, and elementary mathematics 
(535а-532)). (2) This is followed by two or three years of compulsory physical 
training, rather like the military service that some countries still require (53 70— 
д. (3) Those who ате most successful in these studies next receive ten years of 
education in mathematical science (537c-d, 522с-5314). (4) Those who are 
again most successful receive five years of training in dialectic (537d-540a, 
531е-535а). (5) Those who are still most successful receive fifteen years of 
practical political training (53 9e-540a). Finally, (6) those who are also successful 
in practical politics are “compelled to lifi up the radiant light of their souls” to 
the good itself (540a) and are equipped to be philosopher-kings. 

The centrality of mathematics in the philosopher’s education is somewhat 
surprising, as 1s the restriction of dialectic to mature people who have mastered 
science. But the fact that the largest component of this education consists of 
practical political training should reassure those who think that philosopher- 
kings would not even begin to know how to rule a city. It is an interesting question 
as to why this training must take place before they can see the good itself. Plato’s 
discussion of users, makers, and imitators in Book X (6014-6020) is surely 
relevant to this question, for it suggests that only those who use an entire city (see 
428c—d) could know what a good city is. 

The city that contains philosopher-kings and the educational institutions neces- 
sary to produce them is the third and final stage in Plato’s construction of the 
kallipolis (535a-536d, 5430-5444). 


Next, I said, compare the effect of education and of the lack of it on our 
514 nature to an experience like this: Imagine human beings living in an 
underground, cavelike dwelling, with an entrance a long way up, which is 
both open to the light and as wide as the cave itself. They’ve been there 


186 


BOOK ҮП 514a-515d 187 


since childhood, fixed in the same place, with their necks and legs fettered, 
able to see only in front of them, because their bonds prevent them from 
turning their heads around. Light is provided by a fire burning far above 

and behind them. Also behind them, but on higher ground, there isa path 2 
stretching between them and the fire. Imagine that along this path a low 
wall has been built, like the screen in front of puppeteers above which 
they show their puppets. 

I’m imagining it. 

Then also imagine that there are people along the wall, carrying all 
kinds of artifacts that project above it—statues of people and other animals, 
made out of stone, wood, and every material. And, as you’d expect, some с 
of the carriers are talking, and some are silent. SNI 

It’s a strange image you’re describing, and strange prisoners. 

They’re like us. Do you suppose, first of all, that these prisoners see 
anything of themselves and one another besides the shadows that the fire 
casts on the wall in front of them? 

How could they, if they have to keep their heads motionless throughout 
life? b 

What about the things being carried along the wall? Isn’t the same true 
of them? 

Of course. 

And if they could talk to one another, don’t you think they’d suppose 
that the names they used applied to the things they see passing before 
them?! 

They’d have to. 

And what if their prison also had an echo from the wall facing them? 
Don’t you think they’d believe that the shadows passing in front of them 
were talking whenever one of the carriers passing along the wall was doing 
50? 

І certainly do. 

Then the prisoners would in every way believe that the truthis nothing с 
other than the shadows of those artifacts. 

They must surely believe that. 

Consider, then, what being released from their bonds and cured of their 
ignorance would naturally be like if something like this came to pass. When 
one of them was freed and suddenly compelled to stand up, turn his head, 
walk, and look up toward the light, he’d be pained and dazzled and unable 
to see the things whose shadows he’d seen before. What do you think hed d 
say, if we told him that what he’d seen before was inconsequential, but that 


1. Reading parionta autous nomizein onomazein. E.g. they would think that the name 
“human being” applied to the shadow of a statue of a human being. 


188 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


now—because he is a bit closer to the things that are and is turned towards 
things that are more—he sees more correctly? Or, to put it another way, if 
we pointed to each of the things passing by, asked him what each of them is, 
and compelled him to answer, don’t you think he’d be at a loss and that he’d 
believe that the things he saw earlier were truer than the ones he was now 
being shown? 

Much truer. 

And if someone compelled him to look at the light itself, wouldn’t his 

e eyes hurt, and wouldn’t he turn around and flee towards the things he’s 
able to see, believing that they’re really clearer than the ones he’s being 
shown? 

He would. 

And if someone dragged him away from there by force, up the rough, 
steep path, and didn’t let him go until he had dragged him into the 
sunlight, wouldn’t he be pained and irritated at being treated that way? 

516 And when he came into the light, with the sun filling his eyes, wouldn’t 
he be unable to see a single one of the things now said to be true? 

He would be unable to see them, at least at first. 

I suppose, then, that he’d need time to get adjusted before he could see 
things in the world above. At first, he’d see shadows most easily, then 
images of men and other things in water, then the things themselves. Of 
these, he’d be able to study the things in the sky and the sky itself more 
easily at night, looking at the light of the stars and the moon, than during 

b е day, looking at the sun and the light of the sun. 

Of course. 

Finally, I suppose, he’d be able to see the sun, not images of it in water 
or some alien place, but the sun itself, in its own place, and be able to 
study it. 

Necessarily so. 

And at this point he would infer and conclude that the sun provides the 
seasons and the years, governs everything in the visible world, and is in 

с some way the cause of all the things that he used to see. 

It's clear that would be his next step. 

What about when he reminds himself of his first dwelling place, his 
fellow prisoners, and what passed for wisdom there? Don't you think that 
he’d count himself happy for the change and pity the others? 

Certainly. 

And if there had been any honors, praises, or prizes among them for 
the one who was sharpest at identifying the shadows as they passed by and 
who best remembered which usually came earlier, which later, and which 

d simultaneously, and who could thus best divine the future, do you think 
that our man would desire these rewards or envy those among the prisoners 


BOOK уи 5154-5174 189 


who were honored and held power? Instead, wouldn’t he feel, with Homer, 
that he’d much prefer to “work the earth as a serf to another, one without 
possessions,” and go through any sufferings, rather than share their 
opinions and live as they do? 

I suppose he would rather suffer anything than live like that. 

Consider this too. If this man went down into the cave again and sat 
down in his same seat, wouldn’t his eyes—coming suddenly out of the 
sun like that—be filled with darkness? 

They certainly would. 

And before his eyes had recovered—and the adjustment would not be 
quick—while his vision was still dim, if he had to compete again with the 
perpetual prisoners in recognizing the shadows, wouldn’t he invite ridi- 
cule? Wouldn’t it be said of him that he’d returned from his upward 
journey with his eyesight ruined and that it isn’t worthwhile even to try to 
travel upward? And, as for anyone who tried to free them and lead them 
upward, if they could somehow get their hands on him, wouldn’t they kill 
him? 

They certainly would. 

This whole image, Glaucon, must be fitted together with what we said 
before. The visible realm should be likened to the prison dwelling, and 
the light of the fire inside it to the power of the sun. And if you interpret 
the upward journey and the study of things above as the upward journey 
of the soul to the intelligible realm, you'll grasp what I hope to convey, 
since that is what you wanted to hear about. Whether it’s true or not, only 
the god knows. But this is how I see it: In the knowable realm, the form 
of the good is the last thing to be seen, and it is reached only with difficulty. 
Once one has seen it, however, one must conclude that it is the cause of 
all that is correct and beautiful in anything, that it produces both light and 
its source in the visible realm, and that in the intelligible realm it controls 
and provides truth and understanding, so that anyone who is to act sensibly 
in private or public must see it. 

I have the same thought, at least as far as I’m able. 

Come, then, share with me this thought also: It isn’t surprising that the 
ones who get to this point are unwilling to occupy themselves with human 
affairs and that their souls are always pressing upwards, eager to spend 
their time above, for, after all, this is surely what we’d expect, if indeed 
things fit the image I described before. 

It is. 

What about what happens when someone turns from divine study to 


2. Odyssey 11.489-90. The shade of the dead Achilles speaks these words to Odys- 
seus, who is visiting Hades. Plato is, therefore, likening the cave dwellers to the dead. 


517 


190 ЅОСКАТЕЅ/СтАОСОМ 


Ше evils of human life? Do you think it’s surprising, since his sight is still 
dim, and he hasn’t yet become accustomed to the darkness around him, 
that he behaves awkwardly and appears completely ridiculous if he’s 
compelled, either in the courts or elsewhere, to contend about the shadows 
of justice or the statues of which they are the shadows and to dispute 
about the way these things are understood by people who have never seen 

e justice itself? 

That’s not surprising at all. 

518 Мо, it isn’t. But anyone with any understanding would remember that 
the eyes may be confused in two ways and from two causes, namely, when 
they’ve come from the light into the darkness and when they’ve come from 
the darkness into the light. Realizing that the same applies to the soul, 
when someone sees a soul disturbed and unable to see something, he 
won’t laugh mindlessly, but he’ll take into consideration whether it has 
come from a brighter life and is dimmed through not having yet become 
accustomed to the dark or whether it has come from greater ignorance 
into greater light and is dazzled by the increased brilliance. Then he’ll 
declare the first soul happy in its experience and life, and he’ll pity the 

b — latter—but even ifhe chose to make fun of it, at least he’d be less ridiculous 
than if he laughed at a soul that has come from the light above. 

What you say is very reasonable. 

If that’s true, then here’s what we must think about these matters: 
Education isn’t what some people declare it to be, namely, putting knowl- 

c edge into souls that lack it, like putting sight into blind eyes. 

They do say that. 

But our present discussion, on the other hand, shows that the power to 
learn is present in everyone’s soul and that the instrument with which 
each learns is like an eye that cannot be turned around from darkness to 
light without turning the whole body. This instrument cannot be turned 
around from that which is coming into being without turning the whole 
soul until it is able to study that which is and the brightest thing that is, 

d namely, the one we call the good. Isn’t that right? 

Yes. 

Then education is the craft concerned with doing this very thing, this 
turning around, and with how the soul can most easily and effectively be 
made to do it. It isn’t the craft of putting sight into the soul. Education 
takes for granted that sight is there but that it isn’t turned the right way 
or looking where it ought to look, and it tries to redirect it appropriately. 

So it seems. Г 

Now, it looks as though the other so-called virtues of the soul are akin 
to those of the body, for they really aren’t there beforehand but are added 

e later by habit and practice. However, the virtue of reason seems to belong 


воок үй 5174-519е 191 


above all to something more divine,’ which never loses its power but is 
either useful and beneficial or useless and harmful, depending on the way 

it is turned. Or have you never noticed this about people who are said to 5/9 
be vicious but clever, how keen the vision of their little souls is and how 
sharply it distinguishes the things it is turned towards? This shows that its 
sight isn’t inferior but rather is forced to serve evil ends, so that the sharper 

it sees, the more evil it accomplishes. 

Absolutely. 

However, if a nature of this sort had been hammered at from childhood 
and freed from the bonds of kinship with becoming, which have been 
fastened to it by feasting, greed, and other such pleasures and which, like 
leaden weights, pull its vision downwards—if, being rid of these, it turned b 
to look at true things, then I say that the same soul of the same person 
would see these most sharply, just as it now does the things it is presently 
turned towards. 

Probably so. 

And what about the uneducated who have no experience of truth? Isn’t 
it likely—indeed, doesn’t it follow necessarily from what was said before— 
that they will never adequately govern a city? But neither would those 
who've been allowed to spend their whole lives being educated. The 
former would fail because they don’t have a single goal at which all their с 
actions, public and private, inevitably aim; the latter would fail because 
they’d refuse to act, thinking that they had settled while still alive in the 
faraway Isles of the Blessed.* 

That’s true. 

It is our task as founders, then, to compel the best natures to reach the 
study we said before is the most important, namely, to make the ascent 
and see the good. But when they’ve made it and looked sufficiently, we 
mustn’t allow them to do what they’re allowed to do today. d 

What’s that? 

To stay there and refuse to go down again to the prisoners in the cave 
and share their labors and honors, whether they are of less worth or of 
greater. 

Then are we to do them an injustice by making them live a worse life 
when they could live a better one? 

You are forgetting again that it isn’t the law’s concern to make any опе ¢ 
class in the city outstandingly happy but to contrive to spread happiness 
throughout the city by bringing the citizens into harmony with each other 


3. See 589d, 590d, 611b ff. 
4. A place where good people аге said to live in eternal happiness, normally after 
death. 


192 SOcRATES/GLAUCON 


through persuasion or compulsion and by making them share with each 
other the benefits that each class can confer on the community.” The law 

520 produces such people in the city, not in order to allow them to turn in 
whatever direction they want, but to make use of them to bind the city 
together. 

That’s true, I had forgotten. 

Observe, then, Glaucon, that we won’t be doing an injustice to those 
who’ve become philosophers in our city and that what we’ll say to them, 
when we compel them to guard and care for the others, will be just. We’ll 
say: “When people like you come to be in other cities, they’re justified іп 

6 not sharing in their city’s labors, for they’ve grown there spontaneously, 
against the will of the constitution. And what grows of its own accord and 
owes no debt for its upbringing has justice on its side when it isn’t keen 
to pay anyone for that upbringing. But we’ve made you kings in our city 
and leaders of the swarm, as it were, both for yourselves and for the rest 
of the city. You’re better and more completely educated than the others 

c апа are better able to share in both types of life.° Therefore each of you 
in turn must go down to live in the common dwelling place of the others 
and grow accustomed to seeing in the dark. When you are used to it, you'll 
see vastly better than the people there. And because you’ve seen the truth 
about fine, just, and good things, you’ll know each image for what it is and 
also that of which it is the image. Thus, for you and for us, the city will 
be governed, not like the majority of cities nowadays, by people who fight 
over shadows and struggle against one another in order to rule—as if that 
were a great good—but by people who are awake rather than dreaming,’ 

а г the truth is surely this: A city whose prospective rulers are least eager 
to rule must of necessity be most free from civil war, whereas a city with 
the opposite kind of rulers is governed in the opposite way.” 

Absolutely. 

Then do you think that those we’ve nurtured will disobey us and refuse 
to share the labors of the city, each in turn, while living the greater part 
of their time with one another in the pure realm? 

е It isn’t possible, for we'll be giving just orders to just people. Each of 
them will certainly go to rule as to something compulsory, however, which 
is exactly the opposite of what’s done by those who now rule in each city. 
This is how it is. If you can find a way of life that’s better than ruling for 
the prospective rulers, your well-governed city will become a possibility, 


5. See 4205-421с, 462a—466c. = 


6. Т.е. the practical life of ruling the city and the theoretical life of studying the good 
itself. 


7. See 476c—d. 


BOOK уп 519e-521d 193 


for only in it will the truly rich rule—not those who are rich in gold but 521 
those who are rich in the wealth that the happy must have, namely, a good 
and rational life. But if beggars hungry for private goods go into public 
life, thinking that the good is there for the seizing, then the well-governed 
city is impossible, for then ruling is something fought over, and this civil 
and domestic war destroys these people and the rest of the city as well. 

That’s very true. 

Can you name any life that despises political rule besides that of the b 
true philosopher? 

No, by god, I can’t. 

But surely it is those who are not lovers of ruling who must rule, for if 
they don’t, the lovers of it, who are rivals, will fight over it. 

Of course. 

Then who will you compel to become guardians of the city, if not those 
who have the best understanding of what matters for good government 
and who have other honors than political ones, and a better life as well? 

No one. 

Do you want us to consider now how such people will come to be in 
our city and how—just as some аге said to have gone up from Hades to ¢ 
the gods—we’ll lead them up to the light? 

Of course I do. 

This isn’t, it seems, a matter of spinning a potsherd,” but of turning a 
soul from a day that is a kind of night to the true day—the ascent to what 
is, which we say is true philosophy. 

Indeed. 

Then mustn’t we try to discover the subjects that have the power to 
bring this about? d 

Of course. 

So what subject is it, Glaucon, that draws the soul from the realm of 
becoming to the realm of what is? And it occurs to me as Pm speaking 
that we said, didn’t we, that it is necessary for the prospective rulers to be 
athletes in war when they’re young? 

Yes, we did. 

Then the subject we’re looking for must also have this characteristic in 
addition to the former one. 


8. A proverbial expression, referring to a children’s game. The players were divided 
into two groups. A shell or potsherd, white on one side and black on the other, was 
thrown into the space between them to the cry of “night or day” (note the reference to 
night and day which follows). According as the white or black fell uppermost, one 
group ran away, pursued by the other. The meaning here is much the same as that of 
our expression “tossing a coin.” 


е 


ВАА 


194 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


Which one? 

It mustn’t be useless to warlike men. 

If it’s at all possible, it mustn’t. 

Now, prior to this, we educated them in music and poetry and physical 
training. 

We did. 

And physical training is concerned with what comes into being and dies, 
for it oversees the growth and decay of the body. 

Apparently. 

So it couldn’t be the subject we’re looking for. 

No, it couldn’t. 

Then, could it be the music and poetry we described before? 

But that, if you remember, is just the counterpart of physical training. 
It educated the guardians through habits. Its harmonies gave them a 
certain harmoniousness, not knowledge; its rhythms gave them a certain 
rhythmical quality; and its stories, whether fictional or nearer the truth, 
cultivated other habits akin to these. But as for the subject you’re looking 
for now, there’s nothing like that in music and poetry. 

Your reminder is exactly to the point; there’s really nothing like that in 
music and poetry. But, Glaucon, what is there that does have this? The 
crafts all seem to be base or mechanical. 

How could they be otherwise? But apart from music and poetry, physical 
training, and the crafts, what subject is left? 

Well, if we can’t find anything apart from these, let’s consider one of 
the subjects that touches all of them. 

What sort of thing? 

For example, that common thing that every craft, every type of thought, 
and every science uses and that is among the first compulsory subjects for 
everyone. 

What’s that? 

That inconsequential matter of distinguishing the one, the two, and the 
three. In short, I mean number and calculation, for isn’t it true that every 
craft and science must have a share in that? 

They certainly must. 

Then so must warfare. 

Absolutely. 

In the tragedies, at any rate, Palamedes’ is always showing up Agamem- 
non as a totally ridiculous general. Haven’t you noticed? He says that, by 
inventing numbers, he established how many troops there were in the 


9. Palamades is a proverbially clever warrior best known for his cunning while serving 
under Agamemnon. 


BOOK үй 5214-523с 195 


Trojan army and counted their ships and everything else—implying that 
they were uncounted before and that Agamemnon (if indeed he didn’t 
know how to count) didn’t even know how many feet he had? What kind 
of general do you think that made him? 

A very strange one, if that’s true. 

Then won’t we set down this subject as compulsory for a warrior, so е 
that he is able to count and calculate? 

More compulsory than anything. If, that is, he’s to understand anything 
about setting his troops in order or if he’s even to be properly human. 

Then do you notice the same thing about this subject that I do? 

What’s that? 

That this turns out to be one of the subjects we were looking for that 
naturally lead to understanding. But no one uses it correctly, namely, as 
something that is really fitted in every way to draw one towards being. 523 

What do you mean? 

ГІ] try to make my view clear as follows: ГІ distinguish for myself the 
things that do or don’t lead in the direction we mentioned, and you must 
study them along with me and either agree or disagree, and that way we 
may come to know more clearly whether things are indeed as I divine. 

Point them out. 

РІ point out, then, if you can grasp it, that some sense perceptions don’t 
summon the understanding to look into them, because the judgment of 
sense perception is itself adequate, while others encourage it in every way b 
to look into them, because sense perception seems to produce no sound 
result. 

You’re obviously referring to things appearing in the distance and to 
trompe l'oeil paintings. 

You’re not quite getting my meaning. 

Then what do you mean? 

The ones that don’t summon the understanding are all those that don’t 
go off into opposite perceptions at the same time. But the ones that do go 
off in that way I call swmmoners—whenever sense perception doesn’t с 
declare one thing any more than its opposite, no matter whether the object 
striking the senses is near at hand or far away. You'll understand my 
meaning better if I put it this way: These, we say, are three fingers—the 
smallest, the second, and the middle finger. 

That’s right. 

Assume that I’m talking about them as being seen from close by. Now, 
this is my question about them. 

What? 

It’s apparent that each of them is equally a finger, and it makes no 
difference in this regard whether the finger is seen to be in the middle or 


196 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


d at either end, whether it is dark ог pale, thick or thin, or anything else of 
that sort, for in all these cases, an ordinary soul isn’t compelled to ask the 
understanding what a finger is, since sight doesn’t suggest to it that a 
finger is at the same time the opposite of a finger. 

No, it doesn’t. 

Therefore, it isn’t likely that anything of that sort would summon or 

e awaken the understanding. 

No, it isn’t. 

But what about the bigness and smallness of fingers? Does sight perceive 
them adequately? Does it make no difference to it whether the finger is 
in the middle or at the end? And is it the same with the sense of touch, 
as regards the thick and the thin, the hard and the soft? And do the other 
senses reveal such things clearly and adequately? Doesn’t each of them 

524 rather do the following: The sense set over the hard is, in the first place, 
of necessity also set over the soft, and it reports to the soul that the same 
thing is perceived by it to be both hard and soft? 

That’s right. 

And isn’t it necessary that in such cases the soul is puzzled as to what 
this sense means by the hard, if it indicates that the same thing is also 
soft, or what it means by the light and the heawy, if it indicates that the 
heavy is light, or the light, heavy? 

b Yes, indeed, these are strange reports for the soul to receive, and they 
do demand to be looked into. 

Then it’s likely that in such cases the soul, summoning calculation 
and understanding, first tries to determine whether each of the things 
announced to it is one or two. 

Of course. 

If it’s evidently two, won’t each be evidently distinct and one? 

Yes. 

Then, if each is one, and both two, the soul will understand that the 
two are separate, for it wouldn’t understand the inseparable to be two, but 

с rather one. 

That’s right. 

Sight, however, saw the big and small, not as separate, but as mixed up 
together. Isn’t that so? 

Yes. 

And in order to get clear about all this, understanding was compelled 
to see the big and the small, not as mixed up together, but as separate— 
the opposite way from sight. 

True. 

And isn’t it from these cases that it first occurs to us to ask what the big 
is and what the small is? 

Absolutely. 


BOOK уп 5234-525с 197 


And, because of this, we called the one the intelligible and the other 
the visible. 

That’s right. 

This, then, is what I was trying to express before, when I said that some 
things summon thought, while others don’t. Those that strike the relevant 
sense at the same time as their opposites I call summoners, those that 
don’t do this do not awaken understanding. 

Now I understand, and I think you’re right. 

Well, then, to which of them do number and the one belong? 

I don’t know. 

Reason it out from what was said before. If the one is adequately seen 
itself by itself or is so perceived by any of the other senses, then, as we 
were saying in the case of fingers, it wouldn’t draw the soul towards being. 
But if something opposite to it is always seen at the same time, so that 
nothing is apparently any more one than the opposite of one, then some- 
thing would be needed to judge the matter. The soul would then be 
puzzled, would look for an answer, would stir up its understanding, and 
would ask what the one itself is. And so this would be among the subjects 


e 


that lead the soul and turn it around towards the study of that which is. 525 


But surely the sight of the one does possess this characteristic to a 
remarkable degree, for we see the same thing to be both one and an 
unlimited number at the same time. 

Then, if this is true of the one, won’t it also be true of all numbers? 

Of course. 

Now, calculation and arithmetic are wholly concerned with numbers. 

That’s right. 

Then evidently they lead us towards truth. 

Supernaturally so. 

Then they belong, it seems, to the subjects we’re seeking. They are 
compulsory for warriors because of their orderly ranks and for philoso- 
phers because they have to learn to rise up out of becoming and grasp 
being, if they are ever to become rational. 

That’s right. 

And our guardian must be both a warrior and a philosopher. 

Certainly. 

Then it would be appropriate, Glaucon, to legislate this subject for 
those who are going to share in the highest offices in the city and to 
persuade them to turn to calculation and take it up, not as laymen do, but 
staying with it until they reach the study of the natures of the numbers by 
means of understanding itself, nor like tradesmen and retailers, for the 
sake of buying and selling, but for the sake of war and for ease in turning 
the soul around, away from becoming and towards truth and being. 

Well put. 


526 


198 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


Moreover, it strikes me, now that it has been mentioned, how sophisti- 
cated the subject of calculation is and in how many ways it is useful for 
our purposes, provided that one practices it for the sake of knowing rather 
than trading. 

How is it useful? 

In the very way we were talking about. It leads the soul forcibly upward 
and compels it to discuss the numbers themselves, never permitting anyone 
to propose for discussion numbers attached to visible or tangible bodies. 
You know what those who are clever in these matters are like: If, in the 
course of the argument, someone tries to divide the one itself, they laugh 
and won’t permit it. If you divide it, they multiply it, taking care that one 
thing never be found to be many parts rather than one. 

That’s very true. 

Then what do you think would happen, Glaucon, if someone were to 
ask them: “What kind of numbers are you talking about, in which the one 
is аѕ you assume it to be, each one equal to every other, without the least 
difference and containing no internal parts?” 

I think they’d answer that they are talking about those numbers that can 
be grasped only in thought and can’t be dealt with in any other way. 

Then do you see that it’s likely that this subject really is compulsory for 
us, since it apparently compels the soul to use understanding itself on the 
truth itself? 

Indeed, it most certainly does do that. 

And what about those who are naturally good at calculation or reasoning? 
Have you already noticed that they’re naturally sharp, so to speak, in all 
subjects, and that those who are slow at it, if they’re educated and exercised 
in it, even if they’re benefited in no other way, nonetheless improve and 
become generally sharper than they were? 

That’s true. 

Moreover, I don’t think you'll easily find subjects that are harder to 
learn or practice than this. 

No, indeed. 

Then, for all these reasons, this subject isn’t to be neglected, and the 
best natures must be educated in it. 

I agree. 

Let that, then, be one of our subjects. Second, let’s consider whether 
the subject that comes next is also appropriate for our purposes. 

What subject is that? Do you mean geometry? 

That’s the very one І had in mind. 

Insofar as it pertains to war, it’s obviously appropriate, for when it comes 
to setting up camp, occupying a region, concentrating troops, deploying 
them, or with regard to any of the other formations an army adopts in 


BOOK үи 525с-527а 199 


battle or on the march, it makes all the difference whether someone is а 
geometer or not. 

But, for things like that, even a little geometry—or calculation for that 
matter—would suffice. What we need to consider is whether the greater 
and more advanced part of it tends to make it easier to see the form of 
the good. And we say that anything has that tendency if it compels the 
soul to turn itself around towards the region in which lies the happiest of 
the things that are, the one the soul must see at any cost. 

You’re right. 

Therefore, if geometry compels the soul to study being, it’s appropriate, 
but if it compels it to study becoming, it’s inappropriate. 

So we’ve said, at any rate. 


Now, no one with even a little experience of geometry will dispute that 527 


this science is entirely the opposite of what is said about it in the accounts 
of its practitioners. 

How do you mean? 

They give ridiculous accounts of it, though they can’t help it, for they 
speak like practical men, and all their accounts refer to doing things. They 
talk of “squaring,” “applying,” “adding,” and the like, whereas the entire 
subject is pursued for the sake of knowledge. 

Absolutely. 

And mustn’t we also agree on a further point? 

What is that? 

That their accounts are for the sake of knowing what always is, not what 
comes into being and passes away. 

That’s easy to agree to, for geometry % knowledge of what always is. 

Then it draws the soul towards truth and produces philosophic thought 
by directing upwards what we now wrongly direct downwards. 

As far as anything possibly can. 

Then as far as we possibly can, we must require those in your fine city 
not to neglect geometry in any way, for even its by-products are not 
insignificant. 

What are they? 

The ones concerned with war that you mentioned. But we also surely 
know that, when it comes to better understanding any subject, there is a 
world of difference between someone who has grasped geometry and 
someone who hasn’t. 

Yes, by god, a world of difference. 

Then shall we set this down as a second subject for the young? 

Let’s do so, he said. 

And what about astronomy? Shall we make it the third? Or do you 
disagree? 


с 


200 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


That’s fine with me, for a better awareness of the seasons, months, and 
years is no less appropriate for a general than for a farmer or navigator. 
You amuse me: Youre like someone who’s afraid that the majority will 
think he is prescribing useless subjects. It’s no easy task—indeed it’s very 
difficult—to realize that in every soul there is an instrument that is purified 
and rekindled by such subjects when it has been blinded and destroyed 

e бу other ways of life, an instrument that it is more important to preserve 
than ten thousand eyes, since only with it can the truth be seen. Those 
who share your belief that this is so will think you’re speaking incredibly 
well, while those who’ve never been aware of it will probably think you’re 
talking nonsense, since they see no benefit worth mentioning in these 
subjects. So decide right now which group you’re addressing. Or are your 

528 arguments for neither of them but mostly for your own sake—though you 
won’t begrudge anyone else whatever benefit he’s able to get from them? 

The latter: I want to speak, question, and answer mostly for my own 
sake. 

Then let’s fall back to our earlier position, for we were wrong just now 
about the subject that comes after geometry. 

What was our error? 

After plane surfaces, we went on to revolving solids before dealing with 
solids by themselves. But the right thing to do is to take up the third 

6 dimension right after the second. And this, I suppose, consists of cubes 
and of whatever shares in depth. 

You're right, Socrates, but this subject hasn’t been developed yet. 

There are two reasons for that: First, because no city values it, this 
difficult subject is little researched. Second, the researchers need a direc- 
tor, for, without one, they won’t discover anything. To begin with, such a 
director is hard to find, and, then, even if he could be found, those who 

с currently do research in this field would be too arrogant to follow him. If 
an entire city helped him to supervise it, however, and took the lead in 
valuing it, then he would be followed. And, if the subject was consistently 
and vigorously pursued, it would soon be developed. Even now, when it 
isn’t valued and is held in contempt by the majority and is pursued by 
researchers who are unable to give an account of its usefulness, neverthe- 
less, in spite of all these handicaps, the force of its charm has caused it to 
develop somewhat, so that it wouldn’t be surprising if it were further 
developed even as things stand. 

d The subject has outstanding charm. But explain more clearly what you 
were saying just now. The subject that deals with plane surfaces you took 
to be geometry. 

Yes. 
And at first you put astronomy after it, but later you went back on that. 


BOOK үп 5274-5294 201 


Іп my haste to go through them all, I’ve only progressed more slowly. 
The subject dealing with the dimension of depth was next. But because 
it is in a ridiculous state, I passed it by and spoke of astronomy (which 
deals with the motion of things having depth) after geometry. е 

That’s right. 

Let’s then put astronomy as the fourth subject, on the assumption that 
solid geometry will be available if a city takes it up. 

That seems reasonable. And since you reproached me before for prais- 
ing astronomy in a vulgar manner, ГІІ now praise it your way, for I think 
it’s clear to everyone that astronomy compels the soul to look upward and 529 
leads it from things here to things there. 

It may be obvious to everyone except me, but that’s not my view about 
It. 

Then what is your view? 

As it’s practiced today by those who teach philosophy, it makes the soul 
look very much downward. 

How do you mean? 

In my opinion, your conception of “higher studies” is a good deal too 
generous, for if someone were to study something by leaning his head 
back and studying ornaments on a ceiling, it looks as though you’d say 
he’s studying not with his eyes but with his understanding. Perhaps уоште b 
right, and I’m foolish, but I can’t conceive of any subject making the soul 
look upward except one concerned with that which is, and that which is 
is invisible. If anyone attempts to learn something about sensible things, 
whether by gaping upward or squinting downward, Га claim—since 
there’s no knowledge of such things—that he never learns anything and 
that, even if he studies lying on his back on the ground or floating on it с 
in the sea, his soul is looking not up but down. 

You’re right to reproach me, and I’ve been justly punished, but what 
did you mean when you said that astronomy must be learned in a different 
way from the way in which it is learned at present if it is to be a useful 
subject for our purposes? 

It’s like this: We should consider the decorations in the sky to be 
the most beautiful and most exact of visible things, seeing that they’re 
embroidered on a visible surface. But we should consider their motions 
to fall far short of the true ones—motions that are really fast ог slow as d 
measured in true numbers, that trace out true geometrical figures, that 
are all in relation to one another, and that are the true motions of the 
things carried along in them. And these, of course, must be grasped by 
reason and thought, not by sight. Or do you think otherwise? 

Not at all. ; 

Therefore, we should use the embroidery in the sky as a model in the 


е 


202 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


study of these other things.” If someone experienced in geometry were 
to come upon plans very carefully drawn and worked out by Daedalus or 
some other craftsman or artist, he’d consider them to be very finely 
executed, but he’d think it ridiculous to examine them seriously in order 


530 to find the truth in them about the equal, the double, or any other ratio. 


How could it be anything other than ridiculous? 

Then don’t you think that a real astronomer will feel the same when he 
looks at the motions of the stars? He’ll believe that the craftsman of the 
heavens arranged them and all that’s in them in the finest way possible 
for such things. But as for the ratio of night to day, of days to a month, 
of a month to a year, or of the motions of the stars to any of them or to 
each other, don’t you think he’ll consider it strange to believe that they’re 
always the same and never deviate anywhere at all or to try in any sort of 
way to grasp the truth about them, since they’re connected to body and 
visible? 

That’s my opinion anyway, now that I hear it from you. 

Then if, by really taking part in astronomy, we’re to make the naturally 
intelligent part of the soul useful instead of useless, let’s study astronomy 
by means of problems, as we do geometry, and leave the things in the sky 
alone. 

The task you’re prescribing is a lot harder than anything now attempted 
in astronomy. 

And I suppose that, if we are to be of any benefit as lawgivers, our 
prescriptions for the other subjects will be of the same kind. But have you 
any other appropriate subject to suggest? 

Not offhand. 

Well, there isn’t just one form of motion but several. Perhaps a wise 
person could list them all, but there are two that are evident even to us. 

What are they? 

Besides the one we’ve discussed, there is also its counterpart. 

What’s that? 

It’s likely that, as the eyes fasten on astronomical motions, so the ears 
fasten on harmonic ones, and that the sciences of astronomy and harmon- 
ics are closely akin. This is what the Pythagoreans’’ say, Glaucon, and we 
agree, don’t we? 


10. See 510d—51 1a. 


11, Pythagoras of Samos (sixth century) taught a way of life (see Republic 600b) in 
which natural science became a religion. He is credited with discovering the mathemati- 
cal ratios determining the principal intervals of the musical scale. He seems to have 
been led by this to believe that all natural phenomena are explicable in terms of 
numbers. He may have discovered some version of the theorem about right triangles 
that bears his name. 


BOOK үп 5294-5314 203 
We do. 


Therefore, since the subject is so huge, shouldn’t we ask them what 
they have to say about harmonic motions and whether there is anything 
else besides them, all the while keeping our own goal squarely in view? 

What’s that? 

That those whom we are rearing should never try to learn anything 
incomplete, anything that doesn’t reach the end that everything should 
reach—the end we mentioned just now in the case of astronomy. Or don’t 


(2 


you know that people do something similar in harmonics? Measuring 531 


audible consonances and sounds against one another, they labor in vain, 
just like present-day astronomers. 

Yes, by the gods, and pretty ridiculous they are too. They talk about 
something they call a “dense interval” or quartertone’"—putting their ears 
to their instruments like someone trying to overhear what the neighbors 
are saying. And some say that they hear a tone in between and that it is 
the shortest interval by which they must measure, while others argue 
that this tone sounds the same as a quarter tone. Both put ears before 
understanding. 

You mean those excellent fellows who torment their strings, torturing 
them, and stretching them on pegs. I won’t draw out the analogy by 
speaking of blows with the plectrum or the accusations or denials and 
boastings on the part of the strings; instead ГІ cut it short by saying that 
these aren’t the people I’m talking about. The ones I mean are the ones 
we just said we were going to question about harmonics, for they do the 
same as the astronomers. They seek out the numbers that are to be found 
in these audible consonances, but they do not make the ascent to problems. 
They don’t investigate, for example, which numbers are consonant and 
which aren’t or what the explanation is of each. 

But that would be a superhuman task. 

Yet it’s useful in the search for the beautiful and the good. But pursued 
for any other purpose, it’s useless. 

Probably so. 

Moreover, І take it that, if inquiry into all the subjects we’ve mentioned 
brings out their association and relationship with one another and draws 
conclusions about their kinship, it does contribute something to our goal 
and isn’t labor in vain, but that otherwise it is in vain. 

I, too, divine that this is true. But you’re still talking about a very big 
task, Socrates. 

Do you mean the prelude, or what? Or don’t you know that all these 
subjects are merely preludes to the song itself that must also be learned? 


12. A dense interval is evidently the smallest difference in pitch recognized in ancient 
music. 


204 SoCRATES/GLAUCON 


Surely you don’t think that people who are clever in these matters are 

e  dialecticians. 

No, by god, I don’t. Although I have met a few exceptions. 

But did it ever seem to you that those who can neither give nor follow 
an account know anything at all of the things we say they must know? 

My answer to that is also no. 

532 Then isn’t this at last, Glaucon, the song that dialectic sings? It is 
intelligible, but it is imitated by the power of sight. We said that sight tries 
at last to look at the animals themselves, the stars themselves, and, in the 
end, at the sun itself.’ In the same way, whenever someone tries through 
argument and apart from all sense perceptions to find the being itself 
of each thing and doesn’t give up until he grasps the good itself with 

b understanding itself, he reaches the end of the intelligible, just as the 
other reached the end of the visible. 

Absolutely. 

And what about this journey? Don’t you call it dialectic? 

I do. 

Then the release from bonds and the turning around from shadows to 
statues and the light of the fire and, then, the way up out of the cave to 
the sunlight and, there, the continuing inability to look at the animals, the 
plants, and the light of the sun, but the newly acquired ability to look at 

с divine images in water and shadows of the things that are, rather than, as 
before, merely at shadows of statues thrown by another source of light 
that is itself a shadow in relation to the sun—all this business of the crafts 
we've mentioned has the power to awaken the best part of the soul and 
lead it upward to the study of the best among the things that are, just as, 
before, the clearest thing in the body was led to the brightest thing in the 

а bodily and visible realm. 

I accept that this is so, even though it seems very hard to accept in one 
way and hard not to accept in another. All the same, since we’ll have to 
return to these things often in the future, rather than having to hear them 
just once now, let’s assume that what you’ve said is so and turn to the song 
itself, discussing it in the same way as we did the prelude. So tell us: what is 
the sort of power dialectic has, what forms is it divided into, and what path 

e does it follow? For these lead at last, it seems, towards that place which is a 
rest from the road, so to speak, and an end of journeying for the one who 
reaches it. 

533 You won’t be able to follow me any longer, Glaucon, even though there 
is no lack of eagerness on my part to lead you, for you would no longer 
be seeing an image of what we’re describing, but the truth itself. At any 
rate, that’s how it seems to me. That it is really so is not worth insisting 


13. See 516a—b. 


BOOK ҮП 5314-534а 205 


оп any further. But that there is some such thing to be seen, that is 
something we must insist on. Isn’t that so? 

Of course. 

And mustn’t we also insist that the power of dialectic could reveal it 
only to someone experienced in the subjects we’ve described and that it 
cannot reveal it in any other way? 

That too is worth insisting on. 

At any rate, no one will dispute it when we say that there is no other 
inquiry that systematically attempts to grasp with respect to each thing 
itself what the being of it is, for all the other crafts are concerned with 
human opinions and desires, with growing or construction, or with the 
care of growing or constructed things. And as for the rest, І mean geometry 
and the subjects that follow it, we described them as to some extent 
grasping what is, for we saw that, while they do dream about what is, they 
are unable to command a waking view of it as long as they make use of 
hypotheses that they leave untouched and that they cannot give any account 
of. What mechanism could possibly turn any agreement into knowledge 
when it begins with something unknown and puts together the conclusion 
and the steps in between from what is unknown? 

None. 

Therefore, dialectic is the only inquiry that travels this road, doing away 
with hypotheses and proceeding to the first principle itself, so as to be 
secure. And when the eye of the soul is really buried in a sort of barbaric 
bog, * dialectic gently pulls it out and leads it upwards, using the crafts we 
described to help it and cooperate with it in turning the soul around. 
From force of habit, we’ve often called these crafts sciences or kinds of 
knowledge, but they need another name, clearer than opinion, darker than 
knowledge. We called them thought somewhere before.” But I presume 
that we won’t dispute about a name when we have so many more important 
matters to investigate. 

Of course not. 

It will therefore be enough to call the first section knowledge, the second 
thought, the third belief, and the fourth imaging, just as we did before. 
The last two together we call opinion, the other two, intellect.“ Opinion is 


14. See 519a—b. 


15. See 5114-е. 

16. The reference is to 5114-е, but there the first section is called understanding 
(noésis) rather than knowledge (epistémé). However, since we’ve just been told that 
thought (dianoia) is not a kind of knowledge, understanding and knowing have in effect 
become identified. It is harder to explain why knowledge and thought are now referred 
to jointly as noésis. But presumably it is because that whole section of the line is earlier 
referred to as the intelligible (noéton). See 5094-е. To prevent misunderstanding, 
therefore, I have translated moésis as ‘intellect’ here. 


224 


206 SOcRATES/GLAUCON 


concerned with becoming, intellect with being. And as being is to becom- 
ing, so intellect is to opinion, and as intellect is to opinion, so knowledge is 
to belief and thought to imaging. But as for the ratios between the things 
these are set over and the division of either the opinable or the intelligible 
section into two, let’s pass them by, Glaucon, lest they involve us in argu- 
ments many times longer than the ones we’ve already gone through. 

I agree with you about the others in any case, insofar as I’m able to 

b follow. 

Then, do you call someone who is able to give an account of the being 
of each thing dialectical? But insofar as he’s unable to give an account of 
something, either to himself or to another, do you deny that he has any 
understanding of it? 

How could I do anything else? 

Then the same applies to the good. Unless someone can distinguish in 
an account the form of the good from everything else, can survive all 

c refutation, as if in a battle, striving to judge things not in accordance with 
opinion but in accordance with being, and can come through all this with 
his account still intact, you’ll say that he doesn’t know the good itself or 
any other good. But if he somehow gets hold of some image of it, yow’ll 
say that it’s through opinion, not knowledge, for he is dreaming and 
asleep throughout his present life, and, before he wakes up here, he will 

d arrive in Hades and go to sleep forever. 

Yes, by god, Pll certainly say all of that. 

Then, as for those children of yours whom you’ re rearing and educating 
in theory, if you ever reared them in fact, I don’t think that you’d allow 
them to rule in your city or be responsible for the most important things 
while they are as irrational as incommensurable lines. 

Certainly not. 

Then you'll legislate that they are to give most attention to the education 
that will enable them to ask and answer questions most knowledgeably? 

е Pll legislate it along with you. 

Then do you think that we’ve placed dialectic at the top of the other 
subjects like a coping stone and that no other subject can rightly be placed 
above it, but that our account of the subjects that a future ruler must learn 

535 has come to an end? 

Probably so. 

Then it remains for you to deal with the distribution of these subjects, 
with the question of to whom we’ll assign them and in what way. 

That’s clearly next. 

Do you remember what sort of sande we chose in our earlier selection 


of rulers?” 


17. See 412b ff. 


BOOK үп 534a-536a 207 


Of course I do. 

In the other respects, the same natures have to be chosen: we have to 
select the most stable, the most courageous, and as far as possible the 
most graceful. In addition, we must look not only for people who have a 
noble and tough character but for those who have the natural qualities 2 
conducive to this education of ours. 

Which ones exactly? 

They must be keen on the subjects and learn them easily, for people’s 
souls give up much more easily in hard study than in physical training, 
since the pain—being peculiar to them and not shared with their body— 
is more their own. 

That’s true. 

We must also look for someone who has got a good memory, is регвіз- с 
tent, and is in every way a lover of hard work. How else do you think he’d 
be willing to carry out both the requisite bodily labors and also complete 
so much study and practice? 

Nobody would, unless his nature was in every way a good one. 

In any case, the present error, which as we said before explains why 
philosophy isn’t valued, is that she’s taken up by people who are unworthy 
of her, for illegitimate students shouldn’t be allowed to take her up, but 
only legitimate ones. 

How so? 

In the first place, no student should be lame in his love of hard work, 4 
really loving one half of it, and hating the other half. This happens when 
someone is a lover of physical training, hunting, or any kind of bodily labor 
and isn’t a lover of learning, listening, or inquiry, but hates the work 
involved in them. And someone whose love of hard work tends in the 
opposite direction is also lame. 

That’s very true. 

Similarly with regard to truth, won’t we say that a soul is maimed if it 
hates a voluntary falsehood, cannot endure to have one in itself, and is 
greatly angered when it exists in others, but is nonethelesscontenttoaccept е 
an involuntary falsehood, isn’t angry when it is caught being ignorant, and 
bears its lack of learning easily, wallowing in it like a рір?!” 

Absolutely. 536 

And with regard to moderation, courage, high-mindedness, and all the 
other parts of virtue, it is also important to distinguish the illegitimate 
from the legitimate, for when either a city or an individual doesn’t know 
how to do this, it unwittingly employs the lame and illegitimate as friends 
or rulers for whatever services it wants done. 

That’s just how it is. 


18. See 382a ff. 


208 5ОСЕАТЕ65/ GLAUCON 


So we must be careful in all these matters, for if we bring people who 
are sound of limb and mind to so great a subject and training, and educate 

b them in it, even justice itself won’t blame us, and we’ll save the city and 
its constitution. But if we bring people of a different sort, we’ll do the 
opposite, and let loose an even greater flood of ridicule upon philosophy. 

And it would be shameful to do that. 

It certainly would. But I seem to have done something a bit ridiculous 
myself just now. 

What’s that? 

I forgot that we were only playing, and so I spoke too vehemently. 

с Вис І looked upon philosophy as I spoke, and seeing her undeservedly 
besmirched, I seem to have lost my temper and said what I had to say too 
earnestly, as if I were angry with those responsible for it. 

That certainly wasn’t my impression as I listened to you. 

But it was mine as І was speaking. In any case, let’s not forget that in 
our earlier selection we chose older people but that that isn’t permitted in 
this one, for we mustn’t believe Solon”? when he says that as someone 

d grows older he’s able to learn a lot. He сап do that even less well than he 
can run races, for all great and numerous labors belong to the young. 

Necessarily. 

Therefore, calculation, geometry, and all the preliminary education 
required for dialectic must be offered to the future rulers in childhood, 
and not in the shape of compulsory learning either. 

Why’s that? 

е Because по free person should learn anything like a slave. Forced bodily 
labor does no harm to the body, but nothing taught by force stays in the 
soul. 

That’s true. 

Then don’t use force to train the children in these subjects; use play 
instead. That way you'll also see better what each of them is naturally 

537 fitted for. 

That seems reasonable. 

Do you remember that we stated that the children were to be led into 
war on horseback as observers and that, wherever it is safe to do so, they 
should be brought close and taste blood, like puppies? 

I remember. 

In all these things—in labors, studies, and fears—the ones who always 
show the greatest aptitude are to be inscribed on a list. 

b At what age? 

When they’re released from compulsory physical training, for during 


19. Athenian statesman, lawgiver, and poet (с. 640-560). 


BOOK ҮШ 536а-538а 209 


that period, whether it’s two or three years, young people are incapable of 
doing anything else, since weariness and sleep are enemies of learning. 
At the same time, how they fare in this physical training is itself an 
Important test. 

Of course it is. 

And after that, that is to say, from the age of twenty, those who are 
chosen will also receive more honors than the others. Moreover, the 
subjects they learned in no particular order as children they must now 
bring together to form a unified vision of their kinship both with one 
another and with the nature of that which is. 

At any rate, only learning of that sort holds firm in those who receive 
1. 

It is also the greatest test of who is naturally dialectical and who isn’t, 
for anyone who can achieve a unified vision is dialectical, and anyone who 
can’t isn’t. 

I agree. 

Well, then, you'll have to look out for the ones who most of all have this 
ability in them and who also remain stcadfast in their studies, in war, and 
in the other activities laid down by law. And after they have reached their 
thirtieth year, you’ll select them in turn from among those chosen earlier 
and assign them yet greater honors. Then you'll have to test them by 
means of the power of dialectic, to discover which of them can relinquish 
his eyes and other senses, going on with the help of truth to that which 
by itself is. And this is a task that requires great care. 

What’s the main reason for that? 

Don’t you realize what a great evil comes from dialectic as it is currently 
practiced? 

What evil is that? 

Those who practice it are filled with lawlessness. 

They certainly are. 

Do you think it’s surprising that this happens to them? Aren’t you 
sympathetic? 

Why isn’t it surprising? And why should I be sympathetic? 

Because it’s like the case of a child brought up surrounded by much 
wealth and many flatterers in a great and numerous family, who finds out, 
when he has become a man, that he isn’t the child of his professed parents 
and that he can’t discover his real ones. Can you divine what the attitude 
of someone like that would be to the flatterers, on the one hand, and to 
his supposed parents, on the other, before he knew about his parentage, 
and what it would be when he found out? Or would you rather hear what 
I divine about it? 

I’d rather hear your views. 


538 


210 SOcRATES/GLAUCON 


Well, then, I divine that during the time that he didn’t know the truth, 
he’d honor his father, mother, and the rest of his supposed family more 

b than he would the flatterers, that he’d pay greater attention to their needs, 
be less likely to treat them lawlessly in word or deed, and be more likely 
to obey them than the flatterers in any matters of importance. 

Probably so. 

When he became aware of the truth, however, his honor and enthusiasm 
would lessen for his family and increase for the flatterers, he’d obey the 
latter far more than before, begin to live in the way that they did, and keep 

¢ company with them openly, and, unless he was very decent by nature, he’d 
eventually care nothing for that father of his or any of the rest of his 
supposed family. 

All this would probably happen as you say, but in what way is it an 
image of those who take up arguments? 

As follows. We hold from childhood certain convictions about just and 
fine things; we’re brought up with them as with our parents, we obey and 
honor them. 

Indeed, we do. 

d There are other ways of living, however, opposite to these and full of 
pleasures, that flatter the soul and attract it to themselves but which don’t 
persuade sensible people, who continue to honor and obey the convictions 
of their fathers. 

That’s right. 

And then a questioner comes along and asks someone of this sort, 
“What is the fine?” And, when he answers what he has heard from the 
traditional lawgiver, the argument refutes him, and by refuting him often 
and in many places shakes him from his convictions, and makes him 
believe that the fine is no more fine than shameful, and the same with the 

e just, the good, and the things he honored most. What do you think his 
attitude will be then to honoring and obeying his earlier convictions? 

Of necessity he won’t honor or obey them in the same way. 

Then, when he no longer honors and obeys those convictions and can’t 
discover the true ones, will he be likely to adopt any other way of life than 

539 that which flatters him? 

No, he won’t. 

And so, I suppose, from being law-abiding he becomes lawless. 

Inevitably. 

Then, as І asked before, isn’t it only to be expected that this is what 
happens to those who take up arguments in this way, and don’t they 
therefore deserve a lot of sympathy? 

Yes, and they deserve pity too. 

Then, if you don’t want your thirty-year-olds to be objects of such pity, 


BOOK vu 538а-540а 211 


you'll have to be extremely careful about how you introduce them to 
arguments. 

That’s right. 

And isn’t it one lasting precaution not to let them taste arguments while 
they’re young? I don’t suppose that it has escaped your notice that, when 
young people get their first taste of arguments, they misuse it by treating 4 
it as a kind of game of contradiction. They imitate those who’ve refuted 
them by refuting others themselves, and, like puppies, they enjoy dragging 
and tearing those around them with their arguments. 

They’re excessively fond of it. 

Then, when they’ve refuted many and been refuted by them in turn, 
they forcefully and quickly fall into disbelieving what they believed before. 
And, as a result, they themselves and the whole of philosophy are discred- с 
ited in the eyes of others. 

That’s very true. 

But an older person won’t want to take part in such madness. He’ll 
imitate someone who is willing to engage in discussion in order to look 
for the truth, rather than someone who plays at contradiction for sport. 
He’ll be more sensible himself and will bring honor rather than discredit 
to the philosophical way of life. d 

That’s right. 

And when we said before that those allowed to take part in arguments 
should be orderly and steady by nature, not as nowadays, when even 
the unfit are allowed to engage in them—wasn’t all that also said as a 
precaution? 

Of course. 

Then if someone continuously, strenuously, and exclusively devotes 
himself to participation in arguments, exercising himself in them just as 
he did in the bodily physical training, which is their counterpart, would 
that be enough? 

Do you mean six years or four? е 

It doesn’t matter. Make it five. And after that, you must make them go 
down into the cave again, and compel them to take command in matters 
of war and occupy the other offices suitable for young people, so that they 
won’t be inferior to the others in experience. But in these, too, they must 
be tested to see whether they'll remain steadfast when they’re pulled this 
way and that or shift their ground. 540 

How much time do you allow for that? 

Fifteen years. Then, at the age of fifty, those who’ve survived the tests 
and been successful both in practical matters and in the sciences must be 
led to the goal and compelled to lift up the radiant light of their souls to 
what itself provides light for everything. And once they’ve seen the good 


SA 


212 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


itself, they must each in turn put the city, its citizens, and themselves in 
order, using it as their model. Each of them will spend most of his time 
with philosophy, but, when his turn comes, he must labor in politics and 
rule for the city’s sake, not as if he were doing something fine, but rather 
something that has to be done. Then, having educated others like himself 
to take his place as guardians of the city, he will depart for the Isles of the 
Blessed and dwell there. And, if the Pythia agrees, the city will publicly 
establish memorials and sacrifices to him as a daimon, but if not, then as 
a happy and divine human being. 

Like a sculptor,” Socrates, you’ve produced ruling men that are com- 
pletely fine. 

And ruling women, too, Glaucon, for you mustn’t think that what Pve 
said applies any more to men than it does to women who are born with 
the appropriate natures. 

That’s right, if indeed they аге to share everything equally with the 
men, as we said they should. 

Then, do you agree that the things we’ve said about the city and its 
constitution aren’t altogether wishful thinking, that it’s hard for them to 
come about, but not impossible? And do you also agree that they can come 
about only in the way we indicated, namely, when one or more true 
philosophers come to power іп а city, who despise present honors, thinking 
them slavish and worthless, and who prize what is right and the honors 
that come from it above everything, and regard justice as the most impor- 
tant and most essential thing, serving it and increasing it as they set their 
city in order? 

How will they do that? 

They'll send everyone in the city who is over ten years old into the 
country. Then they’ll take possession of the children, who are now free 
from the ethos of their parents, and bring them up in their own customs 
and laws, which are the ones we’ve described. This is the quickest and 
easiest way for the city and constitution we’ve discussed to be established, 
become happy, and bring most benefit to the people among whom it’s 
established. 

That’s by far the quickest and easiest way. And in my opinion, Socrates, 
you've described well how it would come into being, if it ever did. 

Then, isn’t that enough about this city and the man who is like it? Surely 
it is clear what sort of man we’ll say һе has to be. 

Itis clear, he said. And as for your question, I think that we have reached 
the end of this topic. 


са 


20. See 3614. 


Воок ҮШ 


The description of the kallipolis and of the man whose character resembles й- 
the philosopher-king—is now complete, and Socrates returns to the argument 
interrupted at the beginning of Book V. He describes four individual character 
types and the four types of constitutions that result when people who possess them 
rule in a city (5444-5454). He presents these as four stages in the increasing 
corruption or decline of the kallipolis, and he explains, by appeal to the mathemati- 
cal myth of the geometrical number (546а-0), why the kallipolis will decline. 
However, embedded in the myth 15 the serious philosophical suggestion that the 
kallipolis will decline because the philosopher-kings have to rely on sense perception 
in putting their eugenics policy into practice (546b—<). 

The first of the bad cities Socrates describes is a timocracy. It is ruled by people 
whose souls are themselves ruled by the spirited part of their soul, in which the 
desire for honor, victories, and good reputation are located (550b). It is the second- 
best city to the kallipolis. The third-best city is an oligarchy. It is ruled by people 
whose souls are ruled by their necessary appetites (554a). The fourth-best city is 
a democracy. It 1s ruled by people whose souls are ruled by unnecessary appetites 
(561а-%). The worst city of all is a tyranny. It is ruled by someone whose soul 
is ruled by its lawless and unnecessary appetites (57 1a). 


Well, then, Glaucon, we’ve agreed to the following: If a city is to achieve 

the height of good government, wives must be in common, children and 543 
all their education must be in common, their way of life, whether in peace 

or war, must be in common, and their kings must be those among them 
who have proved to be best, both in philosophy and in warfare. 

We have agreed to that, he said. 

Moreover, we also agreed that, as soon as the rulers are established, 
they will lead the soldiers and settle them in the kind of dwellings we 4 
described, which are in no way private but common to all. And we also 
agreed, if you remember, what kind of possessions they will have. 

I remember that we thought that none of them should acquire any of 
the things that the other rulers now do but that, as athletes of war and 
guardians, they should receive their yearly upkeep from the other citizens 


213 


544 


214 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


as a wage for their guardianship and look after themselves and the rest of 
the city.’ 

That’s right. But since we have completed this discussion, let’s recall 
the point at which we began the digression that brought us here, so that 
we сап continue on the same path from where we left off. 

That isn’t difficult, for, much the same as now, you were talking as if 
you had completed the description of the city.’ You said that you would 
class both the city you described and the man who is like it as good, even 
though, as it seems, you had a still finer city and man to tell us about. But, 
in any Case, you said that, if this city was the right one, the others were 
faulty. You said, if I remember, that there were four types of constitution 
remaining that are worth discussing, each with faults that we should 
observe, and we should do the same for the people who are like them. 
Our aim was to observe them all, agree which man is best and which 
worst, and then determine whether the best is happiest and the worst 
most wretched or whether it’s otherwise. І was asking you which four 
constitutions you had in mind when Polemarchus and Adeimantus inter- 
rupted.’ And that’s when you took up the discussion that led here. 

That’s absolutely right. 

Well, then, like a wrestler, give me the same hold again, and when I ask 
the same question, try to give the answer you were about to give before. 

If I can. 

Pd at least like to hear what four constitutions you meant. 

That won’t be difficult since they’re the ones for which we have names. 
First, there’s the constitution praised by most people, namely, the Cretan 
or Laconian.* The second, which is also second in the praise it receives, 
is called oligarchy and is filled with a host of evils. The next in order, and 
antagonistic to it, is democracy. And finally there is genuine tyranny, 
surpassing all of them, the fourth and last of the diseased cities. Or can 
you think of another type of constitution—I mean another whose form is 
distinct from these? Dynasties and purchased kingships and other consti- 
tutions of that sort, which one finds no less among the barbarians than 
among the Greeks, are somewhere intermediate between these four. 

At any event, many strange ones are indeed talked about. 

And do you realize that of necessity there are as many forms of human 
character as there are of constitutions? Or do you think that constitutions 


1. See 414d—20b. 

2. See 445с-е. 

3. See 449b ff. 

4. е. the Spartan constitution. 


BOOK уш 543с-545а4 215 


are born “from oak or rock” and not from the characters of the people 
who live in the cities governed by them, which tip the scales, so to speak, 
and drag the rest along with them? е 

No, I don’t believe they come from anywhere else. 

Then, if there are five forms of city, there must also be five forms of 
the individual soul. 

Of course. 

Now, we’ve already described the one that’s like aristocracy, which is 
rightly said to be good and just. 

We have. 545 

Then mustn’t we next go through the inferior ones, namely, the victory- 
loving and honor-loving (which corresponds to the Laconian form of 
constitution), followed by the oligarchic, the democratic, and the tyranni- 
cal, so that, having discovered the most unjust of all, we can oppose him 
to the most just? In this way, we can complete our investigation into how 
pure justice and pure injustice stand, with regard to the happiness or 
wretchedness of those who possess them, and either be persuaded by 
Thrasymachus to practice injustice or by the argument that is now coming 
to light to practice justice. b 

That’s absolutely what we have to do. 

Then, just as we began by looking for the virtues of character in a 
constitution, before looking for them in the individual, thinking that they’d 
be clearer in the former,’ shouldn’t we first examine the honor-loving 
constitution? I don’t know what other name there is for it, but it should 
be called either timocracy or timarchy. Then shouldn’t we examine an 
individual who is related to that constitution, and, after that, oligarchy and 
an oligarchic person, and democracy and a democratic person? And finally, 
having come to a city under a tyrant and having examined it, shouldn’t we с 
look into a tyrannical soul, trying in this way to become adequate judges 
of the topic we proposed to ourselves? 

That would be a reasonable way for us to go about observing and 
judging, at any rate. 

Well, then, let’s try to explain how timocracy emerges from aristocracy. 
Or is it a simple principle that the cause of change in any constitution is 
civil war breaking out within the ruling group itself, but that if this group— 
however small it is—remains of one mind, the constitution cannot be 4 
changed? 

Yes, that’s right. 

How, then, Glaucon, will our city be changed? How will civil war arise, 


5. See e.g. Odyssey 19.163. 
6. See 368c ff. 


216 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


either between the auxiliaries and the rulers or within either group? Or 
do you want us to be like Homer and pray to the Muses to tell us “how 

e сім] war first broke out?”’ And shall we say that they speak to us in tragic 
tones, as if they were in earnest, playing and jesting with us as if we were 
children? 

What will they say? 

546 Something like this. “It is hard for a city composed in this way to change, 
but everything that comes into being must decay. Not even a constitution 
such as this will last for ever. It, too, must face dissolution. And this is 
how it will be dissolved. All plants that grow in the earth, and also all 
animals that grow upon it, have periods of fruitfulness and barrenness of 
both soul and body as often as the revolutions complete the circumferences 
of their circles. These circumferences are short for the short-lived, and 
the opposite for their opposites.’ Now, the people you have educated to 
be leaders in your city, even though they are wise, still won’t, through 

b calculation together with sense perception, hit upon the fertility and bar- 
renness of the human species, but it will escape them, and so they will at 
some time beget children when they ought not to do so. For the birth of 
a divine creature, there is a cycle comprehended by a perfect number.’ 
For a human being, it is the first number in which are found root and 
square increases, comprehending three lengths and four terms, of ele- 
ments that make things like and unlike, that cause them to increase and 
decrease, and that render all things mutually agreeable and rational in 

с their relations to one another. Of these elements, four and three, married 
with five, give two harmonies when thrice increased. One of them is a 
square, so many times a hundred. The other is of equal length one way 
but oblong. One of its sides is one hundred squares of the rational diameter 
of five diminished by one each or one hundred squares of the irrational 
diameter diminished by two each. The other side is a hundred cubes of 
three. This whole geometrical number controls better and worse births." 


7. This seems to be an adaptation of Iliad 16.112. Cf. 1.575. 


8. Le. plants and animals have fixed gestation periods, represented by circles whose 
circumferences revolve. If a seed is sown in the fertile part of the cycle, it grows to 
proper maturity, but if a seed is sown during the barren part of the cycle, it will either 
not germinate or produce an inferior crop. The reason that the length of these periods— 
the size of the corresponding circle—is proportional to the length of the life of the 
thing whose period or circle they are is that longer-lived things were thought to have 
longer gestation periods. 

9. The divine creature seems to be the world or universe. See Timaeus 30b-d, 324, 
З4а-Ь. Plato does not specify what its number is. 

10. The human geometrical number is the product of 3, 4, and 5 “thrice increased,” 
multiplied by itself three times, і.е. (3-4-5)* or 12,960,000. This сап be represented 
geometrically as a square whose sides are 3600 or as an oblong or rectangle whose 
sides are 4800 and 2700. The first is “so many times a hundred,” viz. 36 times. The 


BOOK уш 5454-547с 217 


And when your rulers, through ignorance of these births, join brides and 
grooms at the wrong time, the children will be neither good natured nor 
fortunate. The older generation will choose the best of these children but 
they are unworthy nevertheless, and when they acquire their fathers’ 
powers, they will begin, as guardians, to neglect us Muses. First, they will 
have less consideration for music and poetry than they ought, then they 
will neglect physical training, so that your young people will become less 
well educated in music and poetry. Hence, rulers chosen from among 
them won’t be able to guard well the testing of the golden, silver, bronze, 
and iron races, which are Hesiod’s and your own." The intermixing of 


е 


iron with silver and bronze with gold that results will engender lack of 547 


likeness and unharmonious inequality, and these always breed war and 
hostility wherever they arise. Civil war, we declare, is always and every- 
where ‘of this lineage’.””” 

And we'll declare that what the Muses say is right. 

It must be, since they’re Muses. 

What do the Muses say after that? 

Once civil war breaks out, both the iron and bronze types’ pull the 
constitution towards money-making and the acquisition of land, houses, 
gold, and silver, while both the gold and silver types‘*—not being poor, 
but by nature rich or rich in their souls—lead the constitution towards 
virtue and the old order. And thus striving and struggling with one another, 
they compromise on a middle way: They distribute the land and houses 
as private property, enslave and hold as serfs and servants those whom 
they previously guarded as free friends and providers of upkeep,” and 
occupy themselves with war and with guarding against those whom they’ve 
enslaved. 

I think that is the way this transformation begins. 

Then, isn’t this constitution a sort of midpoint between aristocracy and 
oligarchy? 

Absolutely. 

Then, if that’s its place in the transformation, how will it be managed 


latter is obtained as follows. The “rational diameter” of 5 is the nearest rational number 
to the real diagonal of a square whose sides аге 5, і.е. 10 У 50. This number is 7. Since 
the square of 7 is 49, we get the longer side of the rectangle by diminishing 49 by 1 
and multiplying the result by 100. This gives 4800. The “irrational diameter” of 5 is 
V50. When squared, diminished by 2, and multiplied by 100 this, too, is 4800. The 
short side, “a hundred cubes of three,” is 2700. 

11. See Works and Days 109-202. 

12. See e.g. Шаа 6.211. 

13. ILe. the rulers into whose souls iron or bronze have been mixed. 

14. Т.е. the rulers whose souls are either silver or gold. 


15. See 463b. 


548 


218 SOCRATES/GLAUCON/ADEIMANTUS 


after the change? Isn’t it obvious that it will imitate the aristocratic constitu- 
tion in some respects and oligarchy in others, since it’s between them, and 
that it will also have some features of its own? 

That’s right. 

The rulers will be respected; the fighting class will be prevented from 
taking part in farming, manual labor, or other ways of making money; it 
will eat communally and devote itself to physical training and training for 
war; and in all such ways, won’t the constitution be like the aristocratic 
one? 

Yes. 

On the other hand, it will be afraid to appoint wise people as rulers, on 
the grounds that they are no longer simple and earnest but mixed, and 
will incline towards spirited and simpler people, who are more naturally 
suited for war than peace; it will value the tricks and stratagems of war 
and spend all its time making war. Aren’t most of these qualities peculiar 
to it? 

Yes. 

Such people will desire money just as those in oligarchies do, passion- 
ately adoring gold and silver in secret. They will possess private treasuries 
and storehouses, where they can keep it hidden, and have houses to 
enclose them, like private nests, where they can spend lavishly either on 
women or on anyone else they wish. 

That’s absolutely true. 

They'll be mean with their own money, since they value it and are not 
allowed to acquire it openly, but they’ll love to spend other people’s 
because of their appetites. They’ll enjoy their pleasures in secret, running 
away from the law like boys from their father, for since they’ve neglected 
the true Muse—that of discussion and philosophy—and have valued 
physical training more than music and poetry, they haven’t been educated 
by persuasion but by force. 

The constitution you’re discussing is certainly a mixture of good and 
bad. 

Yes, it is mixed, but because of the predominance of the spirited 
element, one thing alone is most manifest in it, namely, the love of victory 
and the love of honor. 

Very much so. 

This, then, is the way this constitution would come into being and what 
it would be like, for, after all, we’re only sketching the shape of the 
constitution in theory, not giving an exact account of it, since even from 
a sketch we'll be able to discern the most just and the most unjust 
person. And, besides, it would be an intolerably long task to describe every 
constitution and every character without omitting any detail. 


BOOK ҮШ 547с-549е 219 


That’s right. 

Then who is the man that corresponds to this constitution? How does 
he come to be, and what sort of man is he? 

I think, said Adeimantus, that he’d be very like Glaucon here, as far as 
the love of victory is concerned. 

In that respect, I said, he might be, but, in the following ones, I don’t 
think his nature would be similar. 

Which ones? e 

He’d be more obstinate and less well trained in music and poetry, 
though he’s a lover of it, and he’d love to listen to speeches and arguments, 
though he’s by no means a rhetorician. He’d be harsh to his slaves rather 
than merely looking down on them as an adequately educated person 
does. He’d be gentle to free people and very obedient to rulers, being 549 
himself a lover of ruling and a lover of honor. However, he doesn’t base 
his claim to rule on his ability as a speaker or anything like that, but, as 
he’s a lover of physical training and a lover of hunting, on his abilities and 
exploits in warfare and warlike activities. 

Yes, that’s the character that corresponds to this constitution. 

Wouldn’t such a person despise money when he’s young but love it 
more and more as he grows older, because he shares in the money-loving 
nature and isn’t pure in his attitude to virtue? And isn’t that because he Ф 
lacks the best of guardians? 

What guardian is that? Adeimantus said. 

Reason, І said, mixed with music and poetry, for it alone dwells within 
the person who possesses it as the lifelong preserver of his virtue. 

Well put. 

That, then, is a timocratic youth; he resembles the corresponding city. 

Absolutely. G 

And he comes into being in some such way as this. He’s the son of a 
good father who lives in a city that isn’t well governed, who avoids honors, 
office, lawsuits, and all such meddling in other people’s affairs, and who 
is even willing to be put at a disadvantage in order to avoid trouble. 

Then how does he come to be timocratic? 

When he listens, first, to his mother complaining that her husband isn’t 
one of the rulers and that she’s at a disadvantage among the other women 
as a result. Then she sees that he’s not very concerned about money and 
that he doesn’t fight back when he’s insulted, whether in private огіп 4 
public in the courts, but is indifferent to everything of that sort. She also 
sees him concentrating his mind on his own thoughts, neither honoring 
nor dishonoring her overmuch. Angered by all this, she tells her son that 
his father is unmanly, too easy-going, and all the other things that women 
repeat over and over again in such cases. е 


220 ADEIMANTUS/SOCRATES 


Yes, Adeimantus said, it’s like them to have many such complaints. 

You know, too, I said, that the servants of men like that—the ones who 
are thought to be well disposed to the family—also say similar things to 
the son in private. When they see the father failing to prosecute someone 
who owes him money or has wronged him in some other way, they urge 
the son to take revenge on all such people when he grows up and to be 

550 more of a man than his father. The boy hears and sees the same kind of 
things when he goes out: Those in the city who do their own work are 
called fools and held to be of little account, while those who meddle in 
other people’s affairs are honored and praised. The young man hears and 
sees all this, but he also listens to what his father says, observes what he 
does from close at hand, and compares his ways of living with those of the 

b others. So he’s pulled by both. His father nourishes the rational part of 
his soul and makes it grow; the others nourish the spirited and appetitive 
parts. Because he isn’t a bad man by nature but keeps bad company, when 
he’s pulled in these two ways, he settles in the middle and surrenders the 
rule over himself to the middle part—the victory-loving and spirited part— 
and becomes a proud and honor-loving man. 

I certainly think that you’ve given a full account of how this sort of man 
comes to be. 

c Then we now have the second constitution and the second man. 

We have. 

Then shall we next talk, as Aeschylus says, of “another man ordered 
like another сісу,” “ог shall we follow our plan and talk about the city first? 

We must follow our plan. 

And I suppose that the one that comes after the present constitution is 
oligarchy. 

And what kind of constitution would you call oligarchy? 

The constitution based on a property assessment, in which the rich 

d гие, and the poor man has no share in ruling. 

I understand. 

So mustn’t we first explain how timarchy is transformed into oligarchy? 

Yes. 

And surely the manner of this transformation is clear even to the blind. 

What is it like? 

The treasure house filled with gold, which each possesses, destroys the 
constitution. First, they find ways of spending money for themselves, then 
they stretch the laws relating to this, then they and their wives disobey the 
laws altogether. 


етші 


16. The line does not occur in the extant plays, but it may be an adaptation of Seven 
against Thebes 451. 


BOOK уш 549е-5514 221 


They would do that. 

And as one person sees another doing this and emulates him, they make 
the majority of the others like themselves. e 

They do. 

From there they proceed further into money-making, and the more 
they value it, the less they value virtue. Or aren’t virtue and wealth so 
opposed that if they were set on a scales, they’d always incline in opposite 
directions? 

That’s right. 

So, when wealth and the wealthy are valued or honored in a city, virtue 
and good people are valued less. 551 

Clearly. 

And what is valued is always practiced, and what isn’t valued is ne- 
glected. 

That’s right. 

Then, in the end, victory-loving and honor-loving men become lovers 
of making money, or money-lovers. And they praise and admire wealthy 
people and appoint them as rulers, while they dishonor poor ones. 

Certainly. 

Then, don’t they pass a law that is characteristic of an oligarchic consti- 
tution, one that establishes a wealth qualification—higher where the con- 
stitution is more oligarchic, less where it’s less so—and proclaims that 
those whose property doesn’t reach the stated amount aren’t qualified to b 
rule? And they either put this through by force of arms, or else, before it 
comes to that, they terrorize the people and establish their constitution 
that way. Isn’t that so? 

Of course it is. 

Generally speaking, then, that’s the way this kind of constitution is 
established. 

Yes, but what is its character? And what are the faults that we said it 
contained? с 

First of all, the very thing that defines it is one, for what would happen 
if someone were to choose the captains of ships by their wealth, refusing 
to entrust the ship to a poor person even if he was a better captain? 

They would make a poor voyage of it. 

And isn’t the same true of the rule of anything else whatsoever? 

I suppose so. 

Except a city? Or does it also apply to a city? 

To it most of all, since it’s the most difficult and most important kind 
of rule. 

That, then, is one major, fault in oligarchy. d 

Apparently. 


JIZ 


222 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


And what about this second fault? Is it any smaller than the other? 

What fault? 

That of necessity it isn’t one city but two—one of the poor and one of 
the rich—living in the same place and always plotting against one another. 

By god, that’s just as big a fault as the first. 

And the following is hardly a fine quality either, namely, that oligarchs 
probably aren’t able to fight a war, for they’d be compelled either to arm 
and use the majority, and so have more to fear from them than the enemy, 
or not to use them and show up as true oligarchs—few in number—on 
the battlefield. At the same time, they’d be unwilling to pay mercenaries, 
because of their love of money. 

That certainly isn’t a fine quality either. 

And what about the meddling in other people’s affairs that we con- 
demned before? Under this constitution, won’t the same people be farm- 
ers, money-makers, and soldiers simultaneously? And do you think it’s 
right for things to be that way? 

Not at all. 

Now, let’s see whether this constitution is the first to admit the greatest 
of all evils. 

Which one is that? 

Allowing someone to sell all his possessions and someone else to buy 
them and then allowing the one who has sold them to go on living in the 
city, while belonging to none of its parts, for he’s neither a money-maker, 
a craftsman, a member of the cavalry, or a hoplite, but a poor person 
without means. 

It is the first to allow that. 

At any rate, this sort of thing is not forbidden in oligarchies. If it were, 
some of their citizens wouldn’t be excessively rich, while others are totally 
impoverished. 

That’s right. 

Now, think about this. When the person who sells all his possessions 
was rich and spending his money, was he of any greater use to the city in 
the ways we’ve just mentioned than when Һе spent it all? Or did he 
merely seem to be one of the rulers of the city, while in truth he was 
neither ruler nor subject there, but only a squanderer of his property? 

That’s right. He seemed to be part of the city, but he was nothing but 
a Squanderer. 

Should we say, then, that, as a drone exists in a cell and is an affliction 
to the hive, so this person is a drone in the house and an affliction to the 
city? 

That’s certainly right, Socrates. 

Hasn’t the god made all the winged drones stingless, Adeimantus, as 


BOOK vil 5514-553с 223 


well as some wingless ones, while other wingless ones have dangerous 
stings? And don’t the stingless ones continue as beggars into old age, while 
those with stings become what we call evildoers? 

That’s absolutely true. 

Clearly, then, in any city where you see beggars, there are thieves, 
pickpockets, temple-robbers, and all such evildoers hidden. 

That is clear. 

What about oligarchic cities? Don’t you see beggars in them? 

Almost everyone except the rulers is a beggar there. 

Then mustn’t we suppose that they also include many evildoers with 
stings, whom the rulers carefully keep in check by force? 

We certainly must. 

And shall we say that the presence of such people is the result of lack 
of education, bad rearing, and a bad constitutional arrangement? 

We shall. 

This, then, or something like it, is the oligarchic city. It contains all 
these evils and probably others in addition. 

That’s pretty well what it’s like. 

Then, let’s take it that we’ve disposed of the constitution called oligar- 
сһу--І mean the one that gets its rulers on the basis of a property assess- 
ment—and let’s examine the man who is like it, both how he comes to be 
and what sort of man he is. 

All right. 

Doesn’t the transformation from the timocrat we described to an oli- 
garch occur mostly in this way? 

Which way? 

The timocrat’s son at first emulates his father and follows in his foot- 
steps. Then he suddenly sees him crashing against the city like a ship 
against a reef, spilling out all his possessions, even his life. He had held 
a generalship or some other high office, was brought to court by false 
witnesses, and was either put to death or exiled or was disenfranchised 
and had all his property confiscated. 

That’s quite likely. 

The son sees all this, suffers from it, loses his property, and, fearing for 
his life, immediately drives from the throne in his own soul the honor- 
loving and spirited part that ruled there. Humbled by poverty, he turns 
greedily to making money, and, little by little, saving and working, he 
amasses property. Don’t you think that this person would establish his 
appetitive and money-making part on the throne, setting it up as a great 
king within himself, adorning it with golden tiaras and collars and girding 
it with Persian swords? | 

I do. 


227 


224 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


He makes the rational and spirited parts sit on the ground beneath 
d appetite, one on either side, reducing them to slaves. He won’t allow the 
first to reason about or examine anything except how a little money can 
be made into great wealth. And he won’t allow the second to value or 
admire anything but wealth and wealthy people or to have any ambition 
other than the acquisition of wealth or whatever might contribute to getting 

it. 

There is no other transformation of a young man who is an honor-lover 
into one who is a money-lover that’s as swift and sure as this. 

е Then isn’t this ап oligarchic тап? 

Surely, he developed out of a man who resembled the constitution from 
which oligarchy came. 

Then let’s consider whether he resembles the oligarchic constitution? 

554 All right. 

Doesn’t he resemble it, in the first place, by attaching the greatest 
importance to money? 

Of course. 

And, further, by being a thrifty worker, who satisfies only his necessary 
appetites, makes no other expenditures, and enslaves his other desires as 
vain. 

That’s right. 

A somewhat squalid fellow, who makes a profit from everything and 
hoards it—the sort the majority admires. Isn’t this the man who resembles 

b such a constitution? 

That’s my opinion, anyway. At any rate, money is valued above every- 
thing by both the city and the man. 

I don’t suppose that such a man pays any attention to education. 

Not in my view, for, if he did, he wouldn’t have chosen a blind leader 
for his chorus and honored him most.” 

Good. But consider this: Won’t we say that, because of his lack of 
education, the dronish appetites—some beggarly and others evil—exist in 

с him, but that they’re forcibly held in check by his carefulness? 

Certainly. 

Do you know where you should look to see the evildoings of such 
people? 

Where? 

To the guardianship of orphans or something like that, where they have 
ample opportunity to do injustice with impunity. 

True. = 


17. The blind leader is Plutus, the god of wealth, who is represented as being blind, 
e.g. in Aristophanes’ Plutus. 


BOOK VII 553с-555с 225 


And doesn’t this make it clear that, in those other contractual obliga- 
tions, where he has a good reputation and is thought to be just, he’s 
forcibly holding his other evil appetites in check by means of some decent 
part of himself? He holds them in check, not by persuading them thatits 4 
better not to act on them or taming them with arguments, but by compul- 
sion and fear, trembling for his other possessions. 

That’s right. 

Апа, by god, you'll find that most of them have appetites akin to those 
of the drone, once they have other people’s money to spend. 

You certainly will. 

Then someone like that wouldn’t be entirely free from internal civil war 
and wouldn’t be one but in some way two,” though generally his better 
desires are in control of his worse. е 

That’s right. 

For this reason, he’d be more respectable than many, but the true virtue 
of a single-minded and harmonious soul far escapes him. 

І suppose so. 

Further, this thrifty man is a poor individual contestant for victory in a 
city or for any other fine and much-honored thing, for he’s not willing to 
spend money for the sake of a fine reputation or on contests for such 555 
things. He’s afraid to arouse his appetites for spending or to call on them 
as allies to obtain victory, so he fights like an oligarch, with only a few of 
his resources. Hence he’s mostly defeated but remains rich. 

Thats right. 

Then have we any further doubt that a thrifty money-maker is like an 
oligarchic city? b 

None at all. 

It seems, then, that we must next consider democracy, how it comes 
into being, and what character it has when it does, so that, knowing in 
turn the character of a man who resembles it, we can present him for 
judgment. 

That would be quite consistent with what we’ve been doing. 

Well, isn’t the city changed from an oligarchy to a democracy in some 
such way as this, because of its insatiable desire to attain what it has set 
before itself as the good, namely, the need to become as rich as possible? 

In what way? 

Since those who rule in the city do so because they own a lot, [suppose с 
they’re unwilling to enact laws to prevent young people who’ve had no 
discipline from spending and wasting their wealth, so that by making loans 


18. See 443с-444. 


556 


226 ЅОСВАТЕЅ/ ADEIMANTUS 


to them, secured by the young people’s property, and then calling those 
loans in, they themselves become even richer and more honored. 

That’s their favorite thing to do. 

So isn’t it clear by now that it is impossible for a city to honor wealth 
and at the same time for its citizens to acquire moderation, but one or the 
other is inevitably neglected? 

That’s pretty clear. 

Because of this neglect and because they encourage bad discipline, 
oligarchies not infrequently reduce people of no common stamp to poverty. 

That’s right. 

And these people sit idle in the city, 1 suppose, with their stings and 
weapons—some in debt, some disenfranchised, some both—hating those 
who’ve acquired their property, plotting against them and others, and 
longing for a revolution. 

They do. 

The money-makers, on the other hand, with their eyes on the ground, 
pretend not to see these people,” and by lending money they disable any 
of the remainder who resist, exact as interest many times the principal 
sum, and so create a considerable number of drones and beggars in the 
city. 

A considerable number indeed. 

In any case, they are unwilling to quench this kind of evil as it flares up 
in the city, either in the way we mentioned, by preventing people from 
doing whatever they like with their own property or by another law which 
would also solve the problem. 

What law? 

The second-best one, which compels the citizens to care about virtue 
by prescribing that the majority of voluntary contracts be entered into at 
the lender’s own risk, for lenders would be less shameless then in their 
pursuit of money in the city and fewer of those evils we were mentioning 
just now would develop. 

Far fewer. 

But as it is, for all these reasons, the rulers in the city treat their subjects 
in the way we described. But as for themselves and their children, don’t 
they make their young fond of luxury, incapable of effort either mental or 
physical, too soft to stand up to pleasures or pains, and idle besides? 

Of course. 

And don’t they themselves neglect everything except making money, 
caring no more for virtue than the poor do? 


19. Their eyes are on the ground because their appetite for money forces their souls 
to look downward. See 518c—519b. 


BOOK vill 555с-557с 227 
Yes. 


But when rulers and subjects in this condition meet on a journey or 
some other common undertaking—it might be a festival, an embassy, or 
a campaign, or they might be shipmates or fellow soldiers—and see one 
another in danger, in these circumstances are the poor in any way despised 
by the rich? Or rather isn’t it often the case that a poor man, lean апа d 
suntanned, stands in battle next to a rich man, reared in the shade and 
carrying a lot of excess flesh, and sees him panting and at a loss? And 
don’t you think that he’d consider that it’s through the cowardice of the 
poor that such people are rich and that one poor man would say to another 
when they met in private: “These people are at our mercy; they’re good 
for nothing”? е 

I know very well that’s what they would do. 

Then, as a sick body needs only a slight shock from outside to become 
ill and is sometimes at civil war with itself even without this, so a city in 
the same condition needs only a small pretext—such as one side bringing 
in allies from an oligarchy or the other from a democracy—to fall ill and 
to fight with itself and is sometimes in a state of civil war even without any 
external influence. 

Absolutely. 557 

And I suppose that democracy comes about when the poor are victori- 
ous, killing some of their opponents and expelling others, and giving the 
rest an equal share in ruling under the constitution, and for the most part 
assigning people to positions of rule by lot. 

Yes, that’s how democracy is established, whether by force of arms or 
because those on the opposing side are frightened into exile. 

Then how do these people live? What sort of constitution do they have? 
It’s clear that a man who is like it will be democratic. b 

That is clear. 

First of all, then, aren’t they free? And isn’t the city full of freedom and 
freedom of speech? And doesn’t everyone in it have the license to do what 
he wants? 

That’s what they say, at any rate. 

And where people have this license, it’s clear that each of them will 
arrange his own life in whatever manner pleases him. 

It is. 

Then I suppose that it’s most of all under this constitution that one 
finds people of all varieties. с 

Of course. 

Then it looks as though this is the finest or most beautiful of the 
constitutions, for, like a coat embroidered with every kind of ornament, 
this city, embroidered with every kind of character type, would seem to 


228 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


be the most beautiful. And many people would probably judge it to be so, 
as women and children do when they see something multicolored. 

They certainly would. 

d It’s also a convenient place to look for a constitution. 

Why’s that? 

Because it contains all kinds of constitutions on account of the license 
it gives its citizens. So it looks as though anyone who wants to put a city 
in order, as we were doing, should probably go to a democracy, as to a 
supermarket of constitutions, pick out whatever pleases him, and establish 
that. 

е He probably wouldn’t be at a loss for models, at any rate. 

In this city, there is no requirement to rule, even if you’re capable of it, 
or again to be ruled if you don’t want to be, or to be at war when the 
others are, or at peace unless you happen to want it. And there is no 
requirement in the least that you not serve in public office as a juror, if 
you happen to want to serve, even if there is a law forbidding you to do 

558 so. Isn’t that a divine and pleasant life, while it lasts? 

It probably is—while it lasts. 

And what about the calm of some of their condemned criminals? Isn’t 
that a sign of sophistication? Or have you never seen people who’ve been 
condemned to death or exile under such a constitution stay on at the 
center of things, strolling around like the ghosts of dead heroes, without 
anyone staring at them or giving them a thought? 

Yes, I’ve seen it a lot. 

b And what about the city’s tolerance? Isn’t it so completely lacking in 
small-mindedness that it utterly despises the things we took so seriously 
when we were founding our city, namely, that unless someone had tran- 
scendent natural gifts, he’d never become good unless he played the right 
games and followed a fine way of life from early childhood? Isn’t it 
magnificent the way it tramples all this underfoot, by giving no thought to 
what someone was doing before he entered public life and by honoring 

с him if only he tells them that he wishes the majority well? 

Yes, it’s altogether splendid! 

Then these and others like them are the characteristics of democracy. 
And it would seem to be a pleasant constitution, which lacks rulers but 
not variety and which distributes a sort of equality to both equals and 
unequals alike. 

We certainly know what you mean. 

Consider, then, what private individual resembles it. Or should we first 
inquire, as we did with the city, how he comes to be? 

Yes, we should. 

Well, doesn’t it happen like this? Wouldn’t the son of that thrifty oligarch 

d Бе brought up in his father’s ways? 


BOOK уш 557с-559с 229 


Of course. 

Then he too rules his spendthrift pleasures by force—the ones that 
aren’t money-making and are called unnecessary. 

Clearly. 

But, so as not to discuss this in the dark, do you want us first to define 
which desires are necessary and which aren’t? 

I do. 

Aren’t those we can’t desist from and those whose satisfaction benefits 
us rightly called necessary, for we are by nature compelled to satisfy them 


both? Isn’t that so? е 
Of course. 
So we’d be right to apply the term “necessary” to them? 559 
We would. 


What about those that someone could get rid of if he practiced from 
youth on, those whose presence leads to no good or even to the opposite? 
If we said that all of them were unnecessary, would we be right? 

We would. 

Let’s pick an example of each, so that we can grasp the patterns they 
exhibit. 

We should do that. 

Aren’t the following desires necessary: the desire to eat to the point of 
health and well-being and the desire for bread and delicacies? b 

I suppose so. 

The desire for bread is necessary on both counts; it’s beneficial, and 
unless it’s satisfied, we die.” 

Yes. 

The desire for delicacies is also necessary to the extent that it’s beneficial 
to well-being. 

Absolutely. 

What about the desire that goes beyond these and seeks other sorts of 
foods, that most people can get rid of, if it’s restrained and educated while 
they’re young, and that’s harmful both to the body and to the reason and 
moderation of the soul? Would it be rightly called unnecessary? б 

It would indeed. 

Then wouldn’t we also say that such desires are spendthrift, while the 
earlier ones are money-making, because they profit our various projects? 

Certainly. 

And won’t we say the same about the desire for sex and about other 
desires? 

Yes. 

And didn’t we say that the person we just now called a drone is full of 


20. Bread is here the “stuff of life.” That’s why one dies for want of it. 


230 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


such pleasures and desires, since he is ruled by the unnecessary ones, 
4 while a thrifty oligarch is ruled by his necessary desires? 

We certainly did. 

Let’s go back, then, and explain how the democratic man develops out 
of the oligarchic one. It seems to me as though it mostly happens as 
follows. 

How? 

When a young man, who is reared in the miserly and uneducated 
manner we described, tastes the honey of the drones and associates with 
wild and dangerous creatures who can provide every variety of multicol- 
ored pleasure in every sort of way, this, as you might suppose, is the 

e beginning of his transformation from having an oligarchic constitution 
within him to having a democratic one. 

It’s inevitable that this is how it starts. 

And just as the city changed when one party received help from like- 
minded people outside, doesn’t the young man change when one party of 
his desires receives help from external desires that are akin to them and 
of the same form? 

Absolutely. 

And I suppose that, if any contrary help comes to the oligarchic party 
within him, whether from his father or from the rest of his household, 
who exhort and reproach him, then there’s civil war and counterrevolution 

560 within him, and he battles against himself. 

That’s right. 

Sometimes the democratic party yields to the oligarchic, so that some 
of the young man’s appetites are overcome, others are expelled, a kind of 
shame rises in his soul, and order is restored. 

That does sometimes happen. 

But I suppose that, as desires are expelled, others akin to them are 
being nurtured unawares, and because of his father’s ignorance about how 

b to bring him up, they grow numerous and strong. 

That’s what tends to happen. 

These desires draw him back into the same bad company and in secret 
intercourse breed a multitude of others. 

Certainly. 

And, seeing the citadel of the young man’s soul empty of knowledge, 
fine ways of living, and words of truth (which are the best watchmen and 
guardians of the thoughts of those men whom the gods love), they finally 
occupy that citadel themselves. s 

Е They certainly do. 

And in the absence of these guardians, false and boastful words and 

beliefs rush up and occupy this part of him. 


BOOK уш 559с-56іс 231 


Indeed, they do. 

Won't he then return to these lotus-eaters and live with them openly? 
And if some help comes to the thrifty part of his soul from his household, 
won’t these boastful words close the gates of the royal wall within him to 
prevent these allies from entering and refuse even to receive the words of 
older private individuals as ambassadors? Doing battle and controlling 
things themselves, won’t they call reverence foolishness and moderation 4 
cowardice, abusing them and casting them out beyond the frontiers like 
disenfranchised exiles? And won’t they persuade the young man that 
measured and orderly expenditure is boorish and mean, and, joining with 
many useless desires, won’t they expel it across the border? 

They certainly will. 

Having thus emptied and purged these from the soul of the one they’ve 
possessed and initiated in splendid rites, they proceed to return insolence, 
anarchy, extravagance, and shamelessness from exile in a blaze of torch- e 
light, wreathing them in garlands and accompanying them with a vast 
chorus of followers. They praise the returning exiles and give them fine 
names, calling insolence good breeding, anarchy freedom, extravagance 
magnificence, and shamelessness courage. Isn’t it in some such way as 
this that someone who is young changes, after being brought up with 
necessary desires, to the liberation and release of useless and unnecessary 567 
pleasures? 

Yes, that’s clearly the way it happens. 

And I suppose that after that he spends as much money, effort, and 
time on unnecessary pleasures as on necessary ones. If he’s lucky, and his 
frenzy doesn’t go too far, when he grows older, and the great tumult within 
him has spent itself, he welcomes back some of the exiles, ceases to 
surrender himself completely to the newcomers, and puts his pleasures #2 
on an equal footing. And so he lives, always surrendering rule over himself 
to whichever desire comes along, as if it were chosen by lot.” And when 
that is satisfied, he surrenders the rule to another, not disdaining any but 
satisfying them all equally. 

That’s right. 

And he doesn’t admit any word of truth into the guardhouse, for if 
someone tells him that some pleasures belong to fine and good desires 
and others to evil ones and that he must pursue and value the former and с 
restrain and enslave the latter, he denies all this and declares that all 
pleasures are equal and must be valued equally. 


21. Many public officials were elected by lot in Athens. Socrates seems to have been 
opposed to this practice. See Aristotle, Rhetoric 1393Ь5-9 and Xenophon, Memorabilia 


Lii.9-10. 


562 


232 ADEIMANTUS/SOCRATES 


That’s just what someone in that condition would do. 

And so he lives on, yielding day by day to the desire at hand. Sometimes 
he drinks heavily while listening to the flute; at other times, he drinks only 
water and is on a diet; sometimes he goes in for physical training; at other 
times, he’s idle and neglects everything; and sometimes he even occupies 
himself with what he takes to be philosophy. He often engages in politics, 
leaping up from his seat and saying and doing whatever comes into his 
mind. If he happens to admire soldiers, he’s carried in that direction, if 
money-makers, in that one. There’s neither order nor necessity in his life, 
but he calls it pleasant, free, and blessedly happy, and he follows it for as 
long as he lives. 

You’ve perfectly described the life of a man who believes in legal 
equality. 

I also suppose that he’s a complex man, full of all sorts of characters, 
fine and multicolored, just like the democratic city, and that many men 
and women might envy his life, since it contains the most models of 
constitutions and ways of living. 

That’s right. 

Then shall we set this man beside democracy as one who is rightly 
called democratic? 

Let’s do so. 

The finest constitution and the finest man remain for us to discuss, 
namely, tyranny and a tyrannical man. 

They certainly do. 

Come, then, how does tyranny come into being? It’s fairly clear that it 
evolves from democracy. 

It is. 

And doesn’t it evolve from democracy in much the same way that 
democracy does from oligarchy? 

What way is that? 

The good that oligarchy puts before itself and because of which it is 
established is wealth, isn’t it? 

Yes. 

And its insatiable desire for wealth and its neglect of other things for 
the sake of money-making is what destroyed it, isn’t it? 

That’s true. 

And isn’t democracy’s insatiable desire for what it defines as the good 
also what destroys it? 

What do you think it defines as the good? 

Freedom: Surely you’d hear a democratic city say that this is the finest 
thing it has, so that as a result it is the only city worth living in for someone 
who is by nature free. 


BOOK уш 561с-563с 233 


Yes, you often hear that. 

Then, as I was about to say, doesn’t the insatiable desire for freedom 
and the neglect of other things change this constitution and put it in need 
of a dictatorship? 

In what way? 

I suppose that, when a democratic city, athirst for freedom, happens to 
get bad cupbearers for its leaders, so that it gets drunk by drinking more 
than it should of the unmixed wine of freedom,” then, unless the rulers 4 
are very pliable and provide plenty of that freedom, they are punished by 
the city and accused of being accursed oligarchs. 

Yes, that is what it does. 

It insults those who obey the rulers as willing slaves and good-for- 
nothings and praises and honors, both in public and in private, rulers who 
behave like subjects and subjects who behave like rulers. And isn’t it 
inevitable that freedom should go to all lengths in such a city? е 

Of course. 

It makes its way into private households and in the end breeds anarchy 
even among the animals. 

What do you mean? 

I mean that a father accustoms himself to behave like a child and fear 
his sons, while the son behaves like a father, feeling neither shame nor 
fear in front of his parents, in order to be free. A resident alien or a foreign 
visitor is made equal to a citizen, and he is their equal. 563 

Yes, that is what happens. 

It does. And so do other little things of the same sort. A teacher in such 
a community is afraid of his students and flatters them, while the students 
despise their teachers or tutors. And, in general, the young imitate their 
elders and compete with them in word and deed, while the old stoop to 
the level of the young and are full of play and pleasantry, imitating the 
young for fear of appearing disagreeable and authoritarian. b 

Absolutely. 

The utmost freedom for the majority is reached in such a city when 
bought slaves, both male and female, are no less free than those who 
bought them. And I almost forgot to mention the extent of the legal 
equality of men and women and of the freedom in the relations between 
them. 

What about the animals? Are we, with Aeschylus, going to “say whatever 
it was that came to our lips just now” about them?” С 

Certainly. I put it this way: No опе who hasn’t experienced it would 


22. The Greeks drank their wine mixed with water. 
23. We no longer possess the play from which this fragment comes. 


234 SOCRATES/ АрЕІМАМТЦ8 


believe how much freer domestic animals аге іп а democratic city than 

anywhere else. As the proverb says, dogs become like their mistresses; 

horses and donkeys are accustomed to roam freely and proudly along the 

streets, bumping into anyone who doesn’t get out of their way; and all the 
d rest are equally full of freedom. 

You're telling me what I already know. I’ve often experienced that sort 
of thing while travelling in the country. 

To sum up: Do you notice how all these things together make the 
citizens’ souls so sensitive that, if anyone even puts upon himself the least 
degree of slavery, they become angry and cannot endure it. And in the 
end, as you know, they take no notice of the laws, whether written or 

e unwritten, in order to avoid having апу master at all. 

I certainly do. 

This, then, is the fine and impetuous origin from which tyranny seems 
to me to evolve. 

It is certainly impetuous. But what comes next? 

The same disease that developed in oligarchy and destroyed it also 
develops here, but it is more widespread and virulent because of the 
general permissiveness, and it eventually enslaves democracy. In fact, 
excessive action in one direction usually sets up a reaction in the opposite 
direction. This happens in seasons, in plants, in bodies, and, last but not 

564 least, in constitutions. 

That’s to be expected. 

Extreme freedom can’t be expected to lead to anything but a change to 
extreme slavery, whether for a private individual or for a city. 

No, it can’t. 

Then I don’t suppose that tyranny evolves from any constitution other 
than democracy—the most severe and cruel slavery from the utmost 
freedom. 

Yes, that’s reasonable. 

But I don’t think that was your question. You asked what was the disease 

b that developed in oligarchy and also in democracy, enslaving it. 

That’s true. 

And what I had in mind as an answer was that class of idle and 
extravagant men, whose bravest members are leaders and the more cow- 
ardly ones followers. We compared them to stinged and stingless drones, 
respectively. 

That’s right. 

Now, these two groups cause problems in any constitution, just as 
phlegm and bile do in the body. And it’s against them that the good doctor 

с апа lawgiver of a city must take advance precautions, first, to prevent their 
presence and, second, to cut them out of the hive as quickly as possible, 
cells and all, if they should happen to be present. 


BOOK ҮШ 563c-565b 235 


Yes, by god, he must cut them out altogether. 

Then let’s take up the question in the following way, so that we can see 
what we want more clearly. 

In what way? 

Let’s divide a democratic city into three parts in theory, this being the 
way that it is in fact divided. One part is this class of idlers, that grows 
here no less than in an oligarchy, because of the general permissiveness. 4 

So it does. 

But it is far fiercer in democracy than in the other. 

How so? 

In an oligarchy it is fierce because it’s disdained, but since itis prevented 
from having a share in ruling, it doesn’t get any exercise and doesn’t 
become vigorous. In a democracy, however, with a few exceptions, this 
class is the dominant one. Its fiercest members do all the talking and 
acting, while the rest settle near the speaker’s platform and buzz and 
refuse to tolerate the opposition of another speaker, so that, under a 
democratic constitution, with the few exceptions I referred to before, this 
class manages everything. е 

That’s right. 

Then there’s a second class that always distinguishes itself from the 
majority of people. 

Which is that? 

When everybody is trying to make money, those who are naturally most 
organized generally become the wealthiest. 

Probably so. 

Then they would provide the most honey for the drones and the honey 
that is most easily extractable by them. 

Yes, for how could anyone extract it from those who have very little? 

Then I suppose that these rich people are called drone-fodder. 

Something like that. 

The people—those who work with their own hands—are the third class. 565 
They take no part in politics and have few possessions, but, when they are 
assembled, they are the largest and most powerful class in a democracy. 

They are. But they aren’t willing to assemble often unless they get a 
share of the honey. 

And they always do get a share, though the leaders, in taking the wealth 
of the rich and distributing it to the people, keep the greater part for 
themselves. 

Yes, that is the way the people get their share. b 

And I suppose that those whose wealth is taken away are compelled to 
defend themselves by speaking before the people and doing whatever else 
they can. 

Of course. 


566 


236 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


And they’re accused by the drones of plotting against the people and of 
being oligarchs, even if they have no desire for revolution at all. 

That’s right. 

So in the end, when they see the people trying to harm them, they truly 
do become oligarchs and embrace oligarchy’s evils, whether they want to 
or not. But neither group does these things willingly. Rather the people 
act as they do because they are ignorant and are deceived by the drones, 
and the rich act as they do because they are driven to it by the stinging of 
those same drones. 

Absolutely. 

And then there are impeachments, judgments, and trials on both sides. 

That’s right. 

Now, aren’t the people always in the habit of setting up one man as 
their special champion, nurturing him and making him great? 

They are. 

And it’s clear that, when a tyrant arises, this special leadership is the 
sole root from which he sprouts. 

It is. 

What is the beginning of the transformation from leader of the people 
to tyrant? Isn’t it clear that it happens when the leader begins to behave 
like the man in the story told about the temple of ће Lycaean Zeus” in 
Arcadia? 

What story is that? 

That anyone who tastes the one piece of human innards that’s chopped 
up with those of other sacrificial victims must inevitably become a wolf. 
Haven’t you heard that story? 

I have. 

Then doesn’t the same happen with a leader of the people who domi- 
nates a docile mob and doesn’t restrain himself from spilling kindred 
blood? He brings someone to trial on false charges and murders him (as 
tyrants so often do), and, by thus blotting out a human life, his impious 
tongue and lips taste kindred citizen blood. He banishes some, kills others, 
and drops hints to the people about the cancellation of debts and the 
redistribution of land. And because of these things, isn’t a man like that 
inevitably fated either to be killed by his enemies or to be transformed 
from a man into a wolf by becoming a tyrant? 

It’s completely inevitable. 


He’s the one who stirs up civil wars against the rich. 
He is. p 


24. Zeus the wolf-god. 


BOOK уш 565b-566e 237 


And if he’s exiled but manages, despite his enemies, to return, doesn’t 
he come back as a full-fledged tyrant?” 

Clearly. 

And if these enemies are unable to expel him or to put him to death by 
accusing him before the city, they plot secretly to kill him. 

That’s usually what happens at least. 

And all who’ve reached this stage soon discover the famous request of 
the tyrant, namely, that the people give him a bodyguard to keep their 
defender safe for them. 

That’s right. 

And the people give it to him, I suppose, because they are afraid for his 
safety but aren’t worried at all about their own. 

That’s right. 

And when a wealthy man sees this and is charged with being an enemy 
of the people because of his wealth, then, as the oracle to Croesus put it, 
he 


Flees to the banks of the many-pebbled Hermus, 
Neither staying put nor being ashamed of his cowardice.” 


He wouldn’t get a second chance of being ashamed. 

That’s true, for if he was caught, he’d be executed. 

He most certainly would. 

But, as for the leader, he doesn’t lie on the ground “mighty in his 
might,””’ but, having brought down many others, he stands in the city’s 
chariot, a complete tyrant rather than a leader. 

What else? 

Then let’s describe the happiness of this man and of the city in which 
a mortal like him comes to be. 

Certainly, let’s do so. 

During the first days of his reign and for some time after, won’t he 
smile in welcome at anyone he meets, saying that he’s no tyrant, making 
all sorts of promises both in public and in private, freeing the people from 
debt, redistributing the land to them and to his followers, and pretending 
to be gracious and gentle to all? 

He’d have to. 


25. Plato seems to be alluding to the tyrant Peisistratus. In 560 B.c. he made himself 
tyrant with the help of a bodyguard granted to him by the Athenian people. After five 
years, he was expelled. Eventually he returned to Athens and used mercenaries to 
establish himself firmly as tyrant. He died in 527. See Herodotus 1.59-64. 

26. The story of the Delphic oracle to Croesus is found in Herodotus 1.55. 


27. See Шай 16.776. 


238 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


But I suppose that, when he has dealt with his exiled enemies by making 
peace with some and destroying others, so that all is quiet on that front, 
the first thing he does is to stir up a war, so that the people will continue 
to feel the need of a leader. 

Probably so. 

But also so that they’ll become poor through having to pay war taxes, 

567 for that way they’ll have to concern themselves with their daily needs and 
be less likely to plot against him. 

Clearly. 

Besides, if he suspects some people of having thoughts of freedom and 
of not favoring his rule, can’t he find a pretext for putting them at the 
mercy of the enemy in order to destroy them? And for all these reasons, 
isn’t it necessary for a tyrant to be always stirring up war? 

It is. 

b And because of this, isn’t he all the more readily hated by the citizens? 

Of course. 

Moreover, don’t the bravest of those who helped to establish his tyranny 
and who hold positions of power within it speak freely to each other and 
to him, criticizing what’s happening? 

They probably do. 

Then the tyrant will have to do away with all of them if he intends to 
rule, until he’s left with neither friend nor enemy of any worth. 

Clearly. 

He must, therefore, keep a sharp lookout for anyone who is brave, 
large-minded, knowledgeable, or rich. And so happy is he that he must 

с Бе the enemy of them all, whether he wants to be or not, and plot against 
them until he has purged them from the city. 

That’s a fine sort of purge! 

Yes, for it’s the opposite of the one that doctors perform on the body. 
They draw off the worst and leave the best, but he does just the opposite. 

Yet I expect he’ll have to do this, if he’s really going to rule. 

d It’s a blessedly happy necessity he’s bound by, since it requires him 
either to live with the inferior majority, even though they hate him, or not 
to live at all. 

Yet that’s exactly his condition. 

And won’t he need a larger and more loyal bodyguard, the more his 
actions make the citizens hate him? 

Of course. 

And who will these trustworthy people be? And where will he get them 
from? 

They'll come swarming of their own accord, if he pays them. 

Drones, by the dog! All manner of foreign drones! That’s what I think 

e you're talking about. 


BOOK Vill 566e-568d 239 


You’re right. 

But what about in the city itself? Wouldn’t he be willing . . . 

Willing to what? 

To deprive citizens of their slaves by freeing them and enlisting them 
in his bodyguard? 

He certainly would, since they’d be likely to prove most loyal to him. 

What a blessedly happy sort of fellow you make the tyrant out to be, if 
these are the sort of people he employs as friends and loyal followers after 
he’s done away with the earlier ones. 

Nonetheless, they’re the sort he employs. 

And these companions and new citizens admire and associate with him, 
while the decent people hate and avoid him. 

Of course. 

It isn’t for nothing, then, that tragedy in general has the reputation of 
being wise and that Euripides is thought to be outstandingly so. 

Why’s that? 

Because among other shrewd things he said that “tyrants are wise who 
associate with the wise.” And by “the wise” he clearly means the sort of 
people that we’ve seen to be the tyrant’s associates.”* 

Yes. And he and the other poets eulogize tyranny as godlike and say 
lots of other such things about it. 

Then, surely, since the tragic poets are wise, they'll forgive us and those 
whose constitutions resemble ours, if we don’t admit them into our city, 
since they praise tyranny. 

I suppose that the more sophisticated among them will. 

And so I suppose that they go around to other cities, draw crowds, hire 
people with fine, big, persuasive voices, and lead their constitutions to 
tyranny and democracy. 

They do indeed. 

And besides this, they receive wages and honors, especially—as one 
might expect—from the tyrants and, in second place, from the democra- 
cies, but the higher they go on the ascending scale of constitutions, the 
more their honor falls off, as if unable to keep up with them for lack of 
breath. 

Absolutely. 

But we digress. So let’s return to that fine, numerous, diverse, and ever- 
changing bodyguard of the tyrant and explain how he’ll pay for it. 

Clearly, if there are sacred treasuries in the city, he’ll use them for as 


28. The fragment is from an unknown play. Euripides meant that tyrants gain wisdom 
from the wise people who, as Simonides said, “knock at the doors of the rich” (see 
489b). But Plato twists his words to mean that the drones and slaves, who are the 
tyrant’s last resort, must be deemed wise, since they associate with him. 


568 


d 


240 ADEIMANTUS/SOCRATES 


long as they last, as well as the property of the people he has destroyed, 
thus requiring smaller taxes from the people. 
е What about when these give out? 

Clearly, both he and his fellow revellers—his companions, male or 
female—will have to feed off his father’s estate. 

І understand. You mean that the people, who fathered the tyrant, will 
have to feed him and his companions. 

They'll be forced to do so. 

And what would you have to say about this? What if the people get angry 
and say, first, that it isn’t just for a grown-up son to be fed by his father 
but, on the contrary, for the father to be fed by his son; second, that they 
didn’t father him and establish him in power so that, when he’d become 

569 strong, they’d be enslaved to their own slave and have to feed both him 
and his slaves, along with other assorted rabble, but because they hoped 
that, with him as their leader, they'd be free from the rich and the so- 
called fine and good people in the city; third, that they therefore order 
him and his companions to leave the city, just as a father might drive a 
son and his troublesome fellow revellers from his house? 

Then, by god, the people will come to know what kind of creature they 
have fathered, welcomed, and made strong and that they are the weaker 

b trying to drive out the stronger. 

What do you mean? Will the tyrant dare to use violence against his 
father or to hit him if he doesn’t obey? 

Yes—once he’s taken away his father’s weapons. 

You mean that the tyrant is a parricide and a harsh nurse of old age, 
that his rule has become an acknowledged tyranny at last, and that—as 
the saying goes—by trying to avoid the frying pan of enslavement to free 
men, the people have fallen into the fire of having slaves as their masters, 

с апа that in the place of the great but inappropriate freedom they enjoyed 
under democracy, they have put upon themselves the harshest and most 
bitter slavery to slaves. 

That’s exactly what I mean. 

Well, then, aren’t we justified in saying that we have adequately de- 
scribed how tyranny evolves from democracy and what it’s like when it 
has come into being? 

We certainly are, he said. 


Воок ІХ 


Book VIII ended with the description of tyranny. Book IX begins with a long and 
brilliant description of the tyrannical person himself, notable for its psychological 
realism and insight. When it is complete, Socrates is ready to respond to the 
challenge Glaucon raised іп Book П. s 

His response consists of three complex arguments. The first appeals to the 
foregoing description of the five cities and the five character types. It concludes 
that a philosopher-king is the happiest and most just of people, a timocrat is 
second in virtue and happiness, an oligarch third, a democrat fourth, and a tyrant 
fifth, the most unjust апа most wretched of all (580а-с). 

The second argument (580d-583b) appeals to the tripartition of the soul. In 
it Socrates argues that а philosopher’s assessment of the relative pleasaniness of 
his life and those of money-lovers and honor-lovers is more reliable than their 
assessments of the relative pleasantness of his life and theirs. 

The third argument (583%-588а), described by Socrates as “the greatest and 
most decisive of the overthrows,” 15 also the most complex. It uses the metaphysical 
theory developed in Books V—VII, together with the psychological theory of Book 
IV, to develop a complex theory of pleasure. It concludes that a philosopher's 
pleasures are truer and purer than those of a money-lover or honor-lover. 

The book ends with a powerful image of what the soul of an unjust person 15 
like. 


It remains, I said, to consider the tyrannical man himself, how he evolves 
from a democrat, what he is like when һе has come into being, and whether 577 
he is wretched or blessedly happy. 

Yes, he said, he is the one who is still missing. 

And do you know what else І think is still missing? 

What? 

I don’t think we have adequately distinguished the kinds and numbers 
of our desires, and, if that subject isn’t adequately dealt with, our entire 
investigation will be less clear. b 

Well, isn’t now as fine a time as any to discuss the matter? 

It certainly is. Consider, then, what I want to know about our desires. 
It’s this: Some of our unnecessary pleasures and desires seem to me to be 


241 


272 


242 SOCRATES/ ADEIMANTUS 


lawless. They are probably present in everyone, but they are held in check 
by the laws and by the better desires in alliance with reason. In a few 
people, they have been eliminated entirely or only a few weak ones remain, 
while in others they are stronger and more numerous. 

What desires do you mean? 

Those that are awakened in sleep, when the rest of the soul—the 
rational, gentle, and ruling part—slumbers. Then the beastly and savage 
part, full of food and drink, casts off sleep and seeks to find a way to gratify 
itself. You know that there is nothing it won’t dare to do at such a time, 
free of all control by shame or reason. It doesn’t shrink from trying to 
have sex with a mother, as it supposes, or with anyone else at all, whether 
man, god, or beast. It will commit any foul murder, and there is no food 
it refuses to eat. In a word, it omits no act of folly or shamelessness. 

That’s completely true. 

On the other hand, I suppose that someone who is healthy and moderate 
with himself goes to sleep only after having done the following: First, he 
rouses his rational part and feasts it on fine arguments and speculations; 
second, he neither starves nor feasts his appetites, so that they will slumber 
and not disturb his best part with either their pleasure or their pain, but 
they’ll leave it alone, pure and by itself, to get on with its investigations, to 
yearn after and perceive something, it knows not what,’ whether it is past, 
present, or future; third, he soothes his spirited part in the same way, for 
example, by not falling asleep with his spirit still aroused after an outburst 
of anger. And when he has quieted these two parts and aroused the third, in 
which reason resides, and so takes his rest, you know that it is then that he 
best grasps the truth and that the visions that appear in his dreams are least 
lawless. 

Entirely so. 

However, we’ve been carried away from what we wanted to establish, 
which is this: Our dreams make it clear that there is a dangerous, wild, 
and lawless form of desire in everyone, even in those of us who seem to 
be entirely moderate or measured. See whether you think I’m talking 
sense and whether or not you agree with me. 

I do agree. 

Recall, then, what we said a democratic man is like. He was produced 
by being brought up from youth by a thrifty father who valued only those 
desires that make money and who despised the unnecessary ones that aim 
at frivolity and display. Isn’t that right? 

Yes. = 

And by associating with more sophisticated men, who are full of the 
latter desires, he starts to indulge in every kind of insolence and to adopt 


1. Reading skopein kai oregesthai tou kai aisthanesthai ho те oiden. 


BOOK IX 571b-573c 243 


their form of behavior, because of his hatred of his father’s thrift. But, 
because he has a better nature than his corrupters, he is pulled in both 
directions and settles down in the middle between his father’s way of life 
and theirs. And enjoying each in moderation, as he supposes, he leads a 
life that is neither slavish nor lawless and from having been oligarchic he 
becomes democratic. 

That was and is our opinion about this type of man. 

Suppose now that this man has in turn become older and that he has a 
son who is brought up in Ais father’s ethos. 

All right. 

And further suppose that the same things that happened to his father 
now happen to him. First, he is led to all the kinds of lawlessness that 
those who are leading him call freedom. Then his father and the rest of 
the household come to the aid of the middle desires, while the others help 
the other ones. Then, when those clever enchanters and tyrant-makers 
have no hope of keeping hold of the young man in any other way, they 
contrive to plant in him a powerful erotic love, like a great winged drone, 
to be the leader of those idle desires that spend whatever is at hand. Or 
do you think that erotic love is anything other than an enormous drone in 
such people? 

I don’t think that it could be anything else. 

And when the other desires—filled with incense, myrrh, wreaths, wine, 
and the other pleasures found in their company—buzz around the drone, 
nurturing it and making it grow as large as possible, they plant the sting 
of longing in it. Then this leader of the soul adopts madness as its 
bodyguard and becomes frenzied. If it finds any beliefs or desires in the 
man that are thought to be good or that still have some shame, it destroys 
them and throws them out, until it’s purged him of moderation and filled 
him with imported madness. 

You’ve perfectly described the evolution of a tyrannical man. 

Is this the reason that erotic love has long been called a tyrant? 

It looks that way. 

Then doesn’t a drunken man have something of a tyrannical mind? 

Yes, he has. 

And a man who is mad and deranged attempts to rule not just human 
beings, but gods as well, and expects that he will be able to succeed. 

He certainly does. 

Then a man becomes tyrannical in the precise sense of the term when 
either his nature or his way of life or both of them together make him 
drunk, filled with erotic desire, and mad. 

Absolutely. i 

This, then, it seems, is how a tyrannical man comes to be. But what 
way does he live? 


е 


273 


244 ADEIMANTUS/SOCRATES 


d No doubt you’re going to tell me, just as posers of riddles usually do. 

I am. I think that someone in whom the tyrant of erotic love dwells and 
in whom it directs everything next goes in for feasts, revelries, luxuries, 
girlfriends, and all that sort of thing. 

Necessarily. 

And don’t many terrible desires grow up day and night beside the 
tyrannical one, needing many things to satisfy them? 

Indeed they do. 

Hence any income someone like that has is soon spent. 

Of course. 

е Then borrowing follows, and expenditure of capital. 

What else? 

And when everything is gone, won’t the violent crowd of desires that 
has nested within him inevitably shout in protest? And driven by the stings 
of the other desires and especially by erotic love itself (which leads all of 
them as its bodyguard), won’t he become frenzied and look to see who 

574 possesses anything that he could take, by either deceit or force? 

He certainly will. 

Consequently, he must acquire wealth from every source or live in great 
pain and suffering. 

He must. 

And just as the pleasures that are latecomers outdo the older ones and 
steal away their satisfactions, won’t the man himself think that he deserves 
to outdo’ his father and mother, even though he is younger than they 
are—to take and spend his father’s wealth when he’s spent his own share? 

Of course. 

And if they won’t give it to him, won’t he first try to steal it from them 

b Бу deceitful means? 

Certainly. 

And if that doesn’t work, wouldn’t he seize it by force? 

I suppose so. 

And if the old man and woman put up a fight, would he be careful to 
refrain from acting like a tyrant? 

Pm not very optimistic about their fate, if they do. 

But, good god, Adeimantus, do you think he’d sacrifice his long-loved 
and irreplaceable mother for a recently acquired girlfriend whom he can 
do without? Or that for the sake of a newfound and replaceable boyfriend 

с іп the bloom of youth, he’d strike his aged and irreplaceable father, his 
oldest friend? Or that he’d make his parents the slaves of these others, if 
he brought them under the same roof? 

Yes, indeed he would. 


2. pleon echein. See 343е n. 18. 


BOOK IX 5734-575с 245 


It seems to be a very great blessing to produce a tyrannical son! 

It certainly does! 

What about when the possessions of his father and mother give out? 
With that great swarm of pleasures inside him, won’t he first try to break 
into someone’s house or snatch someone’s coat late at night? Then won’t 
he try to loot a temple? And in all this, the old traditional opinions that he 
had held from childhood about what is fine or shameful—opinions that 
are accounted just—are overcome by the opinions, newly released from 
slavery, that are now the bodyguard of erotic love and hold sway along 
with it.” When he himself was subject to the laws and his father and had 
a democratic constitution within him, these opinions used only to be 
freed in sleep. Now, however, under the tyranny of erotic love, he has 
permanently become while awake what he used to become occasionally 
while asleep, and he won’t hold back from any terrible murder or from 
any kind of food or act. But, rather, erotic love lives like a tyrant within 
him, in complete anarchy and lawlessness as his sole ruler, and drives 
him, as if he were a city, to dare anything that will provide sustenance for 
itself and the unruly mob around it (some of whose members have come 
in from the outside as a result of his keeping bad company, while others 
have come from within, freed and let loose by his own bad habits). Isn’t 
this the life that a tyrannical man leads? 

It is indeed. 

Now, if there are only a few such men in a city, and the rest of the 
people are moderate, this mob will leave the city in order to act as a 
bodyguard to some other tyrant or to serve as mercenaries if there happens 
to be a war going on somewhere. But if they chance to live in a time of 
peace and quiet, they’ll remain in the city and bring about lots of little 
evils. 

What sort of evils do you mean? 

They steal, break into houses, snatch purses, steal clothes, rob temples, 
and sell people into slavery. Sometimes, if they are good speakers, they 
become sycophants and bear false witness and accept bribes.’ 

These evils are small, provided that there happen to be only a few such 
people. 

Yes, for small things are small by comparison to big ones. And when it 
comes to producing wickedness and misery in a city, all these evils together 


3. See 538c ff. 

4. Athens had nothing corresponding to our public prosecutors. By and large, private 
citizens prosecuted each other., By the middle of the fifth century, some people began 
to make a profession of prosecuting others for financial, political, or personal reasons. 
These people were called sycophants. A vivid sense of their power and importance is 
conveyed in L. B. Carter, The Quiet Athenian (Oxford: Clarendon Press, 1986). 


IIS 


246 SocrRATES/ADEIMANTUS/GLAUCON 


don’t, as the saying goes, come within a mile of the rule of a tyrant. But 

when such people become numerous and conscious of their numbers, it 

is they—aided by the foolishness of the people—who create a tyrant. And 

he, more than any of them, has in his soul the greatest and strongest tyrant 
d ofall. 

Naturally, for he’d be the most tyrannical. 

That’s if the city happens to yield willingly, but if it resists him, then, 
just as he once chastised his mother and father, he’ll now chastise his 
fatherland, if he can, by bringing in new friends and making his fatherland 
and his dear old motherland (as the Cretans call it) their slaves and keeping 
them that way, for this is surely the end at which such a man’s desires are 
directed. 

е It most certainly is. 

Now, in private life, before a tyrannical man attains power, isn’t he this 
sort of person—one who associates primarily with flatterers who are ready 
to obey him in everything? Or if he himself happens to need anything from 
other people, isn’t he willing to fawn on them and make every gesture of 
friendship, as if he were dealing with his own family? But once he gets 

576 what he wants, don’t they become strangers again? 

Yes, they certainly do. 

So someone with a tyrannical nature lives his whole life without being 
friends with anyone, always a master to one man or a slave to another and 
never getting a taste of either freedom or true friendship. 

That’s right. 

Wouldn’t we be right to call someone like that untrustworthy? 

Of course. 

And isn’t he as unjust as anyone can be? If indeed what we earlier 

b agreed about justice was right. 

And it certainly was right. 

Then, let’s sum up the worst type of man: His waking life is like the 
nightmare we described earlier.” 

That’s right. 

And he evolves from someone by nature most tyrannical who achieves 
sole rule. And the longer he remains tyrant, the more like the nightmare 
he becomes. 

That’s inevitable, said Glaucon, taking over the argument. 

Well, then, І said, isn’t the man who is clearly most vicious also clearly 
most wretched? And isn’t the one who for the longest time is most of all 

c  atyrant, most wretched for the longest time? If, that is to say, truth rather 
than majority opinion is to settle these questions. 


5. See 571c—d. 


воокіх 575с-577с 247 


That much is certain, at any rate. 

And isn’t a tyrannical man like a city ruled by a tyrant, a democratic 
man like a city ruled by a democracy, and similarly with the others? 

Of course. 

And won’t the relations between the cities with respect to virtue and 
happiness be the same as those between the men? 

Certainly. 

Then how does the city ruled by a tyrant compare to the city ruled by 
kings that we described first? 

They are total opposites: one is the best, and the other the worst. 

I won’t ask you which is which, since it’s obvious. But is your judgment 
the same with regard to their happiness and wretchedness? And let’s not 
be dazzled by looking at one man—a tyrant—or at the few who surround 
him, but since it is essential to go into the city and study the whole of it, 
let’s not give our opinion, till we’ve gone down and looked into every 
corner. 

That’s right, for it’s clear to everyone that there is no city more wretched 
than one ruled by a tyrant and none more happy than one ruled by kings. 

Would Í be right, then, to make the same challenge about the individuals, 
assuming, first, that the person who is fit to judge them is someone who in 
thought can go down into a person’s character and examine it thoroughly, 
someone who doesn’t judge from outside, the way a child does, who is 
dazzled by the facade that tyrants adopt for the outside world to see, but 
is able to see right through that sort of thing? And, second, that he’s 
someone—since we'd all listen to him if he were—who is competent to 
judge, because he has lived in the same house with a tyrant and witnessed 
his behavior at home and his treatment of each member of his household 
when he is stripped of his theatrical façade, and has also seen how he 
behaves when in danger from the people? Shouldn’t we ask the person 
who has seen all that to tell us how the tyrant compares to the others in 
happiness and wretchedness? 

That’s also right. 

Then do you want us to pretend that we are among those who can give 
such a judgment and that we have already met tyrannical people, so that 
чел have someone to answer our questions? 

I certainly do. 

Come, then, and look at it this way for me: Bearing in mind the 
resemblance between the city and the man, look at each in turn and 
describe its condition. 

What kinds of things do you want me to describe? 

First, speaking of the city, would you say that a tyrannical city is free or 
enslaved? 


ЭА 


578 


248 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


It is as enslaved as it is possible to be. 

Yet you see in it people who are masters and free. 

I do see a few like that, but the whole city, so to speak, and the most 
decent part of it are wretched, dishonored slaves. 

Then, if man and city are alike, mustn’t the same structure be in him 
too? And mustn’t his soul be full of slavery and unfreedom, with the most 
decent parts enslaved and with a small part, the maddest and most vicious, 
as their master? 

It must. 

What will you say about such a soul then? Is it free or slave? 

Slave, of course. 

And isn’t the enslaved and tyrannical city least likely to do what it wants? 

Certainly. 

Then a tyrannical soul—I’m talking about the whole soul—will also be 
least likely to do what it wants and, forcibly driven by the stings of a 
dronish gadfly, will be full of disorder and regret. 

How could it be anything else? 

Is a tyrannically ruled city rich or poor? 


Poor. 
Then a tyrannical soul, too, must always be poor and unsatisfiable. 
That’s right. 


What about fear? Aren’t a tyrannical city and man full of it? 

Absolutely. 

And do you think that you’ll find more wailing, groaning, lamenting, 
and grieving in any other city? 

Certainly not. 

Then, are such things more common in anyone besides a tyrannical 
man, who is maddened by his desires and erotic loves? 

How could they be? 

It is in view of all these things, I suppose, and others like them, that you 
judged this to be the most wretched of cities. 

And wasn’t I right? 

Of course you were. But what do you say about a tyrannical man, when 
you look at these same things? 

He’s by far the most wretched of all of them. 

There you’re no longer right. 

How is that? 

I don’t think that this man has yet reached the extreme of wretchedness. 

Then who has? я 

Perhaps you'll agree that this next case is even more wretched. 

Which one? 

The one who is tyrannical but doesn’t live a private life, because some 
misfortune provides him with the opportunity to become an actual tyrant. 


BOOK Іх 577с-579с 249 


On the basis of what was said before, I assume that what you say is true. 

Yes, but in matters of this sort, it isn’t enough just to assume these 
things; one needs to investigate carefully the two men in question by 
means of argument, for the investigation concerns the most important 
thing, namely, the good life and the bad one. 

That’s absolutely right. 

Then consider whether I’m talking sense or not, for I think our investi- 
gation will be helped by the following examples. d 

What are they? 

We should look at all the wealthy private citizens in our cities who have 
many slaves, for, like a tyrant, they rule over many, although not over so 
many as he does. 

That’s right. 

And you know that they’re secure and do not fear their slaves. 

What have they got to be afraid of? 

Nothing. And do you know why? 

Yes. It’s because the whole city is ready to defend each of its individual 
citizens. 

You're right. But what if some god were to lift one of these men, his е 
fifty or more slaves, and his wife and children out of the city and deposit 
him with his slaves and other property in a deserted place, where no free 
person could come to his assistance? How frightened would he be that he 
himself and his wife and children would be killed by the slaves? 

Very frightened indeed. 

And wouldn’t he be compelled to fawn on some of his own slaves, 
promise them lots of things, and free them, even though he didn’t want 579 
to? And wouldn’t he himself have become a panderer to slaves? 

He’d have to or else be killed. 

What if the god were to settle many other neighbors around him, who 
wouldn’t tolerate anyone to claim that he was the master of another and 
who would inflict the worst punishments on anyone they caught doing it? 

I suppose that he’d have even worse troubles, since he’d be surrounded 4 
by nothing but vigilant enemies. 

And isn’t this the kind of prison in which the tyrant is held—the one 
whose nature is such as we have described it, filled with fears and erotic 
loves of all kinds? Even though his soul is really greedy for it, he’s the only 
one in the whole city who can’t travel abroad or see the sights that other 
free people want to see. Instead, he lives like a woman, mostly confined 
to his own house, and envying any other citizen who happens to travel 
abroad and see something worthwhile. с 

That’s entirely so. 

Then, isn’t this harvest of evils a measure of the difference between a 
tyrannical man who is badly governed on the inside—whom you judged 


250 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


to be most wretched just now—and one who doesn’t live a private life but 
is compelled by some chance to be a tyrant, who tries to rule others when 
he can’t even control himself. He’s just like an exhausted body without 
any self-control, which, instead of living privately, is compelled to compete 

4 апа fight with other bodies all its life. 

Thats exactly what he’s like, Socrates, and what you say is absolutely 
true. 

And so, Glaucon, isn’t this a completely wretched condition to be in, 
and doesn’t the reigning tyrant have an even harder life than the one you 
judged to be hardest? 

He certainly does. 

In truth, then, and whatever some people may think, a real tyrant is 
really a slave, compelled to engage in the worst kind of fawning, slavery, 
and pandering to the worst kind of people. He’s so far from satisfying his 

е desires іп апу way that it is clear—if one happens to know that one must 
study his whole soul—that he’s in the greatest need of most things and 
truly poor. And, if indeed his state is like that of the city he rules, then 
he’s full of fear, convulsions, and pains throughout his life. And it is like 
it, isn’t it? 

Of course it is. 

580 Апа we'll also attribute to the man what we mentioned before, namely, 
that he is inevitably envious, untrustworthy, unjust, friendless, impious, 
host and nurse to every kind of vice, and that his ruling makes him even 
more so. And because of all these, he is extremely unfortunate and goes 
on to make those near him like himself. 

No one with any understanding could possibly contradict you. 

Come, then, and like the judge who makes the final decision,’ tell me 
who among the five—the king, the timocrat, the oligarch, the democrat, 

b and the tyrant—is first in happiness, who second, and so on in order. 

That’s easy. І rank them in virtue and vice, in happiness and its opposite, 
in the order of their appearance, as I might judge choruses. 

Shall we, then, hire a herald, or shall I myself announce that the son of 
Ariston has given as his verdict that the best, the most just, and the most 

c happy is the most kingly, who rules like a king over himself, and that the 
worst, the most unjust, and the most wretched is the most tyrannical, 
who most tyrannizes himself and the city he rules? 

Let it be so announced. 

And shall I add to the announcement that it holds, whether these things 
remain hidden from every god and human being or not? 

Add it. 


6. This probably refers to the way in which plays were judged at festivals. 


BOOK IX 579с-581с 251 


Good. Then that is one of our proofs. And there’d be a second, if you 
happen to think that there is anything in this. d 

In what? 

In the fact that the soul of each individual is divided into three parts, 
in just the way that a city is, for that’s the reason I think that there is 
another proof. 

What is it? 

This: it seems to me that there are three pleasures corresponding to 
the three parts of the soul, one peculiar to each part, and similarly with 
desires and kinds of rule. 

What do you mean? 

The first, we say, is the part with which a person learns, and the second 
the part with which he gets angry. As for the third, we had no one special 
name for it, since it’s multiform, so we named it after the biggest and 
strongest thing in it. Hence we called it ће appetitive part, because of the е 
intensity of its appetites fer food, drink, sex, and all the things associated 
with them, but we also called it the money-loving part, because such 
appetites are most easily satisfied by means of money. 581 

And rightly so. 

Then, if we said that its pleasure and love are for profit, wouldn’t that 
best determine its central feature for the purposes of our argument and 
insure that we are clear about what we mean when we speak of this part 
of the soul, and wouldn’t we be right to call it money-loving and profit- 
loving? 

That’s how it seems to me, at least. 

What about the spirited part? Don’t we say that it is wholly dedicated 
to the pursuit of control, victory, and high repute? 

Certainly. b 

Then wouldn’t it be appropriate for us to call it victory-loving and 
honor-loving? 

It would be most appropriate. 

Now, it is clear to everyone that the part with which we learn is always 
wholly straining to know where the truth lies and that, of the three parts, 
it cares least for money and reputation. 

By far the least. 

Then wouldn’t it be appropriate for us to call it learning-loving and 


philosophical? 

Of course. 

And doesn’t this part rule in some people’s souls, while one of the other 
parts—whichever it nonn to be—rules in other people’s? с 


That’s right. 
And isn’t that the reason we say that there are three primary kinds of 


people: philosophic, victory-loving, and profit-loving? 


582 


252 GLAUCON/ SOCRATES 


That’s it precisely. 

And also three forms of pleasure, one assigned to each of them? 

Certainly. 

And do you realize that, if you chose to ask three such people in turn 
to tell you which of their lives is most pleasant, each would give the highest 
praise to his own? Won’t a money-maker say that the pleasure of being 
honored and that of learning are worthless compared to that of making a 
profit, if he gets no money from them? 

He will. 

What about an honor-lover? Doesn’t he think that the pleasure of 
making money is vulgar and that the pleasure of learning—except insofar 
as it brings him honor—is smoke and nonsense? 

He does. 

And as for a philosopher, what do you suppose he thinks the other 
pleasures are worth compared to that of knowing where the truth lies and 
always being in some such pleasant condition while learning? Won’t he 
think that they are far behind? And won’t he call them really necessary, 
since he’d have no need for them if they weren’t necessary for life? 

He will: we can be sure of that. 

Then, since there’s a dispute between the different forms of pleasure 
and between the lives themselves, not about which way of living is finer 
or more shameful or better or worse, but about which is more pleasant 
and less painful, how are we to know which of them is speaking most truly? 

Don’t ask me. 

Look at it this way: How are we to judge things if we want to judge 
them well? Isn’t it by experience, reason, and argument? Or could anyone 
have better criteria than these? 

How could he? 

Consider, then: Which of the three men has most experience of the 
pleasures we mentioned? Does a profit-lover learn what the truth itself is 
like or acquire more experience of the pleasure of knowing it than a 
philosopher does of making a profit? 

There’s a big difference between them. A philosopher has of necessity 
tasted the other pleasures since childhood, but it isn’t necessary for a 
profit-lover to taste or experience the pleasure of learning the nature of 
the things that are and how sweet it is. Indeed, even if he were eager to 
taste it, he couldn’t easily do so. 

Then a philosopher is far superior to a profit-lover in his experience of 
both their pleasures. 
He certainly is. 

What about an honor-lover? Has he more experience of the pleasure of 
knowing than a philosopher has of the pleasure of being honored? 

No, for honor comes to each of them, provided that he accomplishes 


ЕН 


BOOK Іх 581с-5836 253 


his aim. A rich man is honored by many people, so is а courageous опе 
and a wise one, but the pleasure of studying the things that are cannot be 
tasted by anyone except a philosopher. 

Then, as far as experience goes, he is the finest judge of the three. 

By far. 

And he alone has gained his experience in the company of reason. 

Of course. 

Moreover, the instrument one must use to judge isn’t the instrument 
of a profit-lover or an honor-lover but a philosopher. 

What instrument is that? 

Arguments, for didn’t we say that we must judge by means of them? 

Nes 

And argument is a philosopher’s instrument most of all. 

Of course. 

Now, if wealth and profit were the best means of judging things, the 
praise and blame of a profit-lover would necessarily be truest. 

That’s right. 

And if honor, victory, and courage were the best means, wouldn’t it be 
the praise and blame of an honor-lover? 

Clearly 

But since the best means are experience, reason, and argument... 

The praise of a wisdom-lover and argument-lover is necessarily truest. 

Then, of the three pleasures, the most pleasant is that of the part of the 
soul with which we learn, and the one in whom that part rules has the 
most pleasant life. 

How could it be otherwise? A person with knowledge at least speaks 
with authority when he praises his own life. 

To what life and to what pleasure does the judge give second place? 

Clearly, he gives it to those of a warrior and honor-lover, since they’re 
closer to his own than those of a money-maker. 

Then the life and pleasure of a profit-lover come last, it seems. 

Of course they do. 

These, then, are two proofs in a row, and the just person has defeated 
the unjust one in both. The third is dedicated in Olympic fashion to 
Olympian Zeus the Savior.’ Observe then that, apart from those of a 
knowledgeable person, the other pleasures are neither entirely true nor 
pure but are like a shadow-painting, as I think I’ve heard some wise person 
say. And yet, if this were true, it would be the greatest and most decisive 
of the overthrows. 


7. The first toast at a banquet was to the Olympian Zeus, the third to Zeus the Savior. 
By combining the two aspects of Zeus in a single form of address, Plato seems to be 
emphasizing the importance of this final proof. 


583 


584 


254 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


It certainly would. But what exactly do you mean? 

РІ find out, if I ask the questions, and you answer. 

Ask, then. 

Tell me, don’t we say that pain is the opposite of pleasure? 

Certainly. 

And is there such a thing as feeling neither pleasure nor pain? 

There is. 

Isn’t it intermediate between these two, a sort of calm of the soul by 
comparison to them? Or don’t you think of it that way? 

I do. 

And do you recall what sick people say when they’re ill? 

Which saying of theirs do you have in mind? 

That nothing gives more pleasure than being healthy, but that they 
hadn’t realized that it was most pleasant until they fell ill. 

I do recall that. 

And haven’t you also heard those who are in great pain say that nothing 
is more pleasant than the cessation of their suffering? 

I have. 

And there are many similar circumstances, I suppose, in which you find 
people in pain praising, not enjoyment, but the absence of pain and relief 
from it as most pleasant. 

That may be because at such times a state of calm becomes pleasant 
enough to content them. 

And when someone ceases to feel pleasure, this calm will be painful to 
him. 

Probably so. 

Then the calm we described as being intermediate between pleasure 
and pain will sometimes be both. 

So it seems. 

Now, is it possible for that which is neither to become both? 

Not in my view. 

Moreover, the coming to be of either the pleasant or the painful in the 
soul is a sort of motion, isn’t it? 

Yes. 

And didn’t what is neither painful nor pleasant come to light just now 
as a calm State, intermediate between them? 

Yes, it did. 

Then, how can it be right to think that the absence of pain is pleasure 
or that the absence of pleasure is pain? 

There’s no way it can be. І 

Then it isn’t right. But when the calm is next to the painful it appears 
pleasant, and when it is next to the pleasant it appears painful. However, 


BOOK Іх 583b-584e 255 


there is nothing sound in these appearances as far as the truth about 
pleasure is concerned, only some kind of magic. 

That’s what the argument suggests, at any rate. 

Take a look at the pleasures that don’t come out of pains, so that you 
won’t suppose in their case also that it is the nature of pleasure to be the 
cessation of pain or of pain to be the cessation of pleasure. 

Where am I to look? What pleasures do you mean? 

The pleasures of smell are especially good examples to take note of, for 
they suddenly become very intense without being preceded by pain, and 
when they cease they leave no pain behind. But there are plenty of other 
examples as well. 

That’s absolutely true. 

Then let no one persuade us that pure pleasure is relief from pain or 
that pure pain is relief from pleasure. 

No, let’s not. 

However, most of the so-called pleasures that reach the soul through 
the body, as well as the most intense ones are of this form—they are some 
kind of relief from pain. 

Yes, they are. 

And aren’t the pleasures and pains of anticipation, which arise from the 
expectation of future pleasures or pains, also of this form? 

They are. 

Do you know what kind of thing they are and what they most resemble? 

No, what is it? 

Do you believe that there is an up, a down, and a middle in nature? 

I do. 

And do you think that someone who was brought from down below to 
the middle would have any other belief than that he was moving upward? 
And if he stood in the middle and saw where he had come from, would 
he believe that he was anywhere other than the upper region, since he 
hasn’t seen the one that is truly upper? 

By god, I don’t see how he could think anything else. 

And if he was brought back, wouldn’t he suppose that he was being 
brought down? And wouldn’t he be right? 

Of course. 

Then wouldn’t all this happen to him because he is inexperienced in 
what is really and truly up, down, and in the middle? 

Clearly. 

Is it any surprise, then, if those who are inexperienced in the truth have 
unsound opinions about lots of other things as well, or that they are so 
disposed to pleasure, pain, and the intermediate state that, when they 
descend to the painful, they believe truly and are really in pain, but that, 


256 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


585 when they ascend from the painful to the intermediate state, they firmly 
believe that they have reached fulfillment and pleasure? They are inexperi- 
enced in pleasure and so are deceived when they compare pain to pain- 
lessness, just as they would be if they compared black to grey without 
having experienced white. 

No, by god, I wouldn’t be surprised. In fact, Га be very surprised if it 
were any other way. 

b Think of it this way: Aren’t hunger, thirst, and the like some sort of 
empty states of the body? 

They are. 

And aren’t ignorance and lack of sense empty states of the soul? 

Of course. 

And wouldn’t someone who partakes of nourishment or strengthens his 
understanding be filled? 

Certainly. 

Does the truer filling up fill you with that which is less or that which is 
more? 

Clearly, it’s with that which is more. 

And which kinds partake more of pure being? Kinds of filling up such 
as filling up with bread or drink or delicacies or food in general? Or the 
kind of filling up that is with true belief, knowledge, understanding, and, 
in sum, with all of virtue? Judge it this way: That which is related to what 

с ав always the same, immortal, and true, is itself of that kind, and comes to 
Бе in something of that kind—this is more, don’t you think, than that 
which is related to what is never the same and mortal, is itself of that kind, 
and comes to be in something of that kind? 

That which is related to what is always the same is far more. 

And does the being of what is always the same participate more in being 
than in knowledge? 

Not at all. 

Or more than in truth? 

Not that either. 

And if less in truth, then less in being also? 

Necessarily. 

And isn’t it generally true that the kinds of filling up that are concerned 

d with the care of the body share less in truth and being than those concerned 
with the care of the soul? 

Yes, much less. 

And don’t you think that the same holds of the body in comparison to 
the soul? 

Certainly. 

And isn’t that which is more, and is filled with things that are more, really 
more filled than that which is less, and is filled with things that are less? 


BOOK Іх 585a-586d 257 


Of course. 

Therefore, if being filled with what is appropriate to our nature is 
pleasure, that which is more filled with things that are more enjoys more 
really and truly a more true pleasure, while that which partakes of things е 
that are less is less truly and surely filled and partakes of a less trustworthy 
and less true pleasure. 

That’s absolutely inevitable. 

Therefore, those who have no experience of reason or virtue, but are 
always occupied with feasts and the like, are brought down and then back 586 
up to the middle, as it seems, and wander in this way throughout their 
lives, never reaching beyond this to what is truly higher up, never looking 
up at it or being brought up to it, and so they aren’t filled with that which 
really is and never taste any stable or pure pleasure. Instead, they always 
look down at the ground like cattle, and, with their heads bent over the 
dinner table, they feed, fatten, and fornicate. To outdo® others in these 
things, they kick and butt them with iron horns and hooves, killing each | % 
other, because their desires are insatiable. For the part that they’re trying 
to fill is like a vessel full of holes, and neither it nor the things they are 
trying to fill it with are among the things that are. 

Socrates, you’ve exactly described the life of the majority of people, just 
like an oracle. 

Then isn’t it necessary for these people to live with pleasures that are 
mixed with pains, mere images and shadow-paintings of true pleasures? 
And doesn’t the juxtaposition of these pleasures and pains make them 
appear intense, so that they give rise to mad erotic passions іп the foolish, с 
and are fought over in just the way that Stesichorus tells us the phantom 
of Helen was fought over at Troy by men ignorant of the truth?” 

Something like that must be what happens. 

And what about the spirited part? Mustn’t similar things happen to 
someone who satisfies it? Doesn’t his love of honor make him envious and 
his love of victory make him violent, so that he pursues the satisfaction of 
his anger and of his desires for honors and victories without calculation 4 
or understanding? 

Such things must happen to him as well. 

Then can’t we confidently assert that those desires of even the money- 
loving and honor-loving parts that follow knowledge and argument and pur- 
sue with their help those pleasures that reason approves will attain the truest 


8. Pleonexias. See 343е п. 18. 

9. According to the story, Stesichorus wrote a poem defaming Helen and was pun- 
ished by being struck with blindness. His sight was restored when he added a verse to 
the poem in which he claimed that it was a phantom of Helen and not Helen herself 
who was at Troy. See Phaedrus 243a. 


258 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


pleasures possible for them, because they follow truth, and the ones that are 
e most their own, if indeed what is best for each thing is most its own? 

And indeed it is best. 

Therefore, when the entire soul follows the philosophic part, and there 
is no civil war in it, each part of it does its own work exclusively and is 
just, and in particular it enjoys its own pleasures, the best and truest 

587 pleasures possible for it. 

Absolutely. 

But when one of the other parts gains control, it won’t be able to secure 
its own pleasure and will compel the other parts to pursue an alien and 
untrue pleasure. 

That’s right. 

And aren’t the parts that are most distant from philosophy and reason 
the ones most likely to do this sort of compelling? 

They’re much more likely. 

And isn’t whatever is most distant from reason also most distant from 
law and order? 

Clearly. 

And didn’t the erotic and tyrannical desires emerge as most distant 

b from these things? 

By far. 

And weren’t the kingly and orderly ones least distant? 

Yes. 

Then І suppose that a tyrant will be most distant from a pleasure that 
is both true and his own and that a king will be least distant. 

Necessarily. 

So a tyrant will live most unpleasantly, and a king most pleasantly. 

Necessarily. 

Do you know how much more unpleasant a tyrant’s life is than a king’s? 

I will if you tell me. 

There are, it seems, three pleasures, one genuine and two illegitimate, 
and a tyrant is at the extreme end of the illegitimate ones, since he flees 

с both law and reason and lives with a bodyguard of certain slavish pleasures. 
But it isn’t easy, all the same, to say just how inferior he is to a king, except 
perhaps as follows. A tyrant is somehow third from an oligarch, for a 
democrat was between them. 

Yes. 

Then, if what we said before is true, doesn’t he live with an image of 
pleasure that is third from ап oligarch’s with respect to truth?! 


10. Third because the Greeks always counted the first as well as the last member of 
a series, e.g. the day after tomorrow was the third day. 


BOOK Ix 5864-5886 259 


He does. 
Now, an oligarch, in turn, is third from a king," if we identify a king 
and an aristocrat. d 
Yes, he’s third. 
So a tyrant is three times three times removed from true pleasure. 
Apparently so. 
It seems then, on the basis of the magnitude of its number, that the 
image of tyrannical pleasure is a plane figure. 
Exactly. 
But then it’s clear that, by squaring and cubing it, we’ll discover how 
far a tyrant’s pleasure is from that of a king. 
It is clear to a mathematician, at any rate. 
Then, turning it the other way around, if someone wants to say how far 
a king’s pleasure is from a tyrant’s, he’ll find, if he completes the calcula- 
tion, that a king lives seven hundred and twenty-nine times more pleasantly е 
than a tyrantand thata tyrantis the same number of times more wretched.” 
That’s an amazing calculation of the difference between the pleasure 
and pain of the two men, the just and the unjust. 588 
Yet it’s a true one, and one appropriate to human lives, if indeed days, 
nights, months, and years are appropriate to them. 
And of course they are appropriate. 
Then, if a good and just person’s life is that much more pleasant than 
the life of a bad and unjust person, won’t its grace, fineness, and virtue 
be incalculably greater? 
By god, it certainly will. 
All right, then. Since we’ve reached this point in the argument, lets ) 


11. Because the timocrat is between them. 

12. Socrates’ mathematics is difficult to follow. He seems to have something like this 
in mind. The tyrant’s image of pleasure is two-dimensional, whereas the true pleasure 
of the philosopher is three-dimensional. Hence, if a one-unit square represents the 
degree of closeness to true pleasure of an image nine times removed from it, true 
pleasure should be represented by a nine-unit cube. It follows that the king lives 729 
times more pleasantly than the tyrant. However, in order to reach the number 729, 
which seems to have been significant to Pythagoras and his followers (there were, 
allegedly, 729 days and nights in the year, and 729 months in the “great year” recognized 
by the Pythagorean philosopher Philolaus), Socrates has made two fast moves. First, 
he has illegitimately capitalized on the Greek manner of counting series in order to 
count the oligarch twice, once as the last term in his first series (tyrant, democrat, 
oligarch) and again as the first term in his second series (oligarch, timocrat, king). 
Second, he has multiplied the number of times the tyrant is removed from the oligarch 
by the number of times the oligarch is removed from the king, when he should have 
added them. The tyrant is therefore only five times removed from the king and lives 
only 125 times less pleasantly! 


589 


260 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


return to the first things we said, since they are what led us here. I think 
someone said at some point that injustice profits a completely unjust 
person who is believed to be just. Isn’t that so? 

It certainly is. 

Now, lets discuss this with him, since we’ve agreed on the respective 
powers that injustice and justice have. 

How? 

By fashioning an image of the soul in words, so that the person who 
says this sort of thing will know what he is saying. 

What sort of image? 

One like those creatures that legends tell us used to come into being in 
ancient times, such as the Chimera, Scylla, Cerberus,’ or any of the 
multitude of others in which many different kinds of things are said to 
have grown together naturally into one. 

Yes, the legends do tell us of such things. 

Well, then, fashion a single kind of multicolored beast with a ring of 
many heads that it can grow and change at will—some from gentle, some 
from savage animals. 

That’s work for a clever artist. However, since words are more malleable 
than wax and the like, consider it done. 

Then fashion one other kind, that of a lion, and another of a human 
being. But make the first much the largest and the other second to it in 
size. 

That’s easier—the sculpting is done. 

Now join the three of them into one, so that that they somehow grow 
together naturally. 

They’re joined. 

Then, fashion around them the image of one of them, that of a human 
being so that anyone who sees only the outer covering and not what’s 
inside will think it is a single creature, a human being. 

It’s done. 

Then, if someone maintains that injustice profits this human being and 
that doing just things brings no advantage, let’s tell him that he is simply 
saying that it is beneficial for him, first, to feed the multiform beast well 
and make it strong, and also the lion and all that pertains to him; second, 
to starve and weaken the human being within, so that he is dragged along 
wherever either of the other two leads; and, third, to leave the parts to 


13. The Chimera was “lion in the front, serpent in the back, and she-goat in the 
middle” (iad 6.181). Scylla had six heads, each with three rows of teeth, and twelve 
feet (see Odyssey 12.85 fF., 245 Е). Cerberus was a huge dog guarding the entrance to 
Hades; he had three heads and a serpent’s tail. 


BOOK 1X 588р-590а 261 


bite and kill one another rather than accustoming them to each other and 
making them friendly. 

Yes, that’s absolutely what someone who praises injustice is saying. 

But, on the other hand, wouldn’t someone who maintains that just 
things are profitable be saying, first, that all our words and deeds should 
insure that the human being within this human being has the most control; 
second, that he should take care of the many-headed beast as a farmer does 
his animals, feeding and domesticating the gentle heads and preventing the 
savage ones from growing; and, third, that he should make the lion’s 
nature his ally, care for the community of all his parts, and bring them up 
in such a way that they will be friends with each other and with himself? 

Yes, that’s exactly what someone who praises justice is saying. 

From every point of view, then, anyone who praises justice speaks truly, 
and anyone who praises injustice speaks falsely. Whether we look at the 
matter from the point of view of pleasure, good reputation, or advantage, 
a praiser of justice tells the truth, while one who condemns it has nothing 
sound to say and condemns without knowing what he is condemning. 

In my opinion, at least, he knows nothing about it. 

Then let’s persuade him gently—for he isn’t wrong of his own will— 
by asking him these questions. Should we say that this is the original basis 
for the conventions about what is fine and what is shameful? Fine things 
are those that subordinate the beastlike parts of our nature to the human— 
or better, perhaps, to the divine; shameful ones are those that enslave the 
gentle to the savage? Will he agree or what? 

He will, if he takes my advice. 

In light of this argument, can it profit anyone to acquire gold unjustly 
if, by doing so, he enslaves the best part of himself to the most vicious? If 
he got the gold by enslaving his son or daughter to savage and evil men, 
it wouldn’t profit him, no matter how much gold he got. How, then, could 
he fail to be wretched if he pitilessly enslaves the most divine part of 
himself to the most godless and polluted one and accepts golden gifts in 
return for a more terrible destruction than Eriphyle’s when she took the 
necklace in return for her husband’s вош? 

A much more terrible one, Glaucon said. I’ll answer for him. 

And don’t you think that licentiousness has long been condemned for 
just these reasons, namely, that because of it, that terrible, large, and 
multiform beast is let loose more than it should be? 

Clearly. 


14. Eriphyle was bribed by Polynices to persuade her husband, Amphiaraus, to take 
part in an attack on Thebes. He was killed, and she was murdered by her son in 
revenge. See Odyssey 11.326-7; Pindar, Nemean 9.37 ff. 


590 


591 


262 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


And aren’t stubbornness and irritability condemned because they inhar- 
moniously increase and stretch the lionlike and snakelike”’ part? 

Certainly. 

And aren’t luxury and softness condemned because the slackening and 
loosening of this same part produce cowardice in it? 

Of course. 

And aren’t flattery and slavishness condemned because they subject the 
spirited part to the moblike beast, accustoming it from youth on to being 
insulted for the sake of the money needed to satisfy the beast’s insatiable 
appetites, so that it becomes an ape instead of a lion? 

They certainly are. 

Why do you think that the condition of a manual worker is despised? 
Or is it for any other reason than that, when the best part is naturally weak 
in someone, it can’t rule the beasts within him but can only serve them 
and learn to flatter them? 

Probably so. 

Therefore, to insure that someone like that is ruled by something similar 
to what rules the best person, we say that he ought to be the slave of that 
best person who has a divine ruler within himself. It isn’t to harm the slave 
that we say he must be ruled, which is what Thrasymachus thought to be 
true of all subjects, but because it is better for everyone to be ruled by 
divine reason, preferably within himself and his own, otherwise imposed 
trom without, so that as far as possible all will be alike and friends, 
governed by the sanie thing. 

Yes, that’s right. 

This is clearly the aim of the law, which is the ally of everyone. But it’s 
also our aim in ruling our children, we don’t allow them to be free until 
we establish a constitution in them, just as in a city, and—by fostering 
their best part with our own—equip them with a guardian and ruler similar 
to our own to take our place. Then, and only then, we set them free. 

Clearly so. 

Then how can we maintain or argue, Glaucon, that injustice, licen- 
tiousness, and doing shameful things are profitable to anyone, since, even 
though he may acquire more money or other sort of power from them, 
they make him more vicious? 

There’s no way we can. 

Or that to do injustice without being discovered and having to pay the 
penalty is profitable? Doesn’t the one who remains undiscovered become 


Ра 


15. The snakelike part hasn’t been previously mentioned, although it may be included 
in “all that pertains to” the lion (588е). It symbolizes some of the meaner components 
of the spirited part, such as irritability, which it would be unnatural to attribute to the 
noble lion. 


BOOK IX 590a-592b 263 


even more vicious, while the bestial part of the one who is discovered is 
calmed and tamed and his gentle part freed, so that his entire soul settles 
into its best nature, acquires moderation, justice, and reason, and attains 
a more valuable state than that of having a fine, strong, healthy body, since 
the soul itself is more valuable than the body? 

That’s absolutely certain. 

Then won’t a person of understanding direct all his efforts to attaining 
that state of his soul? First, hell value the studies that produce it and 
despise the others. 

Clearly so. 

Second, he won’t entrust the condition and nurture of his body to the 
irrational pleasure of the beast within or turn his life in that direction, but 
neither will he make health his aim or assign first place to being strong, 
healthy, and beautiful, unless he happens to acquire moderation as a 
result. Rather, it’s clear that he will always cultivate the harmony of his 
body for the sake of the consonance in his soul. 

He certainly will, if indeed he’s to be truly trained in music and poetry. 

Will he also keep order and consonance in his acquisition of money, 
with that same end in view? Or, even though he isn’t dazzled by the size 
of the majority into accepting their idea of blessed happiness, will he 
increase his wealth without limit and so have unlimited evils? 

Not in my view. 

Rather, he’ll look to the constitution within him and guard against 
disturbing anything in it, either by too much money or too little. And, in 
this way, he’ll direct both the increase and expenditure of his wealth, as 
far as he can. 

That’s exactly what he’ll do. 

And he’ll look to the same thing where honors are concerned. He’ll 
willingly share in and taste those that he believes will make him better, 
but he’ll avoid any public or private honor that might overthrow the 
established condition of his soul. 

If that’s his chief concern, he won’t be willing to take part in politics. 

Yes, by the dog, he certainly will, at least in his own kind of city. But 
he may not be willing to do so in his fatherland, unless some divine good 
luck chances to be his. 

I understand. You mean that he’ll be willing to take part in the politics 
of the city we were founding and describing, the one that exists in theory, 
for I don’t think it exists anywhere on earth. 

But perhaps, I said, there is a model of it in heaven, for anyone who 
wants to look at it and to make himself its citizen on the strength of what 
he sees. It makes no difference whether it is or ever will be somewhere, 
for he would take part in the practical affairs of that city and no other. 

Probably so, he said. 


242 


Воок Х 


The тат argument of the Republic is now complete. Hence Socrates is іп а 
position to discuss the kind of poetry about human beings that is permitted in the 
kallipolis, a discussion that had to be postponed in Book Ш (392а-с). Given the 
importance Socrates attributes to music and poetry and physical training (4245- 
425a) and the importance of Homer and Hesiod in Greek education, the return 
to this topic 15 hardly an anticlimax. It is rather the moment at which the new 
philosophy-based education confronts the traditional education based on poetry. 

Central to this discussion 15 a new account of mimésis, or imitation, based on 
the metaphysical theories introduced in Books V-VII. Earlier in Book Ш, imita- 
Поп was something a person did by impersonating a character in a poem (394d 
Sf); now imitation is something a роет or a painting does. 

Socrates’ critique of poetry is extremely subtle. The question on which it focuses 
is whether what one needs to know in order to be a good poet qualifies one as a 
teacher of virtue. Socrates argues that it does not. An imitator, in Plato’s new 
technical sense, is someone whose products are third from the truth (5922), because 
they imitate the sorts of things the craftsman makes, which are themselves only 
imitations of what the philosopher-king would make (596e-597¢). Hence, if 
poetry 1s third from the truth, it too will be imitative, and the poet will be an 
imitator. But Socrates argues that the poet is an imitator in this sense (5984- 
607a), and consequently he does not even have true belief about virtue. Makers 
have true belief through associating with users, who alone have knowledge. But 
imitators don’t even have the kind of insight that makers do; they have only 
opinion—sometimes true, sometimes false—nothing more. Hence they are not 
reliable teachers of virtue and, because of their disturbing influence even on good 
people, should not be admitted into the kallipolis. Socrates’ ban on imitative 
poetry 1s not final, however. He allows for the possibility that someone might be 
able to construct a defense of poetry that would change his mind (607b-608b). 

Having completed his account of poetry, Socrates turns to the topic of the 
immortality of the soul and to the previously excluded consequences of justice 
and injustice (6096—6126). He argues, in part by appeal to the Myth of Er, that 
the good consequences of justice both in this life and in the next far outweigh those 
of injustice. This completes his argument that justice belongs in the best of the 
three classes of goods that Glaucon distinguished at the beginning of Book П, 
since it 15 choiceworthy both for its own sake and for its consequences. 


264 


BOOK х 595a-596b 265 


Indeed, I said, our city has many features that assure me that we were 595 
entirely right in founding it as we did, and, when I say this, I’m especially 
thinking of poetry. 

What about it in particular? Glaucon said. 

That we didn’t admit any that is imitative. Now that we have distin- 
guished the separate parts of the soul, it is even clearer, I think, that such 
poetry should be altogether excluded. b 

What do you mean? 

Between ourselves—for you won’t denounce me to the tragic poets or 
any of the other imitative ones—all such poetry is likely to distort the 
thought of anyone who hears it, unless he has the knowledge of what it is 
really like, as a drug to counteract it. 

What exactly do you have in mind in saying this? 

РІ tell you, even though the love and respect I’ve had for Homer since 
I was a child make me hesitate to speak, for he seems to have been the 
first teacher and leader of all these fine tragedians. All the same, no one 
is to be honored or valued more than the truth. So, as I say, it must be с 
told. 

That’s right. 

Listen then, or, rather, answer. 

Ask and I will. 

Could you tell me what imitation in general is? I don’t entirely under- 
stand what sort of thing imitations are trying to be. 

Is it likely, then, that Г// understand? 

That wouldn’t be so strange, for people with bad eyesight often see 
things before those whose eyesight is keener. 596 

That’s so, but even if something occurred to me, I wouldn’t be eager 
to talk about it in front of you. So Га rather that you did the looking. 

Do you want us to begin our examination, then, by adopting our usual 
procedure? As you know, we customarily hypothesize a single form in 
connection with each of the many things to which we apply the same 
name.’ Or don’t you understand? 

I do. 

Then let’s now take any of the manys you like. For example, there are 
many beds and tables. b 

Of course. 

But there are only two forms of such furniture, one of the bed and one 
of the table. 

Yes. 

And don’t we also customarily say that their makers look towards the 


1. See 475e ff., 507a—b, and 476c n. 29. 


266 SocraTES/GLAUCON 


appropriate form in making the beds or tables we use, and similarly in the 
other cases? Surely no craftsman makes the form itself. How could he? 

There’s no way he could. 

Well, then, see what you’d call this craftsman? 

с Which опе? 

Тһе one who makes all the things that all the other kinds of craftsmen 
severally make. 

That’s a clever and wonderful fellow you’re talking about. 

Wait a minute, and you’ll have even more reason to say that, for this 
same craftsman is able to make, not only all kinds of furniture, but all 
plants that grow from the earth, all animals (including himself), the earth 
itself, the heavens, the gods, all the things in the heavens and in Hades 
beneath the earth. 

d He’d be amazingly clever! 

You don’t believe me? Tell me, do you think that there’s no way any 
craftsman could make all these things, or that in one way he could and 
in another he couldn’t? Don’t you see that there is a way in which you 
yourself could make all of them? 

What way is that? 

It isn’t hard: You could do it quickly and in lots of places, especially 
if you were willing to carry a mirror with you, for that’s the quickest way 
of all. With it you can quickly make the sun, the things in the heavens, 

e the earth, yourself, the other animals, manufactured items, plants, and 
everything else mentioned just now. 

Yes, I could make them appear, but I couldn’t make the things them- 
selves as they truly are. 

Well put! You’ve extracted the point that’s crucial to the argument. I 
suppose that the painter too belongs to this class of makers,” doesn’t he? 

Of course. 

But I suppose you'll say that he doesn’t truly make the things he makes. 
Yet, in a certain way, the painter does make a bed, doesn’t he? 

Yes, he makes the appearance of one. 

What about the carpenter? Didn’t you just say that he doesn’t make 

597 the form—which is our term for the being’ of a bed—but only а bed? 

Yes, I did say that. 

Now, if he doesn’t make the being of a bed, he isn’t making that which 


2. Throughout the following passage, Plato takes advantage of the fact that the Greek 
word poiein means both “to make” generaily and also “to compose poetry.” Indeed, 
the word poiétés means both “poet” and “maker,” so that to class the poet (and the 
painter) as “makers” is much more natural in Greek than it is in English. 


3. See 507b п. 24. 


BOOK X 596b-597d 267 


is, but something which is like that which is, but is not it. So, if someone 
were to say that the work ofa carpenter or any other craftsman is completely 
that which is, wouldn’t he risk saying what isn’t true?* 

That, at least, would be the opinion of those who busy themselves with 
arguments of this sort. 

Then let’s not be surprised if the carpenter’s bed, too, turns out to be 
a somewhat dark affair in comparison to the true one. 

All right. 

Then, do you want us to try to discover what an imitator is by reference 
to these same examples? 

I do, if you do. 

We get, then, these three kinds of beds. The first is in nature a bed, 
and I suppose we’d say that a god makes it, or does someone else make 
it? 

No one else, I suppose. 

The second is the work of a carpenter. 

Yes. 

And the third is the one the painter makes. Isn’t that so? 

It is. 

Then the painter, carpenter, and god correspond to three kinds of bed? 

Yes, three. 

Now, the god, either because he didn’t want to or because it was 
necessary for him not to do so, didn’t make more than one bed in nature, 
but only one, the very one that is the being of a bed. Two or more of these 
have not been made by the god and never will be. 

Why is that? 

Because, if he made only two, then again one would come to light whose 
form they in turn would both possess, and that would be the one that is 
the being of a bed and not the other two.” 

That’s right. 

The god knew this, I think, and wishing to be the real maker of the 
truly real bed and not just а maker of a bed, he made it to be one in nature. 

Probably so. 

Do you want us to call him its natural maker or something like that? 

It would be right to do so, at any rate, since he is by nature the maker 
of this and everything else. 


4. This sentence is best understood as follows: “If the carpenter doesn’t make the 
being of e.g. a bed, he isn’t making that which a bed is, but something which, though 
it is like what a bed is, isn’t the same as what a bed is. So if someone were to say that 
the work of a carpenter or other craftsman is completely that which it is (e.g. a bed), 
wouldn’t he risk saying what isn’t true?” 


5. Here Socrates uses the principle given at 596a. 


598 


268 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


What about a carpenter? Isn’t he the maker of a bed? 

Yes. 

And is a painter also a craftsman and maker of such things? 

Not at all. 

Then what do you think he does do to a bed? 

He imitates it. He is an imitator of what the others make. That, in my 
view, is the most reasonable thing to call him. 

All right. Then wouldn’t you call someone whose product is third from 
the natural one an imitator? 

I most certainly would. 

Then this will also be true of a tragedian, if indeed he is an imitator. 
He is by nature third from the king and the truth, as are all other imitators. 

It looks that way. 

We're agreed about imitators, then. Now, tell me this about a painter. 
Do you think he tries in each case to imitate the thing itself in nature or 
the works of craftsmen? 

The works of craftsmen. 

As they are or as they appear? You must be clear about that. 

How do you mean? 

Like this. If you look at a bed from the side or the front or from 
anywhere else is it a different bed each time? Or does it only appear 
different, without being at all different? And is that also the case with 
other things? 

That’s the way it is—it appears different without being so. 

Then consider this very point: What does painting do in each case? 
Does it imitate that which is as it is, or does it imitate that which appears 
as it appears? Is it an imitation of appearances or of truth? 

Of appearances. 

Then imitation is far removed from the truth, for it touches only a small 
part of each thing and a part that is itself only an image. And that, it seems, 
is why it can produce everything. For example, we say that a painter can 
paint a cobbler, a carpenter, or any other craftsman, even though he knows 
nothing about these crafts. Nevertheless, if he is a good painter and 
displays his painting of a carpenter at a distance, he can deceive children 
and foolish people into thinking that it is truly a carpenter. 

Of course. 

Then this, I suppose, is what we must bear in mind in all these cases. 
Hence, whenever someone tells us that he has met a person who knows 
all the crafts as well as all the other things that anyone else knows and that 
his knowledge of any subject is more exact than any of theirs is, we must 


6. See 587c n. 10. 


воокх 5974-5994 269 


assume that we’re talking to a simple-minded fellow who has apparently 
encountered some sort of magician or imitator and been deccived into 
thinking him omniscient and that the reason he has been deceived is that 
he himself can’t distinguish between knowledge, ignorance, and imitation. 

That’s absolutely true. 

Then, we must consider tragedy and its leader, Homer. The reason is 
this: We hear some people say that poets know all crafts, all human affairs 
concerned with virtue and vice, and all about the gods as well. They say 
that if a good poet produces fine poetry, he must have knowledge of the 
things he writes about, or else he wouldn’t be able to produce it at all. 
Hence, we have to look to see whether those who tell us this have encoun- 
tered these imitators and have been so deceived by them that they don’t 
realize that their works are at the third remove from that which is and are 
easily produced without knowledge of the truth (since they are only images, 
not things that are), or whether there is something in what these people 
say, and good poets really do have knowledge of the things most people 
think they write so well about. 

We certainly must look into it. 

Do you think that someone who could make both the thing imitated 
and its image would allow himself to be serious about making images and 
put this at the forefront of his life as the best thing to do? 

No, I don’t. 

I suppose that, if he truly had knowledge of the things he imitates, he’d 
be much more serious about actions than about imitations of them, would 
try to leave behind many fine deeds as memorials to himself, and would 
be more eager to be the subject of a eulogy than the author of one. 

I suppose so, for these things certainly aren’t equally valuable or equally 
beneficial either. 

Then let’s not demand an account of any of these professions from 
Homer or the other poets. Let’s not ask whether any of them is a doctor 
rather than an imitator of what doctors say, or whether any poet of the old 
or new school has made anyone healthy as Asclepius did, or whether he 
has left any students of medicine behind as Asclepius did his sons. And 
let’s not ask them about the other crafts either. Let’s pass over all that. 
But about the most important and most beautiful things of which Homer 
undertakes to speak—warfare, generalship, city government, and people’s 
education—about these it is fair to question him, asking him this: “Homer, 
if you’re not third from the truth about virtue, the sort of craftsman of 
images that we defined an imitator to be, but if you’re even second and 
capable of knowing what ways of life make people better in private or in 
public, then tell us which cities are better governed because of you, as 
Sparta is because of Lycurgus, and as many others—big and small—are 


IHY 


d 


270 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


because of many other men? What city gives you credit for being a good 
e  lawgiver who benefited it, as Italy and Sicily do to Charondas,’ and as we 
do to Solon? Who gives such credit to you?” Will he be able to name one? 

I suppose not, for not even the Homeridae® make that claim for him. 

Well, then, is any war in Homer’s time remembered that was won 

600 because of his generalship and advice? 

None. 

Or, as befits a wise man, are many inventions and useful devices in the 
crafts or sciences attributed to Homer, as they are to Thales of Miletus 
and Anacharsis the Scythian?” 

There’s nothing of that kind at all. 

Then, if there’s nothing of a public nature, are we told that, when 
Homer was alive, he was a leader in the education of certain people who 
took pleasure in associating with him in private and that he passed on a 

b Homeric way of life to those who came after him, just as Pythagoras did? 
Pythagoras is particularly loved for this, and even today his followers are 
conspicuous for what they call the Pythagorean way of life. 

Again, we’re told nothing of this kind about Homer. If the stories about 
him are true, Socrates, his companion, Creophylus,'° seems to have been 
an even more ridiculous example of education than his name suggests, for 
they tell us that while Homer was alive, Creophylus completely neglected 

с hm. 

They do tell us that. But, Glaucon, if Homer had really been able to 
educate people and make them better, if he’d known about these things 
and not merely about how to imitate them, wouldn’t he have had many 
companions and been loved and honored by them? Protagoras of Abdera, 
Prodicus of Ceos," and a great many others are able to convince anyone 
who associates with them in private that he wouldn’t be able to manage 


7. Charondas probably lived in the sixth century В.С. and gave laws to Catane and 
other cities in Italy and Sicily. 


8. The Homeridae were the rhapsodes and poets who recited and expounded Homer 
throughout the Greek world. 


9. Thales of Miletus, on the Ionian coast of Asia Minor, is the first philosopher we 
know of in ancient Greece. He seems to have regarded water as the fundamental 
principle of all things and is said to have predicted the solar eclipse of 585 в.с. 
Ancharsis, who lived around 600 B.c. and is often included among the Seven Sages, 
is credited with beginning Greek geometry and with being able to calculate the distance 
of ships at sea. 


10. Creophylus is said to have been an epic poet from Chios. His name comes from 
two words, kreas, meaning “meat,” and phylon, meaning “race” or “kind.” A modern 
equivalent, with parallel comic overtones, would be “meathead.” 


11. Protagoras and Prodicus were two of the most famous fifth-century sophists. 


воок х 5994-601с 271 


his household or city unless they themselves supervise his education, and 
they are so intensely loved because of this wisdom of theirs that their 
disciples do everything but carry them around on their shoulders. So do 
you suppose that, if Homer had been able to benefit people and make 
them more virtuous, his companions would have allowed either him or 
Hesiod to wander around as rhapsodes? Instead, wouldn’t they have clung 
tighter to them than to gold and compelled them to live with them in their 
homes, or, if they failed to persuade them to do so, wouldn’t they have 
followed them wherever they went until they had received sufficient edu- 
cation? 

It seems to me, Socrates, that what you say is entirely true. 

Then shall we conclude that all poetic imitators, beginning with Homer, 
imitate images of virtue and all the other things they write about and have 
no grasp of the truth? As we were saying just now, a painter, though he 
knows nothing about cobblery, can make what seems to be a cobbler to 
those who know as little about it as he does and who judge things by their 
colors and shapes. 

That’s right. 

And in the same way, I suppose we'll say that a poetic imitator uses 
words and phrases to paint colored pictures of each of the crafts. He 
himself knows nothing about them, but he imitates them in such a way 
that others, as ignorant as he, who judge by words, will think he speaks 
extremely well about cobblery or generalship or anything else whatever, 
provided—so great is the natural charm of these things—that he speaks 
with meter, rnythm, and harmony, for if you strip а poet’s works of their 
musical colorings and take them by themselves, I think you know what 
they look like. You’ve surely seen them. 

I certainly have. 

Don’t they resemble the faces of young boys who are neither fine nor 
beautiful after the bloom of youth has left them? 

Absolutely. 

Now, consider this. We say that a maker of an image—an imitator— 
knows nothing about that which is but only about its appearance. Isn’t that 
so? 

Yes. 

Then let’s not leave the discussion of this point halfway, but examine 
it fully. 

Go ahead. 

Don’t we say that a painter paints reins and a mouth-bit? 

Yes. 

And that a cobbler and a metal-worker makes them? 

Of course. 


601 


602 


272 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


Then, does a painter know how the reins and mouth-bit have to be? Or 
is it the case that even a cobbler and metal-worker who make them don’t 
know this, but only someone who knows how to use them, namely, a 
horseman? 

That’s absolutely true. 

And won’t we say that the same holds for everything? 

What? 

That for each thing there are these three crafts, one that uses it, one 
that makes it, and one that imitates it? 

Yes. 

Then aren’t the virtue or excellence, the beauty and correctness of each 
manufactured item, living creature, and action related to nothing but the 
use for which each is made or naturally adapted? 

They are. 

It’s wholly necessary, therefore, that a user of each thing has most 
experience of it and that he tell a maker which of his products performs 
well or badly in actual use. A flute-player, for example, tells a flute-maker 
about the flutes that respond well in actual playing and prescribes what 
kind of flutes he is to make, while the maker follows his instructions. 

Of course. 

Then doesn’t the one who knows give instructions about good and bad 
flutes, and doesn’t the other rely on him in making them? 

Yes. 

Therefore, a maker—through associating with and having to listen to 
the one who knows—has right opinion about whether something he makes 
is fine or bad, but the one who knows is the user. 

That’s right. 

Does an imitator have knowledge of whether the things he makes are 
fine or right through having made use of them, or does he have right 
opinion about them through having to consort with the one who knows 
and being told how he is to paint them? 

Neither. 

Therefore an imitator has neither knowledge nor right opinion about 
whether the things he makes are fine or bad. 

Apparently not. 

Then a poetic imitator is an accomplished fellow when it comes to 
wisdom about the subjects of his poetry! 

Hardly. 

Nonetheless, he’ll go on imitating, even though he doesn’t know the 
good or bad qualities of anything, but what he’ll imitate, it seems, is what 
appears fine or beautiful to the majority of people who know nothing. 

Of course. 


воокх 601с-603а 273 


It seems, then, that ете fairly well agreed that an imitator has no 
worthwhile knowledge of the things he imitates, that imitation is a kind of 
game and not something to be taken seriously, and that all the tragic poets, 
whether they write in iambics or hexameters, are as imitative as they could 
possibly be. 

That’s right. 

Then is this kind of imitation concerned with something that is third с 
from the truth, or what? 

Yes, it is. 

And on which of a person’s parts does it exert its power? 

What do you mean? 

This: Something looked at from close at hand doesn’t seem to be the 
same size as it does when it is looked at from a distance. 

No, it doesn’t. 

And something looks crooked when seen in water and straight when 
seen out of it, while something else looks both concave and convex because 
our eyes are deceived by its colors, and every other similar sort of confusion 
is clearly present in our soul. And it is because they exploit this weakness 
іп our nature that trompe Гое! painting, conjuring, and other forms of 4 
trickery have powers that are little short of magical. 

That’s true. 

And don’t measuring, counting, and weighing give us most welcome 
assistance in these cases, so that we aren’t ruled by something’s looking 
bigger, smaller, more numerous, or heavier, but by calculation, measure- 
ment, or weighing? 

Of course. 

And calculating, measuring, and weighing are the work of the rational 
part of the soul. г 

Тһеу аге. 

But when this part has measured and has indicated that some things 
are larger or smaller or the same size as others, the opposite appears to it 
at the same time. 

Yes. 

And didn’t we say that it is impossible for the same thing to believe 

. а а ІШ, 
opposites about the same thing at the same time? 

We did, and we were right to say it. 

Then the part of the soul that forms a belief contrary to the measure- 
ments couldn’t be the same as the part that believes in accord with them. 603 

No, it couldn’t. 


12. See 4366-с. 


274 SocRATES/GLAUCON 


Now, the part that puts its trust in measurement and calculation is the 
best part of the soul. 

Of course. 

Therefore, the part that opposes it is one of the inferior parts in us. 

Necessarily. 

This, then, is what I wanted to get agreement about when I said that 
painting and imitation as a whole produce work that is far from the truth, 
namely, that imitation really consorts with a part of us that is far from 
reason, and the result of their being friends and companions is neither 
sound nor true. 

That’s absolutely right. 

Then imitation is an inferior thing that consorts with another inferior 
thing to produce an inferior offspring. 

So it seems. 

Does this apply only to the imitations we see, or does it also apply to 
the ones we hear—the ones we call poetry? 

It probably applies to poetry as well. 

However, we mustn’t rely solely on a mere probability based on the 
analogy with painting; instead, we must go directly to the part of our 
thought with which poetic imitations consort and see whether it is inferior 
or something to be taken seriously. 

Yes, we must. 

Then let’s set about it as follows. We say that imitative poetry imitates 
human beings acting voluntarily or under compulsion, who believe that, 
as a result of these actions, they are doing either well or badly and who 
experience either pleasure or pain in all this. Does it imitate anything apart 
from this? 

Nothing. 

Then is a person of one mind in all these circumstances? Or, just as he 
was at war with himself in matters of sight and held opposite beliefs about 
the same thing at the same time, does he also fight with himself and engage 
in civil war with himself in matters of action? But there is really no need 
for us to reach agreement on this question now, for I remember that we 
already came to an adequate conclusion about all these things in our 
earlier arguments, when we said that our soul is full of a myriad of such 
oppositions at the same time.” 

And rightly so. 

It was right, but I think we omitted some things then that we must now 
discuss. 

What are they? 


li See 43% ff. 


BOOK X 603a-604d 275 


We also mentioned somewhere before“ that, if a decent man happens 
to lose his son or some other prized possession, he’ll bear it more easily 
than the other sorts of people. 

Certainly. 

But now let’s consider this. Will he not grieve at all, or, if that’s 
impossible, will he be somehow measured in his response to pain? 

The latter is closer to the truth. 

Now, tell me this about him: Will he fight his pain and put up more 
resistance to it when his equals can see him or when he’s alone by himself 604 
in solitude? 

He’ll fight it far more when he’s being seen. 

But when he’s alone I suppose he’ll venture to say and do lots of things 
that he’d be ashamed to be heard saying or seen doing. 

That’s right. 

And isn’t it reason and law that tells him to resist his pain, while his 
experience of it tells him to give in? b 

True. 

And when there are two opposite inclinations in a person in relation to 
the same thing at the same time, we say that he must also have two parts. 

Of course. 

Isn’t one part ready to obey the law wherever it leads him? 

How so? 

The law says, doesn’t it, that it is best to keep as quiet as possible in 
misfortunes and not get excited about them? First, it isn’t clear whether 
such things will turn out to be good or bad in the end; second, it doesn’t 
make the future any better to take them hard; third, human affairs aren’t 
worth taking very seriously; and, finally, grief prevents the very thing we с 
most need in such circumstances from coming into play as quickly as 
possible. 

What аге you referring to? 

Deliberation. We must accept what has happened as we would the fall 
of the dice, and then arrange our affairs in whatever way reason determines 
to be best. We mustn’t hug the hurt part and spend our time weeping and 
wailing like children when they trip. Instead, we should always accustom 
our souls to turn as quickly as possible to healing the disease and putting 
the disaster right, replacing lamentation with cure. d 

That would be the best way to deal with misfortune, at any rate. 

Accordingly, we say that it is the best part of us that is willing to follow 
this rational calculation. 

Clearly. 


14. See 3874-е. 


276 SOcRATES/GLAUCON 


Then won’t we also say that the part that leads us to dwell on our 
misfortunes and to lamentation, and that can never get enough of these 
things, is irrational, idle, and a friend of cowardice? 

We certainly will. 

Now, this excitable character admits of many multicolored imitations. 

e Buta rational and quiet character, which always remains pretty well the 
same, is neither easy to imitate nor easy to understand when imitated, 
especially not by a crowd consisting of all sorts of people gathered together 
at a theater festival, for the experience being imitated is alien to them. 

605 Absolutely. 

Clearly, then, an imitative poet isn’t by nature related to the part of the 
soul that rules in such a character, “апа, if he’s to attain a good reputation 
with the majority of people, his cleverness isn’t directed to pleasing it. 
Instead, he’s related to the excitable and multicolored character, since it 
is easy to imitate. 

Clearly. 

Therefore, we'd be right to take him and put him beside a painter as 
his counterpart. Like a painter, he produces work that is inferior with 
respect to truth and that appeals to a part of the soul that is similarly 

6 inferior rather than to the best part. So we were right not to admit him 
into a city that is to be well-governed, for he arouses, nourishes, and 
strengthens this part of the soul and so destroys the rational one, in 
just the way that someone destroys the better sort of citizens when he 
strengthens the vicious ones and surrenders the city to them. Similarly, 
we'll say that an imitative poet puts a bad constitution in the soul of each 
individual by making images that are far removed from the truth and by 

¢ gratifying the irrational part, which cannot distinguish the large and the 
small but believes that the same things are large at one time and small at 
another. 

That’s right. 

However, we haven’t yet brought the most serious charge against imita- 
tion, namely, that with a few rare exceptions it is able to corrupt even 
decent people, for that’s surely an altogether terrible thing. 

It certainly is, if indeed it can do that. 

Listen, then, and consider whether it can or not. When even the best 
of us hear Homer or some other tragedian imitating one of the heroes 
sorrowing and making a long lamenting speech or singing and beating his 

d breast, you know that we enjoy it, give ourselves up to following it, sympa- 
thize with the hero, take his sufferings seriously, and praise as a good poet 
the one who affects us most in this way. 


15. See 4374 ff. 


BOOK х 604d-606d 277 


Of course we do. 

But when one of us suffers a private loss, you realize that the opposite 
happens. We pride ourselves if we are able to keep quiet and master our 
grief, for we think that this is the manly thing to do and that the behavior 
we praised before is womanish. е 

I do realize that. 

Then are we right to praise it? Is it right to look at someone behaving 
in a way that we would consider unworthy and shameful and to enjoy and 
praise it rather than being disgusted by it? 

No, by god, that doesn’t seem reasonable. 

No, at least not if you look at it in the following way. 606 

How? 

If you reflect, first, that the part of the soul that is forcibly controlled in 
our private misfortunes and that hungers for the satisfaction of weeping 
and wailing, because it desires these things by nature, is the very part that 
receives satisfaction and enjoyment from poets, and, second, that the part 
of ourselves that is best by nature, since it hasn’t been adequately educated 
either by reason or habit, relaxes its guard over the lamenting part when 
it is watching the sufferings of somebody else. The reason it does so is 
this: It thinks that there is no shame involved for it in praising and pitying 6 
another man who, in spite of his claim to goodness, grieves excessively. 
Indeed, it thinks that there is a definite gain involved in doing so, namely, 
pleasure. And it wouldn’t want to be deprived of that by despising the 
whole poem. I suppose that only a few are able to figure out that enjoyment 
of other people’s sufferings is necessarily transferred to our own and that 
the pitying part, if it is nourished and strengthened on the sufferings of 
others, won’t be easily held in check when we ourselves suffer. 

That’s very true. 2 

And doesn’t the same argument apply to what provokes laughter? If 
there are any jokes that you yourself would be ashamed to tell but that 
you very much enjoy hearing and don’t detest as something evil in comic 
plays or in private, aren’t you doing the same thing as in the case of what 
provokes pity? The part of you that wanted to tell the jokes and that was 
held back by your reason, for fear of being thought a buffoon, you then 
release, not realizing that, by making it strong in this way, you will be led 
into becoming a figure of fun where your own affairs are concerned. 

Yes, indeed. 

And in the case of sex, anger, and all the desires, pleasures, and pains 4 
that we say accompany all our actions, poetic imitation has the very same 
effect on us. It nurtures and waters them and establishes them as rulers 
in us when they ought to wither and be ruled, for that way we’ll become 
better and happier rather than worse and more wretched. 


607 


278 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


I can’t disagree with you. 

And so, Glaucon, when you happen to meet those who praise Homer 
and say that he’s the poet who educated Greece, that it’s worth taking 
up his works in order to learn how to manage and educate people, and 
that one should arrange one’s whole life in accordance with his teachings, 
you should welcome these people and treat them as friends, since they’re 
as good as they’re capable of being, and you should agree that Homer is 
the most poetic of the tragedians and the first among them. But you 
should also know that hymns to the gods and eulogies to good people are 
the only poetry we can admit into our city. If you admit the pleasure- 
giving Muse, whether in lyric or epic poetry, pleasure and pain will be 
kings in your city instead of law or the thing that everyone has always 
believed to be best, namely, reason. 

That’s absolutely true. 

Then let this be our defense—now that we’ve returned to the topic of 
poetry—that, in view of its nature, we had reason to banish it from the 
city earlier, for our argument compelled us to do so. But in case we are 
charged with a certain harshness and lack of sophistication, let’s also tell 
poetry that there is an ancient quarrel between it and philosophy, which 
is evidenced by such expressions as “the dog yelping and shrieking at its 
master,” “great in the empty eloquence of fools,” “the mob of wise men 
that has mastered 7ецѕ,”' and “the subtle thinkers, beggars all.”’’ None- 
theless, if the poetry that aims at pleasure and imitation has any argument 
to bring forward that proves it ought to have a place in a well-governed 
city, we at least would be glad to admit it, for we are well aware of the 
charm it exercises. But, be that as it may, to betray what one believes to 
be the truth is impious. What about you, Glaucon, don’t you feel the 
charm of the pleasure-giving Muse, especially when you study her through 
the eyes of Homer? 

Very much so. 

Therefore, isn’t it just that such poetry should return from exile when 
it has successfully defended itself, whether in lyric or any other meter? 

Certainly. 

Then we'll allow its defenders, who aren’t poets themselves but lovers 
of poetry, to speak in prose on its behalf and to show that it not only gives 


16. Reading tén Dia sophén ochlos kratén. The phrase would apply to such philosophers 
as Thales, who might seem to have replaced Zeus with natural forces. 


17. Philosophers, such as Xenophanes and-Heraclitus, attacked Homer and Hesiod 
for their immoral tales about the gods. Poets, such as Aristophanes in his Clouds, 
attacked philosophers for subverting traditional ethical and religious values. But the 
sources of these particular quotations are unknown. 


BOOK х 606d-608d 279 


pleasure but is beneficial both to constitutions and to human life. Indeed, 
we'll listen to them graciously, for we’d certainly profit if poetry were 
shown to be not only pleasant but also beneficial. е 

How could we fail to profit? 

However, if such a defense isn’t made, we’ll behave like people who 
have fallen in love with someone but who force themselves to stay away 
from him, because they realize that their passion isn’t beneficial. In the 
same way, because the love of this sort of poetry has been implanted in 
us by the upbringing we have received under our fine constitutions, we 
are well disposed to any proof that it is the best and truest thing. But if it 
isn’t able to produce such a defense, then, whenever we listen to it, we’ll 608 
repeat the argument we have just now put forward like an incantation so 
as to preserve ourselves from slipping back into that childish passion for 
poetry which the majority of people have. And we’ll go on chanting that 
such poetry is not to be taken seriously or treated as a serious undertaking 
with some kind of hold on the truth, but that anyone who is anxious about 
the constitution within him must be careful when he hears it and must 
continue to believe what we have said about it. b 

I completely agree. 

Yes, for the struggle to be good rather than bad is important, Glaucon, 
much more important than people think. Therefore, we mustn’t be 
tempted by honor, money, rule, or even poetry into neglecting justice and 
the rest of virtue. 

After what we’ve said, I agree with you, and so, I think, would anyone 
else. 

And yet we haven’t discussed the greatest rewards and prizes that have с 
been proposed for virtue. 

They must be inconceivably great, if they’re greater than those you’ve 
already mentioned. 

Could anything really great come to pass in a short time? And isn’t the 
time from childhood to old age short when compared to the whole of time? 

It’s a mere nothing. 

Well, do you think that an immortal thing should be seriously concerned 
with that short period rather than with the whole of time? d 

I suppose not, but what exactly do you mean by this? 

Haven’t you realized that our soul is immortal and never destroyed? 

He looked at me with wonder and said: No, by god, I haven’t. Are you 
really in a position to assert that? 

Ра be wrong not to, I said, and so would you, for it isn’t difficult. 

It is for me, so I’d be glad to hear from you what’s not difficult about 
it. 

Listen, then. 


280 GLAUCON/SOCRATES 


Just speak, and I will. 

Do you talk about good and bad? 

I do. 

е And do you think about them the same way I do? 

What way is that? 

The bad is entirely coterminous with what destroys and corrupts, and 
the good is what preserves and benefits. 

I do. 

And do you say that there is a good and a bad for everything? For 
example, ophthalmia for the eyes, sickness for the whole body, blight for 

609 grain, rot for wood, rust for iron or bronze. In other words, is there, as I 
say, a natural badness and sickness for pretty well everything? 

There is. 

And when one of these attaches itself to something, doesn’t it make the 
thing in question bad, and in the end, doesn’t it disintegrate it and destroy 
it wholly? 

Of course. 

Therefore, the evil that is natural to each thing and the bad that is 
peculiar to it destroy it. However, if they don’t destroy it, nothing else will, 
for the good would never destroy anything, nor would anything neither 

b good nor bad. 

How could they? 

Then, if we discover something that has an evil that makes it bad but 
isn’t able to disintegrate and destroy it, can’t we infer that it is naturally 
incapable of being destroyed? 

Probably so. 

Well, what about the soul? Isn’t there something that makes it bad? 

Certainly, all the things we were mentioning: Injustice, licentiousness, 

с cowardice, and lack of learning. 

Does any of these disintegrate and destroy the soul? Keep your wits 
about you, and let’s not be deceived into thinking that, when an unjust and 
foolish person is caught, he has been destroyed by injustice, which is evil 
іп а soul. Let’s think about it this way instead: Just as the body is worn out, 
destroyed, and brought to the point where it is a body no longer by disease, 
which is evil in a body, so all the things we mentioned just now reach the 
point at which they cease to be what they are through their own peculiar 

d еуі, which attaches itself to them and is present in them. Isn’t that so? 

Yes. 

Then look at the soul in the same way. Do injustice and the other vices 
that exist in a soul—by their very presence in it and by attaching themselves 
to it—corrupt it and make it waste away until, having brought it to the 
point of death, they separate it from the body? 


воокх 6084-610е 281 


That’s not at all what they do. 

But surely it’s unreasonable to suppose that a thing is destroyed by the 
badness proper to something else when it is not destroyed by its own? 

That is unreasonable. 

Keep in mind, Glaucon, that we don’t think that a body is destroyed by 
the badness of food, whether it is staleness, rottenness, or anything else. 
But if the badness of the food happens to implant in the body an evil 
proper to a body, we’ll say that the body was destroyed by its own evil, 
namely, disease. But, since the body is one thing and food another, we’ll 
never judge that the body is destroyed by the badness of food, unless it 
implants in it the body’s own natural and peculiar evil. 

That’s absolutely right. 

By the same argument, if the body’s evil doesn’t cause an evil in the 
soul that is proper to the soul, we'll never judge that the soul, in the 
absence of its own peculiar evil, is destroyed by the evil of something else. 
We'd never accept that anything is destroyed by an evil proper to something 
else. 

That’s also reasonable. 

Then let’s either refute our argument and show that we were wrong, 
or, as long as it remains unrefuted, let’s never say that the soul is destroyed 
by a fever or any other disease or by killing either, for that matter, not 
even if the body is cut up into tiny pieces. We mustn’t say that the soul is 
even close to being destroyed by these things until someone shows us that 
these conditions of the body make the soul more unjust and more impious. 
When something has the evil proper to something else in it, but its own 
peculiar evil is absent, we won’t allow anyone to say that it is destroyed, 
no matter whether it is a soul or anything else whatever. 

And you may be sure that no one will ever prove that the souls of the 
dying are made more unjust by death. 

But if anyone dares to come to grips with our argument, in order to 
avoid having to agree that our souls are immortal, and says that a dying 
man does become more vicious and unjust, we’ll reply that, if what he says 
is true, then injustice must be as deadly to unjust people as a disease, and 
those who catch it must die of it because of its own deadly nature, with 
the worst cases dying quickly and the less serious dying more slowly. As 
things now stand, however, it isn’t like that at all. Unjust people do indeed 
die of injustice, but at the hands of others who inflict the death penalty 
on them. 

By god, if injustice were actually fatal to those who contracted it, it 
wouldn’t seem so terrible, for it would be an escape from their troubles. 
But I rather think that it’s clearly the opposite, something that kills other 
people if it can, while, on top of making the unjust themselves lively, it 


е 


610 


611 


282 GLAUCON/ SOCRATES 


even brings them out at night. Hence it’s very far from being deadly to its 
possessors. 

Youre right, for if the soul’s own evil and badness isn’t enough to kill 
and destroy it, an evil appointed for the destruction of something else will 
hardly kill it. Indeed, it won’t kill anything at all except the very thing it 
is appointed to destroy. 

“Hardly” is right, or so it seems. 

Now, if the soul isn’t destroyed by a single evil, whether its own or 
something else’s, then clearly it must always be. And if it always is, it is 
immortal. 

Necessarily so. 

So be it. And if it is so, then you realize that there would always be the 
same souls, for they couldn’t be made fewer if none is destroyed, and they 
couldn’t be made more numerous either. If anything immortal is increased, 
you know that the increase would have to come from the mortal, and then 
everything would end up being immortal. 

That’s true. 

Then we mustn’t think such a thing, for the argument doesn’t allow it, 
nor must we think that the soul in its truest nature is full of multicolored 
variety and unlikeness or that it differs with itself. 

What do you mean? 

It isn’t easy for anything composed of many parts to be immortal if it 
isn’t put together in the finest way, yet this is how the soul now appeared 
to us. 

It probably isn’t easy. 

Yet our recent argument and others as well compel us to believe that 
the soul 55 immortal. But to see the soul as it is in truth, we must not study 
it as it is while it is maimed by its association with the body and other 
evils—which is what we were doing earlier—but as it is in its pure state, 
that’s how we should study the soul, thoroughly and by means of logical 
reasoning. We’ll then find that it is a much finer thing than we thought 
and that we can see justice and injustice as well as all the other things 
weve discussed far more clearly. What we’ve said about the soul is true 
of it as it appears at present. But the condition in which we’ve studied it 
is like that of the sea god Glaucus, whose primary nature can’t easily be 
made out by those who catch glimpses of him. Some of the original parts 
have been broken off, others have been crushed, and his whole body has 
been maimed by the waves and by the shells, seaweeds, and stones that 
have attached themselves to him, so that he looks more like a wild animal 
than his natural self. The soul, too, is in a similar condition when we study 
it, beset by many evils. That, Glaucon, is why we have to look somewhere 
else in order to discover its true nature. 


BOOK х 610e-612d 283 


To where? 

To its philosophy, or love of wisdom. We must realize what it grasps 
and longs to have intercourse with, because it is akin to the divine and 
immortal and what always is, and we must realize what it would become 
if it followed this longing with its whole being, and if the resulting effort 


lifted it out of the sea in which it now dwells, and if the many stones and 6/2 


shells (those which have grown all over it in a wild, earthy, and stony 
profusion because it feasts at those so-called happy feastings on earth) 
were hammered off it. ° Then we’d see what its true nature is and be able 
to determine whether it has many parts or just one and whether or in what 
manner it is put together. But we’ve already given a decent account, I 
think, of what its condition is and what parts it has when it is immersed 
in human life. 

We certainly have. 

And haven’t we cleared away the various other objections to our argu- 
ment without having to invoke the rewards and reputations of justice, as 
you said Homer and Hesiod did?” And haven’t we found that justice itself 
is the best thing for the soul itself, and that the soul—whether it has the 
ring of Gyges ог even it together with the cap of Надев -вһоша do just 
things? 

We have. That’s absolutely true. 

Then can there now be any objection, Glaucon, if in addition we return 
to justice and the rest of virtue both the kind and quantity of wages that 
they obtain for the soul from human beings and gods, whether in this life 
or the next? 

None whatever. 

Then will you give me back what you borrowed from me during the 
discussion? 

What are you referring to in particular? 

I granted your request that a just person should seem unjust and an 
unjust one just, for you said that, even if it would be impossible for these 
things to remain hidden from both gods and humans, still, this had to be 
granted for the sake of argument, so that justice itself could be judged in 
relation to injustice itself. Don’t you remember that? 

It would be wrong of me not to. 

Well, then, since they've now been judged, I ask that the reputation 
justice in fact has among gods and humans be returned to it and that we 


18. See 519 ff. 

19. See 357-367е. 

20. The ring of Gyges is discussed at 3594-360а. The cap of Hades also made its 
wearer invisible. 


b 


284 SOCRATES/GLAUCON 


agree that it does indeed have such a reputation and is entitled to carry 
off the prizes it gains for someone by making him seem just. It is already 
clear that it gives good things to anyone who is just and that it doesn’t 
deceive those who really possess it. 

е That’s a fair request. 

Then won’t you first grant that it doesn’t escape the notice of the gods 
at least as to which of the two is just and which isn’t? 

We will. 

Then if neither of them escapes the gods’ notice, one would be loved 
by the gods and the other hated, as we agreed at the beginning.” 

That’s right. 

And won’t we also agree that everything that comes to someone who is 
loved by gods, insofar as it comes from the gods themselves, is the best 

613 possible, unless it is the inevitable punishment for some mistake he made 
in a former life? 

Certainly. 

Then we must suppose that the same is true of a just person who falls 
into poverty or disease or some other apparent evil, namely, that this will 
end well for him, either during his lifetime or afterwards, for the gods 
never neglect anyone who eagerly wishes to become just and who makes 
himself as much like a god as a human can by adopting a virtuous way of 

b Ше. 

It makes sense that such a person not be neglected by anyone who is 
like him. 

And mustn’t we supposc that the opposite is true of an unjust person? 

Definitely. 

Then these are some of the prizes that a just person, but not an unjust 
one, receives from the gods. 

That’s certainly my opinion. 

What about from human beings? What does a just person get from 
them? Or, if we’re to tell the truth, isn’t this what happens? Aren’t clever 
but unjust people like runners who run well for the first part of the course 
but not for the second? They leap away sharply at first, but they become 
ridiculous by the end and go off uncrowned, with their ears drooping on 
their shoulders like those of exhausted dogs, while true runners, on the 

с other hand, get to the end, collect the prizes, and are crowned. And isn’t 
it also generally true of just people that, towards the end of each course 
of action, association, or life, they enjoy a good reputation and collect the 
prizes from other human beings? 

Of course. E 


21. See 363 ff. 


BOOK X 6124-6145 285 


Then will you allow me to say all the things about them that you yourself 
said about unjust people? ГІІ say that it is just people who, when they’re 
old enough, rule in their own cities (if they happen to want ruling office) 4 
and that it is they who marry whomever they want and give their children 
in marriage to whomever they want. Indeed, all the things that you said 
about unjust people I now say about just ones.” As for unjust people, the 
majority of them, even if they escape detection when they’re young, are 
caught by the end of the race and are ridiculed. And by the time they get 
old, they've become wretched, for they are insulted by foreigners and 
citizens, beaten with whips, and made to suffer those punishments, such 
as racking and burning, which you rightly described as crude.” Imagine е 
that I’ve said that they suffer all such things, and see whether you’ll allow 
me to Say it. 

Of course I will. What you say is right. 

Then these are the prizes, wages, and gifts that a just person receives 
from gods and humans while he is alive and that are added to the good 
things that justice itself provides. 614 

Yes, and they’re very fine and secure ones too. 

Yet they’re nothing in either number or size compared to those that 
await just and unjust people after death. And these things must also be 
heard, if both are to receive in full what they are owed by the argument. 

Then tell us about them, for there aren’t many things that would be 
more pleasant to hear. b 

It isn’t, however, a tale of Alcinous that ГІІ tell you but that of a brave 
Pamphylian man called Er, the son of Armenias, who once died in a war.” 
When the rest of the dead were picked up ten days later, they were already 
putrefying, but when he was picked up, his corpse was still quite fresh. 

He was taken home, and preparations were made for his funeral. But on 
the twelfth day, when he was already laid on the funeral pyre, he revived 
and, having done so, told what he had seen in the world beyond. He said 
that, after his soul had left him, it travelled together with many others until 


22. See especially 361е-362с. 

23. See 361d. 

24. Books 9-11 of the Odyssey were traditionally referred to as Alkinou apologoi, the 
tales of Alcinous. Included among them in Book 11 is the story of Odysseus’ descent 
into Hades. Since the word translated by “brave” is alkimou, which is very similar to 
Alkinou, some sort of pun seems to be involved here. The following is one attractive 
possibility, but there are no doubt others as well. Alkinou might be taken as a compound 
of alke (strength) + nous (understanding) and alkimou as a compound of alké + Mousa 
(a Muse). Socrates would then be saying something like: It isn’t a tale that shows 
strength of understanding that I’m going to tell but one that shows the strength of the 
Muse of storytelling. See 509d n. 25 for another pun involving nous. 


286 SOCRATES 


с еу came to a marvellous place, where there were two adjacent openings 
in the earth, and opposite and above them two others in the heavens, and 
between them judges sat. These, having rendered their judgment, ordered 
the just to go upwards into the heavens through the door on the right, 
with signs of the judgment attached to their chests, and the unjust to travel 
downward through the opening on the left, with signs of all their deeds 

4 оп their backs. When Er himself came forward, they told him that he was 
to be a messenger to human beings about the things that were there, and 
that he was to listen to and look at everything in the place. He said that 
he saw souls departing after judgment through one of the openings in the 
heavens and one in the earth, while through the other two souls were 
arriving. From the door in the earth souls came up covered with dust and 
dirt and from the door in the heavens souls came down pure. And the 

e souls who were arriving all the time seemed to have been on long journeys, 
so that they went gladly to the meadow, like a crowd going to a festival, 
and camped there. Those who knew each other exchanged greetings, and 
those who come up from the earth asked those who came down from the 
heavens about the things there and were in turn questioned by them about 
the things below. And so they told their stories to one another, the former 

615 weeping as they recalled all they had suffered and seen on their journey 
below the earth, which lasted a thousand years, while the latter, who had 
come from heaven, told about how well they had fared and about the 
inconceivably fine and beautiful sights they had seen. There was much to 
tell, Glaucon, and it took a long time, but the main point was this: For 
each in turn of the unjust things they had done and for each in turn of 
the people they had wronged, they paid the penalty ten times over, once 
in every century of their journey. Since a century is roughly the length of 

b ahuman life, this means that they paid a tenfold penalty for each injustice. 
If, for example, some of them had caused many deaths by betraying 
cities or armies and reducing them to slavery or by participating in other 
wrongdoing, they had to suffer ten times the pain they had caused to each 
individual. But if they had done good deeds and had become just and 
pious, they were rewarded according to the same scale. He said some 
other things about the stillborn and those who had lived for only a short 

с time, but they’re not worth recounting. And he also spoke of even greater 
rewards or penalties for piety or impiety towards gods or parents and for 
murder with one’s own hands. 

For example, he said he was there when someone asked another where 
the great Ardiaius was. (This Ardiaius was said to have been tyrant in 
some city in Pamphylia a thousand years before and to have killed his aged 
father and older brother and committed many other impious deeds as 

а well) And he said that the one who was asked responded: “He hasn’t 


воокх 614c-616d 287 


arrived here yet and never will, Юг this too was one of the terrible sights 
we saw. When we came near the opening on our way out, after all our 
sufferings were over, we suddenly saw him together with some others, 
pretty well all of whom were tyrants (although there were also some private 
individuals among them who had committed great crimes). They thought 
that they were ready to go up, but the opening wouldn’t let them through, 
for it roared whenever one of these incurably wicked people or anyone 
else who hadn’t paid a sufficient penalty tried to go up. And there were 
savage men, all fiery to look at, who were standing by, and when they 
heard the roar, they grabbed some of these criminals and led them away, 
but they bound the feet, hands, and head of Ardiaius and the others, threw 
them down, and flayed them. Then they dragged them out of the way, 
lacerating them on thorn bushes, and telling every passer-by that they 
were to be thrown into Tartarus,” and explaining why they were being 
treated in this way.” And he said that of their many fears the greatest each 
one of them had was that the roar would be heard as he came up and that 
everyone was immensely relieved when silence greeted him. Such, then, 
were the penalties and punishments and the rewards corresponding to 
them. 

Each group spent seven days in the meadow, and on the eighth they 
had to get up and go on a journey. On the fourth day of that journey, they 
came to a place where they could look down from above on a straight 
column of light that stretched over the whole of heaven and earth,” more 
like a rainbow than anything else, but brighter and more pure. After 
another day, they came to the light itself, and there, in the middle of the 
light,” they saw the extremities of its bonds stretching from the heavens, 
for the light binds the heavens like the cables girding a trireme and holds 
its entire revolution together. From the extremities hangs the spindle of 
Necessity, by means of which all the revolutions are turned. Its stem and 
hook are of adamant, whereas іп its whorl”? adamant is mixed with other 
kinds of material. The nature of the whorl was this: Its shape was like that 
of an ordinary whorl, but, from what Er said, we must understand its 
structure as follows. It was as if one big whorl had been made hollow by 
being thoroughly scooped out, with another smaller whorl closely fitted 
into it, like nested boxes, and there was a third whorl inside the second, 


25. Tartarus is the lowest part of Hades, the pit of hell. 

26. dia pantos tou ouranou kai gës tetamenon is usually translated as “stretched through 
the whole of heaven and earth.” But “stretched over the whole of heaven and earth” 
is equally acceptable grammatically and gives a better overall sense. See 617b n. 29. 
27. Le. in the middle of the circle of light. 

28. A whorl (sphondulon) is the weight that twirls a spindle. 


616 


288 SOCRATES 


and so on, making eight whorls altogether, lying inside one another, with 
their rims appearing as circles from above, while from the back they formed 
е опе continuous whorl around the spindle, which was driven through the 
center of the eighth. The first or outside whorl had the widest circular 
rim; that of the sixth was second in width; the fourth was third; the eighth 
was fourth; the seventh was fifth; the fifth was sixth; the third was seventh; 
and the second was eighth. The rim of the largest was spangled; that of 
the seventh was brightest; that of the eighth took its color from the 
seventh’s shining on it; the second and fifth were about equal in brightness, 
617 more yellow than the others; the third was the whitest in color; the fourth 
was rather red; and the sixth was second in whiteness. The whole spindle 
turned at the same speed, but, as it turned, the inner spheres gently 
revolved in a direction opposite to that of the whole. Of these inner 
spheres, the eighth was the fastest; second came the seventh, sixth, and 
b fifth, all at the same speed; it seemed to them that the fourth was third іп 
its speed of revolution; the fourth, third; and the second, fifth.” The 
spindle itself turned on the lap of Necessity. And up above on each of the 
rims of the circles stood a Siren, who accompanied its revolution, uttering 
a single sound, one single note. And the concord of the eight notes 
produced a single harmony. And there were three other beings sitting at 
equal distances from one another, each оп а throne. These were the Fates, 
с е daughters of Necessity: Lachesis, Clotho, and Atropos. They were 
dressed in white, with garlands on their heads, and they sang to the music 
of the Sirens. Lachesis sang of the past, Clotho of the present, and Atropos 
of the future. With her right hand, Clotho touched the outer circumference 


29. Plato’s description of the light and the spindle is difficult. He compares the light 
to hypozomata, the ropes that bind a trireme together. These ropes seem to have girded 
the trireme from stem to stern and to have entered it at both places. Within the trireme, 
they were connected to some sort of twisting device that allowed them to be tightened 
when the water caused them to stretch and become slack. The spindle of Necessity 
seems to be just such a twisting device. Hence, the extremities of the light’s bonds 
must enter into the universe, just as the hypozomata enter the trireme, and the spindle 
must be attached to these extremities, so that its spinning tightens the light and holds 
the universe together. The light is thus like two rainbows around the universe (or the 
whorl of the spindle) whose ends enter the universe and are attached to the spindle. 
The upper half of the whorl of the spindle consists of concentric hemispheres that fit 
into one another, with their lips or rims fitting together in a single plane. The outer 
hemisphere is that of the fixed stars; the second is the orbit of Saturn; the third, of 
Jupiter; the fourth, of Mars; the fifth, of Mercury; the sixth, of Venus; the seventh, of 
the sun; and the eighth, of the moon. The earth is in the center. The hemispheres are 
transparent, and the widths of their rims are the distances of the heavenly bodies from 
one another. The most convincing discussion is J. S. Morrison, “Parmenides and Er.” 


The Journal of Hellenic Studies (1955) 75: 59-68. 


воокх 6164-6184 289 


of the spindle and helped it turn, but left off doing so from time to time; 
Atropos did the same to the inner ones; and Lachesis helped both motions 
in turn, one with one hand and one with the other. 

When the souls arrived at the light, they had to go to Lachesis right 
away. There a Speaker arranged them in order, took from the lap of 
Lachesis a number of lots and a number of models of lives, mounted a 
high pulpit, and spoke to them: “Here is the message of Lachesis, the 
maiden daughter of Necessity: ‘Ephemeral souls, this is the beginning of 
another cycle that will end in death. Your daimon or guardian spirit will 
not be assigned to you by lot; you will choose him. The one who has the 
first lot will be the first to choose a life to which he will then be bound by 
necessity. Virtue knows no master; each will possess it to a greater or less 
degree, depending on whether he values or disdains it. The responsibility 
lies with the one who makes the choice; the god has попе” When he had 
said this, the Speaker threw the lots among all of them, and each—with 
the exception of Er, who wasn’t allowed to choose—picked up the one 
that fell next to him. And the lot made it clear to the one who picked it 
up where in the order he would get to make his choice. After that, the 
models of lives were placed on the ground before them. There were far 
more of them than there were souls present, and they were of all kinds, 
for the lives of animals were there, as well as all kinds of human lives. 
There were tyrannies among them, some of which lasted throughout life, 
while others ended halfway through in poverty, exile, and beggary. There 
were lives of famous men, some of whom were famous for the beauty of 
their appearance, others for their strength or athletic prowess, others still 
for their high birth and the virtue or excellence of their ancestors. And 
there were also lives of men who weren’t famous for any of these things. 
And the same for lives of women. But the arrangement of the soul was 
not included in the model because the soul is inevitably altered by the 
different lives it chooses. But all the other things were there, mixed with 
each other and with wealth, poverty, sickness, health, and the states 
intermediate to them. 

Now, it seems that it is here, Glaucon, that a human being faces the 
greatest danger of all. And because of this, each of us must neglect all 
other subjects and be most concerned to seek out and learn those that will 
enable him to distinguish the good life from the bad and always to make 
the best choice possible in every situation. He should think over all the 
things we have mentioned and how they jointly and severally determine 
what the virtuous life is like. That way he will know what the good and 
bad effects of beauty are when it is mixed with wealth, poverty, and a 
particular state of the soul. He will know the effects of high or low birth, 
private life or ruling office, physical strength or weakness, ease or difficulty 


618 


290 SOCRATES 


in learning, and all the things that are either naturally part of the soul or 
are acquired, and he will know what they achieve when mixed with one 
another. And from all this he will be able, by considering the nature of 
the soul, to reason out which life is better and which worse and to choose 
accordingly, calling a life worse if it leads the soul to become more unjust, 
e better if it leads the soul to become more just, and ignoring everything 
else: We have seen that this is the best way to choose, whether in life or 
death. Hence, we must go down to Hades holding with adamantine 
determination to the belief that this is so, lest we be dazzled there by 
619 wealth and other such evils, rush into a tyranny or some other similar 
course of action, do irreparable evils, and suffer even worse ones. And we 
must always know how to choose the mean in such lives and how to avoid 
either of the extremes, as far as possible, both in this life and in all those 
b beyond it. This is the way that a human being becomes happiest. 

Then our messenger from the other world reported that the Speaker 
spoke as follows: “There і а satisfactory life rather than а bad one available 
even for the one who comes last, provided that he chooses it rationally 
and lives it seriously. Therefore, let not the first be careless in his choice 
nor the last discouraged.” 

He said that when the Speaker had told them this, the one who came 
up first chose the greatest tyranny. In his folly and greed he chose it 
without adequate examination and didn’t notice that, among other evils, 

с пе was fated to eat his own children as a part of it. When he examined at 
leisure, the life he had chosen, however, he beat his breast and bemoaned 
his choice. And, ignoring the warning of the Speaker, he blamed chance, 
daimons, or guardian spirits, and everything else for these evils but himself. 
He was one of those who had come down from heaven, having lived his 
previous life under an orderly constitution, where he had participated in 
virtue through habit and without philosophy. Broadly speaking, indeed, 

а most of those who were caught out in this way were souls who had come 
down from heaven and who were untrained in suffering as a result. The 
majority of those who had come up from the earth, on the other hand, 
having suffered themselves and seen others suffer, were in no rush to 
make their choices. Because of this and because of the chance of the 
lottery, there was an interchange of goods and evils for most of the souls. 
However, if someone pursues philosophy in a sound manner when he 
comes to live here on earth and if the lottery doesn’t make him one of the 

с last to choose, then, given what Er has reported about the next world, it 
looks as though not only will he be happy here, but his journey from here 
to there and back again won’t be along the rough underground path, but 
along the smooth heavenly one. 

Er said that the way in which the souls chose their lives was a sight 


BOOK х 6184-620а 291 


worth seeing, since it was pitiful, funny, and surprising to watch. For the 
most part, their choice depended upon the character of their former life. 
For example, he said that he saw the soul that had once belonged to 
Orpheus” choosing a swan’s life, because he hated the female sex because 
of his death at their hands, and so was unwilling to have a woman conceive 
and give birth to him. Er saw the soul of Thamyris”’ choosing the life of 
a nightingale, a swan choosing to change over to a human life, and other 
musical animals doing the same thing. The twentieth soul chose the life 
of a lion. This was the soul of Ajax, son of Telamon.” He avoided human 
life because he remembered the judgment about the armor. The next soul 
was that of Agamemnon, whose sufferings also had made him hate the 
human race, so he changed to the life of an eagle. Atalanta” had been 
assigned a place near the middle, and when she saw great honors being 
given to a male athlete, she chose his life, unable to pass them by. After 
her, he saw the soul of Epeius, the son of Panopeus, taking on the nature 
of a craftswoman.”’ And very close to last, he saw the soul of the ridiculous 
Thersites clothing itself as a monkey.” Now, it chanced that the soul of 
Odysseus got to make its choice last of all, and since memory of its former 
sufferings had relieved its love of honor, it went around for a long time, 
looking for the life of a private individual who did his own work, and with 
difficulty it found one lying off somewhere neglected by the others. He 
chose it gladly and said that he’d have made the same choice even if he’d 
been first. Still other souls changed from animals into human beings, or 
from one kind of animal into another, with unjust people changing into 
wild animals, and just people into tame ones, and all sorts of mixtures 
occurred. 


30. See 364е п. 10. According to one myth, Orpheus was killed and dismembered by 
Thracian women or Maenads. 

31. Thamyris was a legendary poet and singer, who boasted that he could defeat the 
Muses in a song contest. For this they blinded him and took away his voice. He is 
mentioned at [liad 2.596-600. 

32. Ajax is a great Homeric hero. He thought that he deserved to be awarded the 
armor of the dead Achilles, but instead it went to Odysseus. Ajax was maddened by 
this injustice and finally killed himself because of the terrible things he had done while 
mad. See Sophocles, Ajax. 

33. Atalanta was a mythical huntress, who would marry only a man who could beat 
her at running. In most versions of the myth, losers were killed. Melanion received 
three golden apples from Aphrodite, which he dropped one by one during his race with 
Atalanta. She stopped to pick them up, and he won the race. 

34. Epeius is mentioned at Odyssey 8.493 as the man who helped Athena make the 
Trojan Horse. 

35. Thersites is an ordinary soldier who criticizes Agamemnon at Iliad 2.211-277. 
Odysseus beats him for his presumption and is widely approved for doing so. 


620 


621 


292 SOCRATES 


After all the souls had chosen their lives, they went forward to Lachesis 
in the same order in which they had made their choices, and she assigned 
to each the daimon it had chosen as guardian of its life and fulfiller of its 
choice. This daimon first led the soul under the hand of Clotho as it 
turned the revolving spindle to confirm the fate that the lottery and its 
own choice had given it. After receiving her touch, he led the soul to the 
spinning of Atropos, to make what had been spun irreversible. Then, 
without turning around, they went from there under the throne of Neces- 
sity and, when all of them had passed through, they travelled to the Plain 
of Forgetfulness in burning, choking, terrible heat, for it was empty of 
trees and earthly vegetation. And there, beside the River of Unheeding, 
whose water no vessel can hold, they camped, for night was coming on. 
All of them had to drink a certain measure of this water, but those who 
weren’t saved by reason drank more than that, and as each of them drank, 
he forgot everything and went to sleep. But around midnight there was a 
clap of thunder and an earthquake, and they were suddenly carried away 
from there, this way and that, up to their births, like shooting stars. Er 
himself was forbidden to drink from the water. All the same, he didn’t 
know how he had come back to his body, except that waking up suddenly 
he saw himself lying on the pyre at dawn. 

And so, Glaucon, his story wasn’t lost but preserved, and it would save 
us, if we were persuaded by it, for we would then make a good crossing 
of the River of Forgetfulness, and our souls wouldn’t be defiled. But if 
we are persuaded by me, we’ll believe that the soul is immortal and able 
to endure every evil and every good, and we’ll always hold to the upward 
path, practicing justice with reason in every way. That way we’ll be friends 
both to ourselves and to the gods while we remain here on earth and 
afterwards—like victors in the games who go around collecting their 
prizes—we’ll receive our rewards. Hence, both in this life and on the 
thousand-year journey we’ve described, we’ll do well and be happy. 


INDEX 


ACCOUNT, ARGUMENT, DISCUSSION (logos): 
328d [conversation], 331d, 334a, d, 
335a, 336b, e, 337e, 338d, 339d, 340d, 
е, 341а, b, с [sense], 342b [sense], 
343a, 344d, 345b, 348 a [replies], d 
[mentioning], 349a, 351а, b [position], 
352b [words], d, 353d [said], e, 354b, 
357a, 358c, 359b, 360d, 361b, d, 362d, 
e, 363c [stories], e, 364b, c, 365d, 366e 
[conversations], 367b [theoretical argu- 
ment], e [theoretical argument], 368b 
[words], с, 369a [theory], с [theory], 
376d, е, 37бе [stories, story], 377e 
[story], 378a [stories], e [stories], 380a, 
381a, 382a [word], b [words], c [words], 
e [word], 383a [words], 388e, 389a, d 
[theory], 390a [words], 392a [story], c 
[stories], 394d, e, 395b, 396a [word], e 
[story], 398b [stories], d [words], 399d, 
400a [words], c, d [words], 403c, 408d 
[question], 411d, 413b, 414d [words], 
421а, 425b [written], 431а [expression], 
435d, 436b, 437d [word], 439a [word], 
440a [proves], b, d, 442a [stories], c 
[reason], 445c, 449c, 450a, b, c, 451b, 
c, 452d, 453a, c, d, 457c, e, 465e, 
472a, e [theoretical model], 473a [the- 
ory], e [statement], 474a, 475a [word, 
argument], c, 476a, b, 484a, 485a, 
487b, c [words], e, 490d, 492d [words], 
e [rule], 493d, 494e [reason], 497c 
[theory], 498a, d, 499a, d, 500b [ar- 
guing], с, 501е [theory], 503a, 507a, b 
[words], 509d, 510c, d [claims], 511b, 
518c, 522a [stories], 525d, 527a, 528a, 
с, 529d, 531е, 532a, 533c, 534a [ratios, 
arguments], b, c, d [theory], 538c, d, 
5304 ра 5с. 5412, Б, 5150 E S 
с, 549b, 550a, 554d, 560-5616 


[words], 563a [word], 564с [theory], 
565e [story], 571b [reason], d, 576b, 
578c, 581а, 582а-е, 584a, 5864, 588b 
[words], d, 589d, 591a, 592a [theory], 
596e, 597a, 599b, 601a [word], 603d, 
607b, с, 608a, 610a, с, 611а, b, 612a, с, 
614a, 617d [message]. See also REASON 
(logos) 

AESCHYLUS: 361b, 362a, 380a, 383a, b, 
550с, 563b 

ANGER. See SPIRIT 

APPETITE, DESIRE (epithumia): 328d, 329c, 
359c, 390c, 429d, 430b, e, 431b, c, d, 
437b, d, e, 438a, 439d, 440a, b, 485d, 
493b, 533b, 548b, 554a, b, d, 555a, 
558d, 559b, с, е, 560a, d, 561а, с, 
571а, Б, 572b, с, е, 573a, b, а, е, 575d, 
578а, 579e, 580d, е, 581a, 586d, 587b 

APPETITIVE PART OF THE SOUL (epithumetti- 
kon): 439d, е, 440е, 441a, 442a, 475b, 
516d, 550b, 553c, 571е, 580е, 606d. 
See also APPETITE, SPIRITED PART, RA- 
TIONAL PART 

ARCHILOCHUS: 365с 

ARGUMENT. See ACCOUNT 

ARISTOCRACY, ARISTOCRATIC PERSON: 
338d, 445d, 544е, 545c, 547с, 5874. 
See also DEMOCRACY, OLIGARCHY, PHI- 
LOSOPHY, TYRANNY 

AScLeptus: 405с-408с, 599c 

ASTRONOMY: 527c, 5284-531аг, 531b 


BAD, FORM OF THE: 47ба 

BEAUTIFUL. See fine 

BECOMING (genesis): 519a, 525b, с, 526e, 
533b [growing], 534a, 546c [births] 

BEING (ousia): 329e [wealthy], 330b 
[wealth], d [wealth], 359a [essence], 
361b [substantial wealth], 372b [re- 


293 


294 


sources], 374a [substantial wealth], 416c 
[property], d [property], 479c, 485, 
486a, 509b, 523a, 524e, 525b, c, 526e, 
534a, c, 551b [property], 553b [prop- 
erty], 565a [possessions], 566a [the 
rich], 573e [capital], 585c. See also BE- 
COMING, BEING, THE; THING WHICH 15; 
THINGS WHICH ARE 

BEING, THE (ho estin): 490b, 507b, 532a, 
533b, 534b, 547a, c. See also BEING 

BELIEF (pistis): 503d [confidence], 505e, 
511е, 534a, b, 554d, 573e, 578e, 585b, 
с, d, 591е, 601е 

BELIEVE (doxazein): 327с, 363е, 413а, 
476d, 477е, 478а, b, с, 479е, 490, 
493а, 506с, 508d, 511а, 516d, 588, 
602а, е, 603a. See also OPINION 

BELIEVE (nomizein): 348e, 372d, 378c, 
450a, 463b, c, 469b, d, 470d, 476c, 
479a, 509a, 515b, с, е, 518a, b, 529b, 
530а, b, 581е, 584d, 621c 


CALCULATION (logizesthai, logismos): 339a 
[reasons], 340d, 366a, 431с, 439d, 440b 
[rational calculation], 441a [rational cal- 
culation], 496d [taking into account], 
510c, 522c, e, 524b, 525d, 526d, 536d, 
546b, 553d [reason], 586d, 587e, 602d, 
603a, 604d, 606b [figure out], 611c 
[logical reasoning] 

CAVE: 514а-517с, 520c, 532b, 539e 

CIVIL WAR (stasiazein, stasis): 351d, 352a, 
440b, e, 442d, 444b, 465b, 470b-47 la, 
545d-547b, 554d, 556e, 560a, 566a, 
586e, 603d 

COUNT (arithmein): 348a, 532a, 522d, е, 
525a, 602d. See also NUMBER 

COURAGE (andreia): 427b, 429а-430с [po- 
litical courage], 442c, 536a 

CRAFT, SCIENCE (techn: 332c, d, 3414, е, 
342a, b, c, 346a, c, d, e, 347a, e, 360e, 
370b, 374a, b, c, 381b, 383b, 402b, c, 
406b, 40752, 408b, d, 41 le, 4214, е, 
438d, 452a, 454a, d, 455a, 467a, 488b, 
d, e, 493b, 495d, 496b, 511b, c, 518d, 
522b, c, 532c, 533b, d, 598c, e, 599c, 
600a, 60la, d, 620c 


DEMOCRACY, DEMOCRATIC PERSON: 338d, 
e, 463a, 544c, 545b, с, 555b-562a, 


REPUBLIC 


562b, c, 563c, e, 564a, b, c, d, 565a, 
568c, 569c, 572b-d, 574e, 580b. See 
also ARISTOCRACY, OLIGARCHY, PHILOS- 
OPHY, TYRANNY 

DESIRES, NECESSARY AND UNNECESSARY: 
373a, b, d, 458d, 554a, 558d-559c, 
561а, 571b, 572c, 581е 

DIALECTIC (dialektikos): 454a [conversa- 
tion], 5314, 532b, 533c, 534b, е, 536d, 
537c. 

DIVINE (manteuesthai): 349a, 394d, 43 le, 
506a, 523a, 531d, 538a,b 

рО ONE’S OWN (WORK), HAVE ONE’S OWN: 
364d, 369d, 370a, 371c, 374c, 400e, 
406c, 421c, 423d, 433b, d, e, 434c, 
435b, 441d, e, 442a, b, 443b, d, 452c, 
453b, 466c, 467e, 496d, 550a. See also 
OUTDO 

DREAM, DREAMING: 382e, 383a, 414d, 
443b, 476c, а, 550d, 533b, 534с, 
572a, 0 


EDUCATION (paideia): 3761-4120 [of the 
guardians], 4234-427а, 376d—412b [of 
women], 497d—540c [of the philoso- 
pher-kings], 518р-519с, 543a, 546a, 
548c, 549a, 552e, 554b, 559b, d, 599c, 
600а-е, 606a, е 

EQUALITY (isos, 150145): 359c, 558c, 561Һ-с, 
56le 

ERISTIC (eristikas): 499a 

EROTIC LOVE (705): 396d [sexual passion], 
403a [love], 490b, 572e, 573a, b, d, e, 
574d, e, 575a, 578a, 579b, 586c [erotic 
passions], 607e [erotic passion], 608a 
[passion]. See also FRIENDS 

EURIPIDES: 568a 

EXPERIENCE (empeiria): 422c, 409b, 422c, 
467a, d, 527a, 529d, 533a, 539e, 
582а-е, 584e, 601d 


FALSEHOODS (pseudos, pseudesthat): 376e, 
377а-378а, 382a-383a, 389b-d, 412e- 
413a, 4145-е, 459c, 485c, 490b, 535e 

FALSE WITNESS (sukophantein, sukophantés): 
340d, 3414, b, с, 553b, 575b 

FINE (kalon): 348e, 353a, 358a, 377b, е, 

381b, c [beautiful] 394e, 400d, e, 

401b-403c [beautiful], 409a, 416b 

[good], 425a, d, 427b, 430a, 435c, 


INDEX 


443е, 444d, 445a, 451а, 457b, 465d, 
466a, 475е-480а [beautiful], 484d, 
489e, 493d, е [beautiful], 497d, 501b- 
509a [beautiful], 517b [beautiful], 520c, 
529с [beautiful], 530a, 531c [beautiful], 
538с-а, 540b, с, 544a, 558b [right], 
574d, 581е, 588a, 589с-4, 598e, 599c, 
601d—602b, 611Ь-с. See also SHAMEFUL 
{the opposite of fine) 

FORM (eidos, idea): 357c [kind], 363e, 376e 
[kinds], 380d, 389b, 392a [kind], 396b , 
c [kind], 397b, c [kind], 400a {kinds], 
402c, 406c [type], 424c, 427a, 432b 
[kind], 433a, 434b [class], d, 435b, b 
[parts], с [parts], e [parts], 437c [class], 
d [class], 439e [parts], 440e [parts], 
445c, 449a [kind], c [section], 454a, b, 
c, 459d, 475b [kind], 476a, 477c [kind], 
e [kind], 479a, 486d, 504a [parts], 505a, 
507b, 508e, 509d [kinds], 510b, с 
[kinds], d [figures], 511a [kind], с, 
517b, 526e, 530c, 532d, 534c, 544a 
[types], c, d, 572a [parts], b, c, 580d 
[parts], 581c, 585b [kind], 588c, d, 
590c [part], 595a [parts], 596a, b, 597a, 
b [kinds], c, 612a [parts], 618a [ap- 
pearance] 

FREE, FREEDOM (eleutheros, eleutheria): 
344c, 387b, 395c, 402c [frankness], 
405a, 431c, 433d, 461b, 499a, 536e, 
549a, 557b, 560e, 561а [liberation], d, 
562b-e, 563b-c, 564a, 566e, 567a, 
569a, c, 572e, 575a, 576a, 577c, d, 
579b, 591a, b 

FRIENDS, FRIENDSHIP (philos, philia): 334с- 
336a, 352b, 362c, 376b, 382c, 386a, 
401d, 404d, 414b, 423e, 442c, 443d, 
449c, 450d [dearest], e [dear], 451a, 
470c, 471а, 487a, 496d, 498c, 547c, 
567b, 568a, 574b, с, 575d, 576a, 581а 
[love], 589a, b, 590d, 595b [love], 603a, 
604d, 621c 


GEOMETRY: 458d, 510c, 511b, d, 526с- 
527c, 528а-е, 529d, 530c, 536d, 546c, 
587d 

GOD, GODS: 327a, 328a, 331b, e, 352a, b, 
360c, 362c, 363a, b, c, 364b, c, d, 
365a, b, d, e, 366a, b, c, e, 367e, 372b, 
374e, 377e—383c, 386a, 388a, b, с, 


295 


389a, b, 390c, 391b, с, 4, е, 392a, 
393a, e, 394a, 3954, 399b, 408c, 41 le, 
415a, b, 416e, 419e, 425e, 427b, с, 4, 
443a, b, 463d, 469a, 470a, 474e, 492a, 
499b, 501b, c, 508a, 552c, 560b, 571d, 
573c, 578e, 579a, 580c, 589e, 596c, 
597b, с, d, 598e, 607a, 611с, 612c, d, 
e, 613a, b, 614а, 615c, 6174, е, 619b, 
621с 


GOOD (agathos): 330a, а, 335a—d, 343b-c, 


347b, d, 3494-350с, 353e, 357b—d, 
358c, e, 359a, c, 360c, 361c, 363a—c, 
364b, 366e-367e, 374c, 375с-е, 392b, 
396c-d, 400e, 401a—402a, 403d, 408a- 
409e, 413a, 419a, 424a—b, 425a, 4, 
428b, d, 433c, 434e, 438a, e, 449a, 
451а, 457d, 460c, 46 la, 462a—e, 464b, 
469c, 470e, 471с-е, 472d, 484d, 491c- 
е, 493b-d, 495a-b, 504Һ-с, 505d, 
506a, 507b, 520c, 521a, 544e, 558b, 
578c, 588a, 609b, 612d, 614a, 618c, 
619d, 621c. 


GOOD, FORM OF THE, THE GOOD, THE 


GOOD ITSELF: 476a, 505а-509Һ, 517b, 
518d, 519с, 521a, 526е, 531с, 532b, 
534b, с, 538e, 540a, 555b, 562b, 608e, 
609a 


GUARDIANS: 333e, 334a, 367a, 374b- 


412b, 412с-427с (rulers or complete 
guardians), 428d, e, 433d, 434b, c, 
442b, 450c, 451c, 4, 456a—466e (female 
guardians), 461е, 463b, c, 464a, b, с, 
465a, b, d, e, 466a, b, c, 467a, 469a, c, 
471b, c, 484b, c, e, 503b, 504c, 506a, 
520a, 521b, 522a, 525b, 540b, 543b, c, 
546d, e, 547c, 549b, 560b, c, 591a, 
620e 


GYMNASTICS (ритпаз 2): 376e—377a, 


403с-412Һ, 424b, 430a, 441е, 452a, 
456a, b, е, 521е--522Һ, 546d, 547d, 
548c. See also Music 


HAPPINESS, HAPPY, BLESSEDLY HAPPY (eu- 


daimonia, eudaimon, makarios): 335e, 
343d, 344a, c, 352d, 354c, 358a, 361d, 
364a, 365d, 392b, 395e, 419a, 420a, b, 
d, e, 421b, c, 422e, 427d, 465d, e, 
466a, b, 472c, 496c [blessed], 498c, 
516c, 518b, 521a, 526e, 540c, 544a, 
545a, 561d, 566d, 567c, d, e, 571а, 


296 


574c [blessing], 576c, d, е, 5776, 580b, 


606d, 612a, 619b, 621d 

HARMONICS: 5304-531с. See also 
HARMONY 

HARMONY: 397d, e, 398d, 399c, d, 400d, 
е, 401а, а, 402d, 410e, 411а, e, 412a, 
413e, 430e, 431е, 441е, 442a, с, 443d, 
e, 444a, 462a, 519e, 522a, 546c, 547a, 
554e, 590a, 591c, 601b, 617b 

HEALTH: 34ба-а, 357c, 367d, 372d, е, 
380e, 401c, d, 404a, b, e, 406e, 407d, 
408a, e, 409a, d, 426a, 438e, 444c-d, 
490c, 496c, 559a, 571d, 583c, 591b, c, 
618b 

HERACLITUS: 498b 

Невор: 363a, b, 377d, e, 468e, 600d, 
612b 

HIGH-MINDEDNESS (megaloprepeia): 402c, 
486a, 487a, 490c, 494b, ШЕ 536a, 
561а [magnificence] 

Homer: 334b, 363a, 364d, 3774, 378d, 
379d, 383a, 387b, 388a, b, 389a, 391a, 
393b, d, 404b, c, 441b, c, 468c, d, 
501b, 5164, 545e, 595b, 598d, 599b— 
60la, 605c, 606e, 607d, 612b 

HONOR-LOVERS: 336c, 347c, 475a, 485b, 
545a, b, 548c, 549a, 550b, 551а, 553b, 


581b, d, 582c, d, e, 583a, 586c, d, 620c 


IGNORANCE (anepistēmosunē, agnoia, agno- 
sia): 350а-с, 376b, 382b, 406c, 477a- 
478d, 560b, 585b, 586c, 598d 

IMAGE, STATUE (eidélon): 382b, 443c, 
516a, 520c, 532b, c, 534c, 586b, c 
[phantom], 587c, d, 598b, 599a, d, 
600e, 601b, 605b. See also IMAGE (ei- 
kon), LIKENESS 


IMAGE (е оп): 375d [analogy], 401b, 402b, 


c, 487e, 488a [simile], 489a [simile], 
509a, е, 510b, е, 5112, 515a, 517b, d, 
531b [analogy], 533a, 538c, 588b, d 
IMAGING (ezkasia): 511е, 534a 
IMITATION, IMITATORS (mimeisthai, тіте- 
sis): 373b, 382b, 388c, 3924-400е, 
40la, 490e, 500c, 510b, 532a, 539b, c, 
547d, 563b, 595a, b, c, 597b, e, 598a, 
b, d, e, 599a, b, c, d, 600c, e, 60la, b, 


d, 602a, b, c, 603a, b, c, 604e, 605a, b, 


c, 606c, d, 607c 
INJUSTICE, UNJUST. See JUST 


KNOW (gignoskein): 331e, 336c, 343a, 347a 


REPUBLIC 


INTELLIGIBLE (noéton): 507b, 508c, 510b, 


517b, c, 532a, b. See also UNDERSTAND- 
ING, VISIBLE 


JUST, JUSTICE (dikaion, dikaiosuné): 331a, 


331с-354с, 357а-367е, 368b, с, е, 
369a, 371е, 372e, 376c, d, 3785, 380b, 
392b, c, 405b, c, 409a, b, 420b, 427d, 
e, 430c, d, 431b, 432b, 433a, b, c, e, 
434a, с, 4, e, 435a, b, 440c, 4414, е, 
442d, 443b, c, d, e, 444a, b, c, d, 445a, 
b, 451а, 458e [right], 461а, 463d, 464e, 
468c, 469b, 472b, c, 476a, 479a, e, 
484b, e, 486b, 487a, 490c, 491е, 493b, 
c, 496d, e, 497a, 499c, 500c, d, 501b, 
504a, d, 505a, d, 506a, b, c, d, 517d, e, 
519d, 520a, b, c, e, 529c, 536b, 538c, 
e, 540e, 544e, 545a, b, 548d, 554c, 
568e, 574d, 576a, b, 580a, c, 583b, 
586e, 588a, b, e, 589a, b, c, d, 590a, 
591а, b, 597d, 607d, 608b, 609b, c, d, 
610b, с, d, e, 611с, 6124, e, 613a, b, c, 
d, e, 614a, c, 615а, b, 618е, 620d, 621c 


JUSTICE, FORM OF, THE JUST ITSELF: 358b, 


363a, 435b, 472b, c, 479a, e, 501b, 
517e, 536b, 612b, d, 6l4a 


KNOW (eidenai): 328a, d, 330d, 334b, 


336c, е, 337d, e, 338a, b, c, d, 341а, 
344e, 345e, 347b, 354c, 358a, 365e, 
366c, 375e, 379a, 382a, d, 392b, 393a, 
394d, 399a, 400b, 403e, 404b, c, 406c, 
408d, 414c, d, 429a, d, e, 430d, e, 
433b, 434e, 435c, 436c, 450d, 455c, 
457b, d, 459c, 471d, 472a [realize], 
476e, 485d, 487d, 4914, 4924, е, 493b, 
501а, 502d, 503c, 505a, b, c, 506c, 
507e, 508c, 510c, d, 517b, 522d, 527c, 
531а, d, e, 533c, 534c, 538a, 544d [re- 
alize], 549e, 554c, 556e, 563d, 571a, с, 
572a, 578d, 581b, c [realize], e, 582b, 
587b, 588b, 589c, 595b, 597d, 598c, e, 
599a, 601b, e, 602a, b, 605d [realize], 
607a, 611a [realize], 618c, 621b 


KNOW (epistasthai): 392e, 420e, 4264 [ig- 


norant], 427b, 488d, 505a [knowledge], 
522d [know how to count], 536a, 579e, 
598c, d, е, 601c. See also IGNORANCE 


2 


d, 402b, 407с, 4094, 428a [recognize], 


INDEX 297 


436a [understand], 466c, 471d, 476d, e, 
477а, b, 478a, 479e, 484d, 488b, 490b, 


491b, 500d, 501b, c, 504a, 506d, 536a, 
555d, 559b, 560d, 571d, 572b, d, 573b, 


499a, 506a, 508d, e, 509b, 520c, 555b, 
569a, 599d, 600c, 619a. See also IGNO- 
RANCE 

KNOWLEDGE (epistéme): 340e, 342c, 350a, 
366c, 374d, 409b, d, 422c, 428b, c, d, 
e, 429a, 438c, d, e, 442c, 443e, 477b, 
d, e, 478a, b, d, 486c, 506b, c, 508e, 
509a, 511c, 518c, 522a, c, 527a, 529b, 
530d, 533c, d, e, 534a, c, 540a, 585b, 


c, 586d, 598d, 602a. See also RATIONAL, 


REASON 


LAW: 338e, 339c, 359a, c, 364a, 365d, e, 
380c, 380d, 383c, 398a, 403b, 405a, 
415e, 427b, 421a, 424c, e, 425e, 426e, 
427a, b, 429c, 430a, b, 445e, 451b, 
452c, 453d, 456c, 457a, b, c, 458c, 
459e, 461b, e, 462a, e, 463c, 465a, b, 
468b, 471b, c, 519e, 520a, 5374, 541a, 
548b, 550d, 551a, 555c, 556a, 557e, 
563e, 564c, 571b, 572e, 574e, 587a, c, 
590e, 604a, b, 607a 

LEARN, UNDERSTAND (manthanein): 332a 
[follow], 334a, 337d, 338b, c, 339a, 
344a, d [finding out], 351b, 352d, e, 
353a, 372e, 377a, 382a, 392c, d, 393d, 
394b, c, 396b [concern themselves], 
402e [gather], 404b, 408d, 413a, b, e, 
415d, 429c, 432e, 436a, 438b, d, e, 
442a, 455b, 456e, 475c, 477c, 486c, 
488b, 489a, 504d, 510b, c, 511b, c, e, 
522с, 524d, 525b, 526с, 529b, с, 530е, 


531d, 535b, 536d, е, 550d, 568e, 580d, 


581b, d, е, 582а, b, 583а, 590с, 592а, 
596а, 606e, 618с 

LIES: See FALSEHOODS - 

LIKENESS: 369a, 377e, 382d, 395b, 476c, 
501b, 510a, 547а, 611b. See also IMAGE 

LINE, THE: 5094-511е, 5176-е, 533d- 
534a 

LOVE: 412d, 474c—475b 


MODERATION (sophrosune): 329d, 364a, 
372d, 389d [for the majority], 390a, e, 
391d, 396c, 399b, c, e, 401a, 402c, e, 
403a, 404e, 410a, 411a, 416d, 423a, 
427e, 430c—432b, 433b, е, 435b, 442c, 
d, 443e, 466b, 471a, 485e, 487a, 490c, 


575b, 591b, c 

MONEY: 330b, c, 331b, 333c, 334a, 337d, 
338b, 357c, 371d, 373d, 391c, 422a, 
423a, 436a, 442a, 445a, 464e, 465c, 
485e, 495e, 547d, 548a, b, 549a, d, e, 
550d, 551е, 525b, 553c, d, 554a, b, d, 
555a, 555e, 556b, c, 56la, 564e, 572c, 
581а, b. See also MONEY-LOVERS 

MONEY-LOVERS, MONEY-MAKERs: 330b, с, 
341с, 342d, 3454, 347a, b, 357с, 390d, 
е, 391с, 397е, 408с, 415е, 434b, с, 
436a, 441a, 469d, 485е, 486b, 498a, 
547b, d, 549b, 550e, 551a, e, 552a, 
553с, 4, 555a, е, 556с, 5584, 559с, 
561d, 562, 564е, 572с, 580е, 581а, а, 
583а, 586d. See also HONOR-LOVERS, 
PHILOSOPHERS 

MOST IMPORTANT THING(S), THE (to megis- 
ton, ta megista): 377e, 392b, 450d, 484d, 
503e, 504a, а, е, 505a, 519c, 525b 
[highest offices], 534d, 540e, 578c, 
599c 

MUSIC (mousike): 335c, 349e, 373b, 376e- 
403c, 404b, е, 410а-412аг, 413e, 424b- 
425a, 430a-b, 441е, 452a, c, 455e, 
456b, е, 521е-522Һ, 548c, 549b, 591d, 
601b, 620a. See also GYMNASTICS 


NATURE (phusts): 341d, 347d, 352a, 358e, 
359b, с, 367d, 368a, 370b, c, 374b, е, 
375а-376с, 381b, 392c, 395b, d, 396c, 
401а, с, e, 403a, 407d, 408b, d, е, 
409b, d, е, 410a, b, d, е, 411b, 415c, 
421c, 423d, 424c, 428e, 429a, d, 430a, 
431a, c, 432a, 433a, 434a, 435b, 437e, 
439a, e, 441a, 442a, e, 443c, 444b, d, 
445b, 453а-457с, 458c, 466d, 470c, 
472e, 473d, 474b, c, 476b, 477b, 478a, 
485а-497с, 500a, 501b, d, е, 503b, 
507d, 508a, 513e, 515c, 519a, c, 522e, 
525c, 526b, с, 530b, 535a—537d, 538c, 
539d, 540c, 546d, 547b, e, 548d, 549b, 
550b, 558b, e, 562c, 564e, 572c, 573c, 
576a, b, 579b, 582b, 584b, d, 585d, 
588c, d, 589b, 590c, 591b, 597b, c, d, 
e, 598a, 600a, 60la, d, 602d, 605a, 
606a, 607b, 609a, b, 610a, d, 611b, d, 
612a, 616d, 618d, 620c 


298 


NUMBER (arithmos): 441c, 460a, 473b, 
522c, d, 524d, 525a, c, d, 526a, 529d, 
531c, 537a, 546b, с, 587d, 588a 


OLIGARCHY: 544c, 545a, c, 547c, d, 548a, 
550c-555b, 555d, 556e, 558c, e, 562b, 
d, 563e, 564b, 565b, c, 572d, 580b, 
587c. See also ARISTOCRACY, DEMOC- 
RACY, PHILOSOPHY, TYRANNY 

OPINION (doxa): 346a, 350e, 358a, 361a, с, 
362a, 363a, e, 364a, 365b, 367b, d, 
377b, 378d, 412e, 413a, 429c, 430a, b, 
431c, d, 433c, 435d, 444a, 451c, 456d, 
466b, 467d, 470a, 473e, 476d, 477b, е, 
478a, b, с, d, 480a, 490a, 491а, 493c, 
496a, 499a, e, 505d, 506c, 508d, 511d, 
533b, d, 534a, c, 538d, 560c, 572d, 
573b, 574d, 576e, 580b, 581b, 584e, 
585b, 602a, 603d, 606c, 612b, а, 613b, 
619a. See BELIEVE 

OPPOSITE(S) (enantion): 335d, 3394, е, 
343a, 348c, 350b, 354a, 361c, 362e, 
367b, 375c, d, e, 377b, 387c, 392b, 
400b, d, 401a, e, 402c, 410c, 4124, 
420c, 425a, c, 434c, 436b, e, 437b, c, 
439b, 440e, 454c, 472c, 475e, 479b, 
487b, 491d, 492a, 497e, 498b, 520d, e, 
523c, d, 524c, d, e, 527a, 535d, 536b, 
538c, 546a, 550e, 559a, 563e, 567c, 
576d, 580b, 583c, 602e, 603d, 604b, 
605d, 610e, 613b 

OUTDO (pleonektein, pleonexia): 344a, 349b- 
350c, 359c, 370b, 574a, 586b. See also 
DO ONE’S OWN 


PERCEIVE, SENSE PERCEPTION (aisthanesthai, 
aisthésis): 401е [sense], 402b [seeing], с 
[see], 462d, 507c, 508b, 511c [visible], 
523a-524d, 532a, 537d, 546b, 572a 

PHILOSOPHERS, PHILOSOPHIC, PHILOSOPHY: 
375e, 376b, c, 407c, 410e, 411c, e, 
456a, 473c, d, 474b, c, 475b, c, d, e, 
476b, 480a, 484a, b, 485a, d, e, 486a, 
b, d, 487c, e, 488a, b, 489a, b, d, e 
490a, с, d, 4912, b, 492a, 494a, b, е, 
495a, c, d, 496a, b, c, d, 497a, b, d, e, 
498a, b, c, 499b, c, d, e, 500a, b, c, d, 
501d, e, 502a, 503b, 520a, 521b, c, 
525b, 527b, 529a, 535c, 536b, c, 539c, 
d, 540b, d, 543a, 548b, 561d, 581b, c, 


REPUBLIC 


d, 582b, c, d, e, 586e, 587a, 607b, 
6lle, 619c, d 

PHOCYLIDEs: 407а-һ 

PINDAR: 331a, 365b, 408b 

PLEASURE (hédoné): 328d, 329a, 357b, 
389e, 402е-403с, 413c, e, 420e, 429d- 
430b, 431с-а, 436a, 4394, 442a, с, 
462b, d, 464a, b, d, 485d, 493d, 503a, 
е, 505b—c, 506b, 509a, 519b, 538c, 
548b, 556c, 5584-559с, 561а-с, 571b- 
d, 573a, 574a, d, 580d—588a, 589c, 
591c, 606b, 607a, c 

PLEASURES, NECESSARY AND UNNECESSARY: 
558d-559c, 561а-с 

PLEASURES, LAWLESS UNNECESSARY: 
571b-d 

POETRY, POETS: 330c, 3314-335е, 363a- 
367a, 376е-403с, 411а—412а, 414c, 
424b-c, 441b-c, 459e, 4934, 568a—d, 
595a—608b 

POWER (dunamis): 336a, 344a, 346a, b, 
348d, 351a, b, e, 352c, 358b,e, 359b, с, 
d, 360a, 361b, 364a, b, 366a, c, d, e, 
367a, 377d, 402d, 414b, 423a, 429b, 
430b, 43 1a, 433b, d, 440a, 443b, 445a, 
454a, 466c, 473d, 477b, с, d, e, 478a, b, 
479d, 494c, 497b, 507c, 508a, b, e, 509b, 
511b, 516d, 517b, 518c, e, 521c, 532a, c, 
d, 533a, 537d, 540d, 546d, 567b, 569a, 
572e, 575e, 588b, 591a, 602c, d 

Propicus: 600c 

PRrOTAGORas; 600c 

PYTHAGORAS, PYTHAGOREANS: 530d, 600b 


RATIONAL, REASON (phronein, phronésis, 
phronimos): 3484 [clever], 349d, е 
[clever], 357c [knowing], 367d [know- 
ing], 381а, 412c [knowledgeable], 4314, 
432a, 433b [wisdom], e [wisdom], 450e 
[knowledgeable], 461a [mental], 496a 
[wisdom], 505b [knowledge], c [knowl- 
edge], 518e, 521a, b [knowledgeable], 
530c [wise], 559b, 567c [knowledgeable], 
571c, 572a, 582a, c [knowing], d, e, 583a 
[knowledge], b [knowledgeable], 586a, d, 
590d, 591b, 603a, 604e, 621a, c 

RATIONAL PART OF THE SOUL (logistikon): 


z 439d, 440e, 441a, e, 442c, 550b, 553d, 


571c, d, 602e, 605b. See also APPETITIVE 
PART, SPIRITED PART 


INDEX 


REASON (logos): 4014, 402a, 440b, а, 442 
с, 500с [rational], 509d [ratio], 511b, е 
[ratio], 529d, 571b, 587а, b, 604с, 
606a, c, 607a. See also account, rational 


SCIENCE: See CRAFT 

SHAMEFUL (aischron): 344с, 347c, 348е, 
364a, 378b, 3904, 395с, е, 402а, 405a, 
Б, с, 416a, 444e, 452c, 457b, 475e 
[ugly], 479a, b, 492c, 493b, 506c, 536b, 
538d, 574d, 581е, 589c, d, 591a, 605e. 
See also FINE (the opposite of shameful) 

SIMONIDES: 331d-335e 

SLAVE, SLAVERY, ENSLAVE (doulos, douleta, 
doulousthat): 351b, 386b, 387b, 395e, 
433d, 463b, 469с, 471a, 494d, 536е, 
547c, 549a, 554a, 561c, 563d, 564a, Б, 
567e, 569a, c, 574d, 575d, 576a, 577c, 
d, 579d, 587c, 589d, e, 590c, d 

SLAVISHNESS, UNFREEDOM, LACK OF FREE- 
DOM (aneleutheria): 395c, 401b, 486a, b, 
540d, 572d. See also FREEDOM, SLAVE 

SOLON: 536d, 599e 

SOPHOCLES: 3296-а 

SOUL (psuché): 353d, e, 358b, 365a, 366e, 
375b, 376e, 377, c, 381a, 382b, 391c, 
400d, 401c, d, 402a, d, 403d, 404e, 
381a, 382b, 391c, 400d, 401c, d, 402a, 
d, 403d, 404e, 408e, 409a, b, c, 410a, c, 
41 la, b, d, e, 412a, 415b, 416e, 431a, 
435c—441c [tripartition of], 441e, 442a, 
Б, с,е 444b, c, d, е, 445b, с, 4, 484с, 
485d, 486a, Б, 4, е, 490b, е, 491b, е, 
494b, 4954, 496b, 498b, 504a, 505е, 
508d, 510b, 511a, 5114, 517b, с, 518a, 
518b, c, d, 519a, b, 521c, d, 523d, 524a, 
b, е, 525c, 4, 526b, е, 527а, а, 529а, Б, с, 
530b, 532c, 533d, 535b, d, 536e, 538d, 
540a, 544e, 545c, 546a, 547b, 550b, 
553b, 554e, 559b, 560a, b, c, d, 563d, 
571c, 573a, 575с, 577d, 578а, 579b, е, 
580d, 581a, Б, 583a, с, с, 584c, 585b, d, 
586е, 588b, 590a, 591b, с, 4, 592a, 595а, 
602с, е, 603а, 4, 604с, 605а, Б, 606а, 
6084-6114 [immortality of], 611b, с, d, 
612b, с, 614a, d, е, 617d, 618a, Б, d, е, 
6194, е, 620a, 620b, с, 4, е, 621с 

SPIRIT, ANGER (thumos): 375b, 41 1b, с, 
439е, 440b, с, 441a, 465a, 572а, 586d, 
606d 


299 


SPIRITED PART OF THE SOUL (thumoeides): 
375a, b, с, е, 376c, 410b, а, 411а, b, с, 
е, 435e, 440е, 441a, 442с, 456а, 467e, 
547e, 548c, 550b, 553c, d, 572a, 581a, 
586c, 590b See also APPETITIVE PART, 
RATIONAL PART, SPIRIT 

STUDY (therein): 327b [seen], 372e, 467a 
[observe], c [observers], 511c, 529b, 
579b [see], 601а [judge], 606b [watch- 
ing], 607d 

SUMMONERS: 523c-524d 

SUN: 504e-509d, 516b, 532a-d, 596e 


THALEs: 600a 

THINGS THAT ARE (onta): 353d, 382b, 
402a, 413a, 477c, 479e, 490b, 491c, 
500b, 505d, 511d, 515d, 526e, 532c, 
582b, 585d, e, 586b, 596e, 599a, 618d 

THING THAT IS, THAT WHICH IS, WHAT IS 
(to on): 476e, 477a, b, 478a, b, c, d, 
484d, 490a, 508d, 518c, 519d, 521d, 
529b, d [which are really], 533b, 537d, 
538b [what’s true], 583e, 5854, 586b, 
597a, 598b, 611а, 613b [the truth] 

THOUGHT (dianoia): 359c, 371e, 412e, 
393a, 395d, 396e, 400e {intelligent 
plan], 403d [mind], 410c [mind], 455b, 
458a, 469d, 470e, 476b, d, 486a, d, 
500b, 503c, 511а, с, d, 522c, 524d, 
527b, 529d, 533d, e, 534a, 560b, 568a, 
577a, 582c, 595b, 603b 

THRASYMACHUS: 336b-354c, 358b—c, 
367a—c, 450a-b, 498c-d, 545a, 590d 

TYRANNY, TYRANNNICAL PERSON, TYRANT: 
329c, 3384-е, 344a, 544c, 545a, с, 
562а-592Б, 615c, d, 618a, 619a, b. See 
also ARISTOCRACY, DEMOCRACY, PHI- 
LOSOPHY 


UGLY. See SHAMEFUL 

UNDERSTANDING (noein, noésis, nous): 
331b, 335e, 344d, 358b, 362d, 366b, 
376a, 396b, 399b, 406d, 407b, 416c, 
427c, 431c, 432b, 440d, 450b, 477e, 
479c, 488a [imagine], 490a, b, 494d, 
503b, 506c, 508c, а, 509d, 511a, b, с, 
d, 517c, 518a, 523a, b, d, 524b, с, d, 
525c, 526b, 529b, 531b, 532b, 534a 
[intellect], 534b, 549d, 580a, 585b, 


300 


586d, 591c, 6164, 619. See INTELLI- 
GIBLE 


VIRTUE (areté): 335b, с, d, 342a, 348c, е, 
349a, 350d, 351a, 353b, с, 4, е, 354b, 
с, 363d, 364b, 365а, с, 378e, 381с, 
402е, 4034, 407a, с, 409d [natural vir- 
tue], 428a, 432b, 433e, 441d, 444d, e, 
445b, c, 457a, 484e, 492a, e, 493a, 
498e, 500d, 504d, 518d, e, 536a, 545b, 
547с, 549b, 550е, 551а, 554е, 556a, 
576c, 580b, 585c, 586a, 588a, 598e, 
599d, 600d, e, 601d, 608b, c, 612c, 
613b, 617е, 618a, с, 619с 


REPUBLIC 


VISIBLE: 507b, с, 4, 508a, с, 4, е, 509b, 4, 
510a, d, 511c, 5166, 517a, Б, с, 519a, 
b, 524c, 525d, 529b, c, 530b, 532b, d. 
See also INTELLIGIBLE 


WISE: See RATIONAL, REASON 

WOMEN: 373c, 388a, 395e, 396a, 431c, 
449а-471е, 540c, 549c, 557c, 563b, 
605e, 618b 

WRETCHED (athlios): 344a, 354a, 360d, 
380b, 392b, 544a, 545a, 575c, 576c, d, 
e, 577b, c, 578b, 579c, d, 580c, 589e, 
606d, 613d. See also HAPPY (the oppo- 
site of wretched) 


Since its publication іп 1974, scholars throughout the humanities 
have adopted G.M.A. Grube’s masterful translation of the Republic as 
the editiori of choice for their study and teaching of Plato’s most influ- 
ential work. 


In this brilliant revision, C.D.C. Reeve furthers Grube’s success both 
in preserving the subtlety of Plato’s philosophical argument and in 
rendering the dialogue in lively, fluent English that remains faithful to 
the original Greek. This revision includes a new introduction, index, 
and bibliography by Reeve. 


“С.О.С. Reeve has taken the excellent Grube translation and, without 
sacrificing accuracy, rendered it into a vivid and contemporary style. 
It is intensity that is often lost in translation, but not here. This is not 
just a matter of style. The Republic is full of brilliant thoughts and one 
needs to preserve brilliance to capture them. In the cave of transla- 
tions, Reeve’s revision of Grube’s Republic is closest to the sun.” 
—JONATHAN LEAR, Yale University 


“Reeve has reworked the Grube translation thoroughly, raising the 
level of philosophical accuracy and updating the language, all the 
while retaining—and indeed enhancing—the celebrated readability of 
the Grube original. For a long time to come, Grube-Reeve will deserv- 
edly be the first choice of scholars and students alike.” 

—JOHN M. COOPER, Princeton University 


“C.D.C. Reeve has managed to improve Grube’s already excellent 


edition. Undoubtedly the best available.” 
—GEORGE KLOSKO, University of Virginia 


Hackett Publishing Company 90000 
P.O. Box 44937 
Indianapolis, Indiana 46244-0937 

9"780872'201361 


ISBN 0-8?220-13b-8 
